Authors
Richard Scheib
Number of Reviews
73

Title
Review for Amazon Women on the Moon (1987)
USA. 1987. Directors  - Joe Dante, Carl Gottlieb, Peter Horten, John Landis 
& Robert K. Weiss, Screenplay - Michael Barrie & Jim Mulholland, Producer - 
Weiss, Visual Effects - The LA Effects Group, Production Design - Ivo 
Cristante. Production Company - Westward Productions.
(In order of appearance): Arsenio Hall (Apartment Dweller), Monique 
Gabrielle (Taryn Steele), Lou Jacobi (Murray), Griffin Dunne (Doctor), Peter 
Horten (Harry Landers), Michelle Pfeiffer (Brenda Landers), Steve Guttenberg 
(Jerry Stone), Rosanna Arquette (Karen), Steve Forrest (Captain Steve 
Nelson), Joey Travolta (Butch), Sybil Danning (Queen Lara), Robert Colbert 
(Blackie), Forrest J. Ackerman (President of the USA), David Allen Grier 
(Don Simmons), B.B. King (Himself), Henry Silva (Himself), Belinda Balaski 
(Beatrice Pitnik), Steve Allen (Himself), Rip Taylor (Himself), Henry 
Youngman (Himself), Ed Begley Jr (Griffin), Matt Adler (George Bailey), 
Ralph Bellamy (Mr Gower), Kelly Preston (Violet), Marc McClure (Ray), 
Corinne Wahl (Sherrie), Carrie Fisher (Mary Brown), Paul Bartel (Doctor)
A number of well-known comedy directors - Joe ("The Howling", "Gremlins") 
Dante, John ("The Blues Brothers", "Kentucky Fried Movie") Landis and Carl 
("Caveman") Gottlieb - came together to make this grab-bag of comic 
sketches. The sketches self-consciously delve through various popular 
culture and genre parody without ever really amounting to anything 
particularly funny. There are a couple of segments that are amusing - a 
Landis-directed skit in which Arsenio Hall becomes accident prone all at 
once in his apartment; and a "Ripley's Believe It Or Not" send-up which asks 
the question: Was Jack the Ripper really the Loch Ness Monster ? The "Son of 
the Invisible Man" piece, parodying the 1940s "Invisible Man" sequels, in 
which Ed Begley Jr goes dancing around naked thinking he is invisible, and 
the title story parodying fifties B-grade outer space films, would probably 
have sounded funny on paper, but seem terribly belaboured on film. On the 
other hand there is that which would have sounded pretty juvenile on paper 
too, ranging from the instantly forgettable - the literally interpreted 
"Video Pirates" piece, one about a lonely bachelor who finds a participatory 
dirty video - to that which goes on at length to no - one where Rosanna 
Arquette's computer throws Steve Guttenberg's pick-up lines back at him - or 
quite awful points - Griffin Dunne's thoroughly terrible acting as a doctor 
who misplaces Michelle Pfeiffer's baby.
VISIT THE SF, HORROR AND FANTASY FILM REVIEWS DATABASE at:
"http://www.fortunecity.com/lavender/fullmonty/706/index.htm"


Title
Review for Wandafuru raifu (1998)
Japan. 1998. Director/Screenplay - Kore-eda Hirokazu, Producers - Akieda 
Masayuki & Sato Shiho, Photography - Sukita Masayoshi & Yamazaki Yutaka, 
Music - Kasamatsu Yasuhiro. Production Company - TV Man Union.
Arata, Naito Taketoshi, Oda Erika, Terajima Susumu, Naito Takashi, Tani 
Kei
Plot: In the afterlife a group of workers deal with an assortment of 
newly arrived dead. Each of the new arrivals has one week in which to 
select their single favourite memory so that the afterlife workers might 
reconstruct and then videotape it and the arrivals can then pass on and 
inhabit that memory. But many of the arrivals have some difficulty 
choosing a memory.
This marvellous little Japanese film has a quiet effectiveness that kind 
of creeps up on you afterwards. The whole film comes with a sublime 
simplicity to it. It's vision of the afterlife is conducted with a 
wonderful minimalism - this entire afterlife takes place not in Grecian 
palaces in the sky or even the grandiose visions of classical artwork 
come to three-dimensional life as in the recent ‘What Dreams May Come', 
but rather in what looks like a disused schoolhouse. There is almost 
nothing to the film other than a series of vignettes with various people 
standing about being interviewed - and almost despite which, the film 
manages to be an absolute delight.
The interview scenes are conducted with an endearing sense of humour - 
the old lady who says nothing and simply looks out the window, the 
teenage girl who wants her trip to Disneyland recreated, the young punk 
who immediately announces he is refusing to choose anything. Director 
Hirokazu has a genuine affection for the banality and foibles of the 
people's lives and the film manages to paint each of its subjects with 
considerable amusement yet also a quiet dignity.
Unlike ‘What Dreams May Come', ‘After Life' makes no pretense to any 
profound insights into the afterlife or human spiritual condition. But 
the two films, each in their own way, both manage to offer unique and 
thoughtful humanist revisions of classical afterlife imagery . Although 
quite the opposite of ‘What Dreams', ‘After Life'‘s  vision of the 
hereafter comes with an enchanting banality, one where the afterlife 
volunteers have as many clues as to why they are as anybody else does. 
The latter quarter of the film is highly amusing when it comes to the 
recreation of each person's memory and in the sheer mundanity of the 
afterlife volunteers' attempts to get the details right - not having the 
right plane for one memory scenario and having to saw the wing off the 
plane they do have and then send pieces of cotton wool past on wires to 
represent clouds; or a tram scenario being revealed as a mockup being 
rocked by two of the volunteers. Quite a charming film.
Reviewed at the Vancouver 1998 International Film Festival
Copyright 1998 Richard Scheib


Title
Review for What Dreams May Come (1998)
USA. 1998. Director - Vincent Ward, Screenplay - Ron Bass, Based on the 
Novel by Richard Matheson, Producers - Barnet Bain & Stephen Simon, 
Photography - Eduardo Serra, Music - Michael Kamen, Visual Effects 
Supervisor - Ellen M. Somers, Visual Effects - Digital Domain 
(Supervisor - Kevin Mack) & POP Film and POP Animation (Supervisor - 
Stuart Robertson), Painted Visual Effects - Mass Illusions (Supervisors 
- Nicholas Brooks & Joel Hynek), Digital Visual Effects - CIS Hollywood 
(Supervisor - Dr Ken Jones), Special Effects Supervisor - Roy Arbogast, 
Makeup Effects - Masters FX Inc (Supervisor - Todd Masters), Production 
Design - Eugenio Zanetti. Production Company - Interscope 
Communications/MetaFilmics.
Robin Williams (Christy Nielsen), Cuba Gooding Jr (Albert Lewis), 
Annabella Sciorra (Annie Nielsen), Max Von Sydow (The Tracker), Jessica 
Brooks Grant (Marie Nielsen), Josh Paddock (Ian Nielsen), Rosalind Chao 
(Leona)
Plot: Not long after the death of his two children, Christy Nielsen is 
killed by a colliding car while going to aid a car crash victim. He 
finds himself in the afterlife which is not any traditional Heaven or 
Hell but a landscape of one's own imagination - he having composed his 
out of the classical artworks his wife Annie restored - and where one 
can inhabit whatever body they choose. But then comes the news that 
Annie, unable to handle the loss, has committed suicide. Here suicides 
are not condemned of Hell but a world wrapped in their own 
self-absorption. Christy ignores all warnings that he will be dragged 
down into her  closed-off world to venture in and save her.
New Zealander Vincent Ward is one of the most fascinating directors at 
work anywhere in the world at the moment. Ward trained as an artist at 
Canterbury University (only a few departments away from me) before 
turning to film- making. As a director he has an artist's fascination 
with the visual image - one cannot think of any other director in the 
world who would model the entire look of a film on the work of classical 
artists. His first feature film ‘Vigil' (1985) is an extraordinarily 
composed poem written in landscape and light which almost entirely 
circumvents narrative to work on a level of pure imagery alone. The 
Cannes-acclaimed ‘The Navigator: A Mediaeval Odyssey' (1988) was a time 
travel fantasy that Ward painted in the imagery of artists like Bruegel 
and Bosch that offered a haunting outsider's look in on the alienness of 
the 20th Century.
Ward lost the plot somewhat with 1992's ‘Map of the Human Heart', an 
Innuit romance where his fascination with imagery neglected the film's 
crucial emotional core. And since ‘Map' Ward's output has been erratic - 
he caught among the revolving door of directors attached to ‘Alien3' and 
only ending up with story credit and then being forced to direct 
commercials and take bit parts in films like `Leaving Las Vegas' (1995) 
and ‘One Night Stand' (1997) in order to stay off the unemployment line.
But ‘What Dreams' is Ward's return to form and his most mainstream 
release yet. It is an adaption of the 1984 novel by acclaimed genre 
novelist/screenwriter Richard Matheson, author of the likes of ‘The 
Incredible Shrinking Man', ‘Duel', most of Roger Corman's Poe films in 
the 1960s, and numerous ‘Twilight Zone' and ‘Star Trek' episodes, among 
others. Ward's work on the film is quite extraordinary. He lights the 
screen up with impossible vistas of the imagination - a vast library 
where gondoliers drift through canals between the bookshelfs; Williams 
having to walk across a sea of living faces as he enters Hell; valleys 
and oceans filled with castles and cities that have been constructed out 
of works by classical masters amongst which people nonchalantly fly; 
houses casually sitting amidst the Gothic arches of the roof of an 
inverted cathedral. In an extraordinary synthesis of artistic vision and 
cutting edge digital effects technology, Ward gets to literally paint on 
film. In the most wondrous section Robin Williams steps into a landscape 
that is a Van Gogh painting come to life, slipping and sliding through 
the paint of some of the giddiest and brightest oil colours imaginable. 
The sheer breadth of Ward's vision is astounding.
One of Ward's failings in the past has been a fascination with imagery 
at the expense of emotional soul. But thanks to a good cast and an 
especially strong script, he has ample compensation here (apart from 
Annabella Sciorra whose bland performance makes one wonder what 
Williams's love is really all about). The film's humanist reworking of 
the Orpheus and Eurydice legend at the climax is emotionally powerful. A 
landmark achievement.


Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
USA. 1999. Director/Screenplay - Stephen Sommers, Story - Sommers, Lloyd 
Fonvielle & Kevin Jarre, Producer - Sean Daniel & James Jacks, Photography - 
Adrian Biddle, Music - Jerry Goldsmith, Visual Effects Supervisor - John 
Andrew Berton Jr, Visual Effects - Industrial Light and Magic, Additional 
Visual Effects - Cinesite & Pacific Mirage Title, Thebes and Hamunaptra 
Sequence Supervisor - Scott Farrar, Special Effects Supervisor - Chris 
Corbould, Production Design - Allan Cameron. Production Company - 
Alphaville.
Brendan Fraser (Rick O'Connell), Rachel Weisz (Evelyn Carnovan), John Hannah 
(Jonathan Carnovan), Arnold Vosloo (Imhotep), Kevin J. O'Connor (Beni), Omid 
Djalili (The Warden), Jonathan Hyde (The Egyptologist), Erick Avari (The 
Curator), Stephen Dunham (Henderson), Corey Johnson (Daniels), Tuc Watkins 
(Burns), Oded Fehr (Ardeth Bey), Bernard Fox (Winston Havelock), Patricia 
Velazquez (Anck-su-namun)
Plot: In 1290 B.C. the Egyptian high priest Imhotep is sentened to a death 
too horrible to be described for daring to seduce the Pharaoh's mistress 
Anck-su-namun. In 1926 Evelyn Carnovan, a librarian at the Cairo Museum of 
Antiquities, comes across a map leading to Hamunaptra, the forbidden Ancient 
Egyptian city of the dead. Rescuing adventurer Rick O'Connell who promises 
to lead her there from the hangman's noose, she sets forth on an expedition 
to find Hamunaptra, although they find themselves in a race against a rival 
American expedition. But the attempts of both parties to be the first to 
discover the lost city end up reviving the mummified remains of Imhotep. 
Imhotep needs the human organs of a number of victims in order to regenerate 
and unleashes the twelve Biblical plagues as he attempts to claim the 
necessary victims, incarnate his beloved Anck-su-namun in the body of Evelyn 
and unleash a blight of evil across the Earth.
The mummy film is maybe one subgenre more than any other that is condemned 
to B programmer status simply by its theme. The 1932 Boris Karloff ‘The 
Mummy' was a genre classic which, albeit cast a little too much in the 
shadow of the 1931 Bela Lugosi ‘Dracula', was given enormous eerie 
atmosphere by director Karl Freund. But the subsequent mummy sequels 
produced by Universal - ‘The Mummy's Hand' (1940), ‘The Mummy's Tomb' 
(1942), ‘The Mummy's Ghost' (1944) and ‘The Mummy's Curse' (1944) - turned 
the title character into a clumsy bandaged-wrapped zombie wholly lacking in 
threat, before reaching the ignoble nadir of ‘Abbott and Costello Meet the 
Mummy' (1955). England's Hammer Studios remade ‘The Mummy' in 1959, along 
with a package of other classic Universal horror films. There the character 
was effectively fed through the dynamic polarization of Victorian reason 
versus animal passion that the early Hammer films effectively represented. 
But alas subsequent Hammer mummy films - ‘Curse of the Mummy's Tomb' (1964) 
and ‘The Mummy's Shroud' (1967), with the arguable exception of ‘Blood from 
the Mummy's Tomb' (1971) - failed to escape the B programmer curse. And 
outside of the English-speaking world, the mummy's career path was well and 
truly on a long downward spiral, most notably being pitted in the ring in 
Mexico's ‘Wrestling Women vs the Aztec Mummy' (1964) and Santo vs the Mummy 
(19) , while Spain offered gore-drenched efforts like ‘Vengeance of the 
Mummy' (1972) and ‘Dawn of the Mummy' (1981). It can almost be said that the 
most effective mummy films are those that escape B programmer status by 
virtue of subsuming themselves into some other type of genre. The only other 
halfway effective mummy film has been the underrated ‘The Awakening' (1980) 
which dropped all bandaged-wrapped terrors and created an often subtle story 
about possession while modelling itself on the supernatural killings 
set-pieces of ‘The Omen'. (It was also the first mummy film in fifty years 
to actually shoot on location in Egypt).
The latest remake of ‘The Mummy' endeavours to abandon most connections to 
the mummy B movie and happily conflates the genre into a high adventure film 
a la the Indiana Jones series. If the 1932 version of ‘The Mummy' was born 
out of the emergent romantic horror film created by Universal's ‘Dracula' 
and the 1959 ‘Mummy' was pitted in the British fight with morality and 
society over animal instinct, then the 1999 ‘Mummy' is born out of the 
modern action-adventure spectacle and the CGI creature movie post-‘Jurassic 
Park'. This ‘Mummy' quickly abandons any connection with the shuffling 
bandage-enwrapped creatures of yore and the new mummy becomes a much more 
dynamic figure whose abilities are writ on an epic canvas - it talks, it is 
a black sorcerer who transforms into flurries of sand, blasts sandstorms out 
of its mouth, raises armies of the undead and animated scarab beetles, while 
wielding the Biblical Plagues of Egypt (which have in a complete about-face 
been placed in the service of a great Egyptian force of evil rather than in 
the service of the Almighty wishing to free a slave race from the Egyptian 
yolk).
The ‘Mummy' remake has been an oft-mentioned go-project for most of the 
1990s under directors such as Mick Garris and Clive Barker. Indeed when 
Anthony Perkins died in 1992 he was in the midst of shooting a subsequently 
abandoned remake. The director finally settled on, Stephen Sommers, debuted 
with the teen comedy ‘Catch Me If You Can' (1989) and followed with the 
acclaimed 1993 ‘The Adventures of Huck Finn' before making the underrated 
1994 live-action remake of ‘The Jungle Book' which, although it bore more in 
common with Edgar Rice Burroughs than Rudyard Kipling, had a beautiful sense 
of epic jungle adventure to it. However Sommers disappointed with 1998's 
‘Alien'-at-sea clone, ‘Deep Rising'.
Sommers though has a talent for crafting epic adventure. In ‘The Jungle 
Book' Sommers created an adventure-movie version of India that was more 
fabulous and more mysterious than the real India could ever hope to be and 
in ‘The Mummy' similarly creates a more fabulous and mysterious than the 
real Egypt adventure movie version of Egypt. The film is filled with 
incredible vistas of sandstorms, lost cities seen both in the fabulousness 
of their heyday and the spleandour of their ruins, treasure chambers, 
booby-trapped tombs. No sky ever seems merely blue but boils with coloured 
clouds and larger-than-real-life CGI moons. And Sommers has an ability to 
direct satisfyingly kinetic action set-pieces - shootouts with hordes of 
charging horsebound Bedouins, fights aboard burning ships, adventurers 
attempting to combat mummies with machine-guns and swords, biplanes racing 
against giant face-shaped sandstorms and a full-tilt ‘Evil Dead'-styled 
climatic set-piece up against zombified mummy priests.
But for all that Sommers' film crumbles into a lightweight popcorn munch 
without substance whose taste is immediately forgotten when one leaves the 
theatre. When one looks at it, it stirs no more and no less than the sum of 
the elements that ‘Raiders of the Lost Ark' assembled, yet ‘Raiders' became 
an instant classic while ‘The Mummy' falls well short of such stature and 
will probably barely even be remembered by the end of the summer. The 
difference is more akin to that between ‘Raiders' and ‘Indiana Jones and the 
Last Crusade' - where, by the time of the third of the Indiana Jones film, 
the sheer panache and kinetic inventivity of the first film had become 
ham-fisted slapstickery. Sommers great failing here is to play far too much 
towards common denominator audience-pleasing humour. The two leads make flip 
quips the whole way through and what few moments of horror there are drowned 
out by ‘Army of Darkness'-styled gags with skeletons playing football with 
their heads, with Weisz accidentally knocking down a domino line of library 
shelves and the like. Sommers is working with a one-dimensional script and a 
less-than-serious attitude toward it by he and the principals is something 
that causes the film's suspension of disbelief to fold at the knees.
Neither do the leads work. Brendan Fraser comes with too much baggage as 
casting as an amiable lunkead in comedies like ‘Encino Man' (1992), 
‘Airheads' (1994), ‘George of the Jungle' (1997) and ‘Blast from the Past' 
(1999). There is no depth to his character at all - we, for instance, never 
learn what he, an American, is doing adventuring in Egypt in the first 
place. A handsome stalwart leading man type such as Harrison Ford or Tom 
Selleck would have carried this part in their sleep but Fraser's goofy 
eye-rollings strip the character of any heroic stature. Similarly Rachel 
Weisz plays the fruity British accent up but, as always, she gives an awful 
performance and is not at all believable as a period woman. Arnold Vosloo 
has a certain sinister presence as the title character while John Hannah 
makes for irritating comic relief. But again the 
less-than-single-dimensionality of the writing makes the parts seem even 
slighter. Even more unforgivably most of the Arabic characters in the film 
seem written as comic foil racial caricatures where anybody of Arabic 
persuasion is portrayed as craven, greedy and stupid.
Eventually the film's persistent spectacle and sheer dynamism carries it to 
a certain level of likability, albeit entirely forgettable likability. You 
can't deny that Sommers directs action well, but neither can you deny that 
the miscast leads and a far too broad audience-pleasing sense of humour 
entirely deflates it as a film. Its lack of belief in its own seriousness is 
the dividing line between a forgettable popcorn film and what could have had 
the makings of a classic.


Title
Review for Nemesis III: Prey Harder (1995)
NEMESIS 3: TIME LAPSE aka NEMESIS 3: PREY HARDER
USA. 1995. Director/Screenplay - Albert Pyun, Producers - Tom Karnowski 
& Gary Schmoeller, Photography - George Mooradian, Music - Tony 
Riparetti, Visual Effects - Stargate Films Inc, Special Effects - Guy 
Faria, Nebula and Makeup Effects - David Barton, Makeup Effects - 
Maurine Schlenz, Art Direction - Rob Bowen & Tracy Hennigan. Production 
Company - Imperial Entertainment/Filmwerks/Toga Productions.
Sue Price (Alex), Tim Thomerson (Farnsworth 2), Norbert Weisser (Edson), 
Xavier Declie (Johnny), Sharon Bruneau (Lock), Debbie Muggli (Ditko), 
Ursula Sarclev (Ramie), Earl White (Brick), Karen Studer (Zema)
Plot: Alex comes around in the desert with amnesia. Aided by Farnsworth 
2, who unaware to her is an illusion- projecting cyborg bounty hunter, 
she tries to piece her memories together. Gradually she begins to 
remember her flight from other killer cyborgs and her bid to rescue her 
sister who has returned through time to bring her back to the future.
‘Nemesis 2: Nebula' (1995) was almost entirely unrelated to the first 
`Nemesis' (1993) other than the basic theme of both featuring 
cyborgs/androids trying to overthrow humanity. `Nemesis 3' however 
directly follows on from `Nemesis 2' - the two can be run together 
without a break. Indeed both films appear to have been filmed 
back-to-back - they both share virtually the same credits and some 
actors are credited as being in both films despite having appeared only 
in one.
`Nemesis 2' had almost nothing in the way of plot but nevertheless 
proved quite an efficient sf/action vehicle by  virtue of keeping its 
action moving the entire time. To its credit `Nemesis 3' at least tries 
to be something a little different and take the emphasis away from 
action. There is some (but not much) attempt at developing more plot. 
Unfortunately in the absence of action there isn't too much else to give 
the film any drive. In a rather unwieldly dramatic structure the latter 
half of the film becomes an entire flashback as Price regains her memory 
- and eventually turns into an sf-action chase film all over again. Only 
this time it's not quite as effective as its predecessor - a car chase 
at the climax with digitally blurred dune buggies doesn't work and the 
ending comes annoyingly abruptly as the film sets itself up for the next 
sequel, ‘Nemesis 4: Death Angel'.
On the film's plus side it has some moments of immense strangeness. 
There's an intensely weird opening section with heroine Sue Price waking 
up with complete amnesia and Tim Thomerson turning up as a mercenary 
who, unseen to her, keeps unnervingly slipping back and forward between 
human and a gleaming metal robot skeleton and scanning her with glowing 
green eyes while she is unconscious. One of the more bizarrely 
entertaining elements are two female cyborg mercenaries played by Sharon 
Bruneau and Debbie Muggli who strut through the film like android drag 
queens, making sardonic asides about how the sand is playing hell with 
their circuits and turning to each other and laughing maniacally every 
time they kill someone.


Title
Review for Judge and Jury (1996)
USA. 1996. Director/Story - John Eyres, Screenplay - Eyres, John 
Cianetti & Amanda I. Kirpaul, Producers - Eyres & Gregory Vanger, 
Photography - Bob Paone, Music - Jonathan Flood, Computer Animation - 
C.O.R.E. Digital Pictures, Miniatures - Glacier Entertainment, Special 
Effects - Larry Roberts, Production Design - Ron Mason. Production 
Company - Nu Image/EGM.
Martin Kove (Michael Silvano), David Keith (Joseph Meeker), Paul Koslo 
(Lockhart), Thomas Ian Nichols (Alex Silvano), Kelly Peribe (Roland), 
Laura Johnson (Grace Silvano)
Plot: Wanted killer Joseph Meeker is sent to the electric chair after 
being caught during a liquor store holdup. But Meeker returns from the 
dead, taunting and pursuing Michael Silvano, the former cop who 
apprehended him during the robbery, determined to obtain revenge for 
Silvano's accidental shooting of his girlfriend during the holdup.
`Judge and Jury' is a variant on the 
killers-back-from-the-electric-chair mini-theme that was briefly the 
in-thing around 1989-90 with the likes of `Shocker', `The Horror Show' 
and `The First Power'. All of these were forgettable B-movies and, 
unlike the recent `Fallen' which gave this mini-genre its first 
respectable treatment, `Judge and Jury' is no different to any of these 
others. Its' major difference over its predecessors is its treating the 
exercise as less of a horror film than as a sort of supernatural action 
film with villain David Keith pursuing hero Kove amid car chases and 
lots of explosions, with his principal weapon being a shotgun as opposed 
to any ghostly arsenal of tricks.
The film is made by John Eyres. Eyres has previously made such 
direct-to-video efforts as the `Project: Shadowchaser' films and 
`Monolith' (1994). To say that `Judge and Jury' is Eyres' best film to 
date does not come as any great recommendation - certainly it is never a 
film that rises above the wholly average in any way. Eyres pays even 
less lip service than most action directors to the nominal need for a 
plot to connect action sequences together. The `Project: Shadowchaser' 
films are astounding for the completely minimalistic motivation with 
which the proceedings are conducted. `Judge and Jury' is a marginal 
improvement with Eyres at least paying some attention to character (or 
at least actor-driven scenes) at the beginning - there's a nice scene 
with Keith taunting a priest who reads him the last rites. Although the 
rest of the film is like a single 90 minute chase sequence without any 
stops for plot, character development, or anything. Eyres has improved 
stylistically as a director to a certain extent, with some sequences 
being occasionally evocative rather than the mindless brutalizing action 
of earlier Eyres films like `Project: Shadowchaser II'. (Although there 
is one very contrivedly silly sequence which requires hero Kove to kick 
a goal with a flaming football).
On Eyres' side is David Keith who has never appeared to be having more 
fun in a role than he is having here, playing wildly over the top while 
getting to dress as everything from an Elvis impersonator, a French chef 
(with an accent and mustache that both seem to be competition to be the 
most outrageously false), a biker with a flaming orange hair dye job, in 
drag, a bespectacled academic in a tweed jacket, a clown and a stand-up 
comic.


Title
Review for Trancers II (1991)
TRANCERS II aka FUTURE COP II; TRANCERS II: THE RETURN OF JACK DETH
USA. 1991. Director/Producer - Charles Band, Screenplay - Jackson Barr, 
Story - Band & Barr, Photography - Adolfo Bartoli, Music - Phil Davies & 
Mark Ryder, Special Effects - Players Special Effects (Supervisor - 
Kevin McCarthy), Makeup Effects - Palah Sandling, Production Design - 
Kathleen Coates. Production Company - Full Moon Entertainment.
Tim Thomerson (Jack Deth), Megan Ward (Alice Stillwell), Helen Hunt 
(Lena Deth), Alyson Croft (McNulty), Biff Manard (Hap Ashby), Richard 
Lynch (E.D. Wardo/Edward Whistler), Martine Beswicke (Nurse Trotter), 
Jeffrey Combs (Dr Pyle), Sonny Carl Davis (Rabbit), Art La Fleur 
(Captain McNulty), Telma Hopkins (Commander Raines)
Plot: Captain McNulty is sent back to the present to bring Jack Deth 
back to the future. But Deth, living in the body of his ancestor, has 
married in the present and is unwilling to return. Deth's wife from the 
future, Alice Stillwell, has also been sent back to retrieve him but 
been locked in an asylum. They are reunited, much to the consternation 
of Lena, Deth's wife in the present. But Deth discovers Alice has been 
sent back from a point just prior to her being killed and all that waits 
her upon her return is death. Meanwhile Whistler's brother, in the guise 
of the asylum doctor, has been conducting experiments to turn the 
homeless into trancers.
Charles Band's `Trancers' aka `Futurecop' (1985) was an entertaining 
crossbreed of time travel story and film noir, one that made a virtue 
out of its low budget. As is wont with almost every film that Band and 
his father Albert produce under either their Empire, Full Moon or 
Moonbeam production labels, it was inevitably spun out into a series, 
producing four sequels of which this was the first. The later sequels 
became fairly silly, sending Deth into fantasy worlds and the like, but 
this one proves a modest and competent enough effort. It has a plot that 
is initially so burdened with exposition that it becomes almost 
impossible to follow. Nevertheless the middle of the film sets up an 
intriguing temporal dilemma with Deth reunited with his dead wife and 
the knowledge that to send her back to their own time will be to send 
her back to face her death which is conducted a degree of bathos that 
the first film never achieved. The rest is fairly standard B-budget sf 
escapades generally following in the footsteps of the first film. Tim 
Thomerson gives another highly amusing performance as Deth. He is quite 
capably supported by Helen Hunt (who must surely regard the `Trancers' 
films as an embarrassment now that she has graduated to Academy and Emmy 
Award-winning actress) and Megan Ward, a worthwhile actress surely due 
more recognition, who has been a find of the Band's in films like this, 
`Crash and Burn' (1990) and `Arcade' (1992).


Title
Review for Blues Brothers 2000 (1998)
USA. 1998. Director - John Landis, Screenplay - Landis & Dan Aykroyd, 
Producers - Aykroyd, Landis & Leslie Belzberg, Photography - David 
Herrington, Music - Paul Shaffer, Visual Effects - Available Light Inc 
(Supervisor - John Van Vliet) & Optical Illusions, Special Effects 
Supervisor - Martin Malvoire, Ghost Rider Effects - Steve Johnson's XFX 
Inc, Production Design - Bill Brodie. Production Company - Universal.
Dan Aykroyd (Elwood Blues), John Goodman (Mighty Mack McTeer), J. Evan 
Bonifant (Buster), Joe Morton (Commander Cabel Chamberlain), Nia Peeples 
(Lieutenant Elizondo), Kathleen Freeman (Mother Mary Stigmata), Erykah 
Badu (Queen Mousette), Steve Cropper (Steve `The Colonel' Cropper), 
Donald Dunn (Donald `Duck' Dunn), Murphy Dunne (Murph), Willie Hall 
(Willie `Too Big' Hall), Lou Marini (Blue Lou), Tom Malone (Tom `Bones' 
Malone), Alan Rubin (Mr Fabulous), Matt Murphy (Matt `Guitar' Murphy), 
Aretha Franklin (Mrs Murphy), James Brown (Reverend Cleophus James), 
B.B. King (Malvern Gasperon)
Plot: Elwood Blues is released from jail only to find his brother Jake 
has died in incarceration. Forming a new band along with a bartender, a 
juvenile delinquent, and a police chief whose personality is 
miraculously transformed, he sets out to reunite the remaining members 
of the backup band and play a new gig, a journey which turns into a 
massive cross-country chase as they are pursued by police, Russian mafia 
and right-wing militia groups.
The original `The Blues Brothers' (1980), although disliked by most 
critics at the time of its release, became a cult classic. Borderline 
fantasy at most, its enduring appeal lay somewhere between a great blues 
soundtrack, its anarchically surreal parody of a car chase movie and the 
laconically cool duo of Dan Aykroyd and John Belushi. This sequel, made 
fifteen years on, reunites one half of the title duo, Aykroyd, and 
original director John Landis, who has really failed to make anything 
that has the freshness of `The Blues Brothers' in the time in between. 
And despite replacement by three other characters, the absence of 
Belushi, who of course died of a heroin overdose in an LA motel room in 
1982, hangs over the whole reunion exercise and leaves it with a kind of 
odour of bad judgement. Indeed not unlike the various reunion concerts 
performed in recent years by bands like Kiss, The Eagles and The Sex 
Pistols, the reunion smacks of a cynicism - of former creative forces 
sunken into a flabby and not too becoming middle-age whose get-together 
has been motivated less by a desire to explore new creative directions 
than it has of a desire to milk fans' nostalgia for more money.
And sadly `Blues Brothers 2000' is all of these things. It lacks any 
original ideas. The plot simply rehashes that of the first film - Blues 
Brothers(s) get out of jail and sets about reuniting the band, a quest 
which, as the film progresses, escalates into a surreally overblown 
chase with the police and various terrorist groups. The plot just 
flabbily plods from one incident to the next without, it seems, really 
anything except the musical numbers to hold it together. Indeed the end 
seems to peter out of plot altogether and just anti-climactically ends 
by trying to get as many famous blues legends as possible on stage for a 
massive jam session. This one even lacks the original's deadpan 
anarchism - there's one sequence with about fifty cop cars all piling 
into one another which goes on for about five minutes in a deadeningly 
excessive way and seems merely overblown. This film is a good deal more 
fantastic than its predecessor - miraculous personality changes in the 
midst of a gospel number; the Blues Brothers transformed into 
green-skinned zombies for a calypso number by a voodoo priestess; an 
appearance of the Four Horsemen of the Apocalypse above the stage during 
one performance. Why, one might ask. One might indeed ask but to do so 
might serve as much purpose as asking what the `2000' in the title 
refers to. And the only real answer appears to be the same sense of 
haphazardness with which the rest of the film appears to have been slung 
together.


Title
Review for Expert, The (1994)
USA. 1994. Director - Rick Avery, Screenplay - Max Allan Collins, Story 
- Jill Gatsby, Producers - Nicholas Barbaro & Andrew Garroni, 
Photography - Levie Isaacks, Music - Ashley Irwin, Special Effects 
Supervisor - Ken Estes, Production Design - Clay Callaway. Production 
Company - Axis Films International/David Films.
Jeff Speakman (Jack Lomax), Michael Shaner (Martin Kagan), James Brolin 
(Warden Munsey), Alex Datcher (Dr Alice Barnes), Elizabeth Gracen (Liz 
Pierce), Wolfgang Bodison (Dan Mason), Norm Woodel (Bill Loomis), 
Michelle Nagy (Jenny Lomax), Jim Varney (Snake)
Plot: SWAT team commander Jack Lomax is shattered to find the body of 
his younger sister, having been murdered by psychopath Martin Kagan. 
Lomax's testimony is pivotal in putting Kagan away in Westgate 
Penitentiary under the ultra-hardline Warden Munsey. But after ardently 
liberal assistant governor Alice Barnes is appointed to Westgate and 
looks certain to have Kagan sent to a soft psychiatric rehabilitation 
facility, Lomax decides to take the law into his own hands and break 
into Westgate and kill Kagan.
`The Expert' is a direct-to-video action film that suffers from an 
identity crisis. It seems a peculiarly divided film with the script that 
gives evidence of having wanted to go in one direction and a director 
that has insisted on taking it in different directions. It reminds one a 
good deal of William Friedkin's little-seen serial killer courtroom 
drama `Rampage' (1987) - but having been conflated into an action movie. 
On one hand the film gives the impression of wanting to put a serial 
killer into the courtroom and engage in a discussion (for which read 
demolition) of the various psychiatric vs free will arguments over the 
insanity plea, and to elsewhere similarly engage various associated 
issues like the liberal vs the hardline penal system, the liberal parole 
system, the death penalty and whether child abuse can be offered as 
exculpatory of disturbed adult behaviour. The arguments are clearly 
swayed in favour of the right wing libertarian soapbox with Shaner's 
killer painted as a smiling psychopath who gleefully abuses and twists 
the liberal system to his advantage. The only solution for such a 
contemptuous abuser of the system, the film sees, is vigilante justice - 
for hero Speakman to break into the prison and execute killer Shaner 
himself after Shaner manages to fool the system.
On the other hand however the film doesn't entirely make its arguments 
black-and-white. The lines are blurred far more than say they are in the 
similar `Just Cause'. In the prison, for instance, Alex Datcher's 
recklessly liberal reformer and the sadistically hardline warden (James 
Brolin in a rare villainous role and having the time of his life) are 
both seen as being as bad as one another, with the film sitting in the 
middle and taking neither's side. Similarly the scenes surrounding the 
death sentencing of one of the inmates are portrayed in sympathetic 
terms that  suggest that the victim may well have been sentenced 
innocently.
Unfortunately the film gives the impression of starting with a script 
that wanted to at least raise some issues, if not exactly deal with them 
in a profoundly original or even that literate a way, that has been 
taken over and turned into an action movie. It is only really finally in 
the latter quarter that the film breaks away from being a 
courtroom/prison drama to open out into the action film that it has been 
wanting to be all along. Up until that point the insertion of gratuitous 
action scenes badly jars. Particularly obnoxious are a couple of 
sequences - one where hero Speakman slaughters, rather than disarms, 
every single one of a group of armed hillbillies, and another where he 
beats up and smashes the car of a group of drunks who run him down in 
alley. The unquestioning righteousness of these acts, sanctified solely 
by the fact that they are being conducted by the hero, is repellent. And 
in the end whatever argument the script may have offered up to justify 
its case in having the hero, given no redress for his hurt in the face 
of a frustrating liberal justice system, take justice into his own 
hands, is reduced to the most mindless form of brutal vigilantism.
Nor is it ever made clear who the titular expert is meant to be.


Title
Review for Ai no borei (1978)
Japan/France. 1978. Director/Screenplay - Nagisa Oshima, Based on the 
Novel `Three Generations to Make the Land Fertile: The Earth' by Itoko 
Namura, Photography - Yoshio Miyajima, Music - Toru Takemitsu. 
Production Company - Argos Films/Oshima Productions.
Kazuko Yoshiyuki (Seki), Tatsuya Fuji (Toyoji), Takahiro Tamura 
(Gisaburo Desa), Takuzo Kawatani (Inspector Hotta)
Plot: In a small Japanese village in 1895, a wife Seki has an affair 
with a younger man Toyoji. On the spur of the moment Toyoji shaves her 
pubic hair and decides they must kill her husband Gisaburo so that he 
doesn't find her shaven. Seki gets Gisaburo drunk, they kill him and 
then dump his body down a well and pretend that he has gone away to find 
work. But three years later Gisaburo returns as a ghost, confused and 
lost. The guilt of his return drives Seki and Toyoji to desperation.
This venture into the kaidan eiga (or Japanese ghost story) was highly 
acclaimed on its release in 1978 but was little seen out of limited 
arthouse release and has been entirely forgotten since. The director 
Nagisa Oshima is highly respected in Japanese cinema, having made some 
forty films, of which the best known in the West is probably `Merry 
Christmas, Mr Lawrence' (1983).
Far more so than Western ghost stories ever do, most kaidan eiga centre 
around themes of guilt and retribution. Oshima's twist on the ghost 
story here is that his ghost isn't so much an avenging spirit as it is a  
sad and confused lost soul whose vague stumblings around drive his 
murderers to guilt and anguish. Oshima's presages the ghost's 
appearances with a genuine eeriness - three years after the body has 
been dumped down the well, a friend dreaming of Gisaburo telling her to 
bring him some clean clothes, he is tired of sleeping in the same ones; 
or his daughter dreaming of him telling her he will be home by New Year. 
Locating of the story in a 19th Century rural peasant setting, Oshima 
employs the style of Japanese post-War neo-realist cinema to 
considerable effect. At times the camera little more than sits 
impassively observing scenes of extraordinarily raw effect transpiring 
before it. Throughout the love scenes and the shaving scene Oshima keeps 
focused on Yoshiyuki's face, watching not the passion or the act but the 
pain on her face and the effect has cuttingly real emotional power. The 
actual murder plot occurs with astonishing casualness - Fuji shaves 
Yoshiyuki's pubic hair and then suddenly announces "We must kill him. 
How can we let him see you shaved ?"


Title
Review for Last Lives (1997)
USA. 1996. Director - Worth Keeter, Screenplay - Dan Duling, Producer - 
Steve Beswick, Photography - Kent Wakeford, Music - Greg Edmonson, 
Visual Effects Supervisor - Jaison Stritch, Special Effects Supervisor - 
Greg Hull, Production Design - C. Daniel Hall & David Rawlins. 
Production Company - Promark Entertainment Group/Videal Gmbh/C.E.G. 
Productions.
C. Thomas Howell (Aaron), Jennifer Rubin (Adrienne), Billy Wirth 
(Malakai), Judge Reinhold (Merkhan), David Lenthall (Benza), Robert 
Pente (Khafar), J.C. Quinn (Lieutenant Denny Parks), Richard Fullerton 
(Roma)
Plot: The scientist Merkhan perfects a device which can allow travel 
between parallel worlds and chooses as his test subject the convicted 
murderer Malakai because of Malakai's singular fixation with finding his 
dead wife. Malakai successfully crosses over and momentarily visits the 
bedroom of Adrienne, this world's counterpart of his wife. But shortly 
before his scheduled execution Malakai escapes, crosses over and abducts 
Adrienne from the midst of her wedding ceremony to Aaron. Merkhan 
follows but is fatally wounded in a shootout. Before he dies he gives 
Aaron several armbands that can revive the wearer from the dead that 
allow Aaron to defy death in his pursuit of the ruthless Malakai.
This sf-action hybrid is a fairly silly effort. Its plot setup is a 
blatant steal from `Twelve Monkeys' which was released only the year 
before this was made - in both films a criminal is chosen as a pioneer 
in a temporal experiment because of their fixation on a particular woman 
who they in due course end up abducting. Needless to say `Last Lives' 
does it with considerably less imagination than the excellent `Twelve 
Monkeys' did. As an action film it is competent enough with some 
reasonably exciting car chase sequences. However as a science-fiction 
film it is really quite silly. It is hamstrung by the daft gimmick of 
having the hero armed with a collection of bracelets that can revive him 
from the dead and as a result is filled with a series of quite 
contrivedly absurd sequences which have hero Howell being shot in the 
head, thrown from balconies, crisped in car crashes, and at the climax 
dealing with the villain's goons variously by grabbing electric fences 
as they catch him and blowing himself and they up in a shed filled with 
explosives. As the scientist Judge Reinhold seems awkward and 
embarrassed. Jennifer Rubin, in an badly unbecoming haircut, looks drab 
and neurotic, delivering a performance that  would appear to be under 
the influence of major tranquillisers. The incredibly handsome Billy 
Wirth cuts what at first seems an interestingly romantic villain, 
although this is unfulfilled, and he spends the rest of the time mooning 
over Rubin in a series of telepathic romantic longeurs that do seem to 
go on forever.


Title
Review for Leprechaun 3 (1995)
USA. 1995. Director - Brian Trenchard-Smith, Screenplay - David Dubos, 
Producers - Jeff Geoffray, Walter Josten & Henry Seggerman, Photography 
- David Lewis, Music - Dennis Michael Tenney, Visual Effects - Kim 
Bailey, Mechanical Effects - Frank Ceglia, Makeup Effects - Atlantic 
West Effects (Supervisor - Gabe Bartalos), Production Design - Ken 
Archele. Production Company - Trimark.
Warwick Davis (The Leprechaun), John Gatins (Scott), Lee Armstrong 
(Tammy Larson), Caroline Williams (Loretta), John De Mita (Fazio the 
Great), Michael Callan (Mitch), Marcelo Tubert (Gupta), Tom Drugan 
(Art), Roger Hewlett (Tony)
Plot: The remains of the leprechaun are sold to a Vegas pawnbroker and 
accidentally revived. A shilling from its pot of gold passes through the 
hands of various people in one of the casinos. Its' ability to grant the 
possessor's wish is discovered by accident whereupon it immediately 
becomes sought the greedy and ruthless. But to each the leprechaun gives 
a sadistic death as it fights to get its shilling back.
Brian Trenchard-Smith is an Australian director, the greater part of 
whose output could be best described as hackwork. In between churning 
out episodes for Australian-shot US tv series like `Time Trax' (1993) 
and `Mission: Impossible' (1988), he made a variety of undistinguished 
films such as `Turkey Shoot' aka `Escape 2000' (1983) and `BMX Bandits' 
(1983). However tucked in between this are a couple of quite decent 
small films that show Trenchard-Smith capable of promise - the subtly 
effective children's film `Frog Dreaming' aka `The Quest' (1986) and the 
near-future satire `Dead-End Drive-In' (1986). Following 
Trenchard-Smith's migration to the US in the 1990s, his output has 
consisted mostly of production-line tv movies. But with 1994's amazingly 
silly `Night of the Demons 2', Trenchard-Smith jumped on the post-`Elm 
Street' camp horror bandwagon. This approach was clearly enough to net 
Trenchard-Smith directorship of not only `Leprechaun 3' but also its 
immediate sequel `Leprechaun 4' (1996).
As with the other films in the series, `Leprechaun 3' is a lame attempt 
to spin out another `Elm Street'-styled horror franchise with a boogey 
man despatching an array of victims amid bad puns and cartoonish gore 
set-pieces. The typically gimmicky showcase despatches get pretty silly 
- one victim turned into a human one-arm bandit uncontrollably spilling 
coins out of his mouth; a killer android/mannequin torso electrocuting a 
victim during sex. And in the most amazingly silly effect that one has 
quite seen on screen in some time, Caroline Williams gets her wish for a 
perfect figure which, before being blown up, is transformed into a butt 
and set of breasts so big she is unable to turn around.


Title
Review for Leapin' Leprechauns (1995)
USA. 1995. Director - Ted Nicolaou, Screenplay - Nicolaou & Patrick 
Clifton, Idea - Charles Band, Producers - Oana & Vlad Paunescu, 
Photography - Adolfo Bartoli, Music - Richard Kosinski & William Levine, 
Visual Effects - AlchemyFX (Supervisor - Jim Aupperle), Mechanical 
Effects Supervisor - John `Teenie' Deall, Leprechaun Effects - Mark 
Rappaport, Makeup Effects - Michael S. Deak, Production Design - Radu 
Corciova. Production Company - Moonbeam Entertainment.
Gregory Edward Smith (Mikey Dennehy), Madeleine Potter (Morgan de la 
Fey/Queen Nuala), Godfrey James (King Kevin), Tina Martin (Queen Maeve), 
John Bluthal (Michael Dennehy), Sylvester McCoy (Flynn), James Ellis 
(Patrick)
Plot: Young Mikey Dennehy goes to visit his grandfather in Ireland. 
There they meet their new neighbour, the charming Morgan de la Fey. But 
Morgan is really Nuala, queen of the underworld, and places an 
enchantment on Kevin, king of the leprechauns, that makes him fall 
completely in love with her and addles his wits so that she is able to 
capture all the leprechauns to take as a sacrifice to Finvara, lord of 
the underworld.
Charles Band, either under his Empire Productions banner during the 
1980s or under the Full Moon Entertainment and its' children's films 
subsidiary label Moonbeam Productions during the 1990s, has been one of 
the most prolific producers of B-budget direct-to-video films, having 
produced efforts like the `Ghoulies', the `Puppetmaster', the 
`Trancers', the `Prehysteria!' and the `Subspecies' films to name but a 
handful. One of Band's most regular directors has been Ted Nicolaou, who 
originally began as one of Band's editors. While Nicolaou has been 
responsible for some of the undeniable dross that Band regularly puts 
out - `TerrorVision' (1986) and the disappointing `Subspecies' trilogy - 
Nicolaou has also made several of Band's better films under the Moonbeam 
label. Nicolaou's `Dragonworld' (1994) was one film that had clearly 
been made with a good deal more care and feeling than most of Moonbeam's 
product, and Nicolaou was also responsible for the mind-spinningly 
surreal `Magic in the Mirror' (1996).
Band and Nicolaou's `Leapin' Leprechauns' (1994) was undeniably stolen 
in sizeable part from Disney's minor live-action masterpiece `Darby 
O'Gill and the Little People' (1959). Nevertheless it was a light 
knockabout children's film which derived some entertainment value from 
the comic antics of several invisible, mischievous leprechauns being let 
loose in an average American household. This sequel however is actually 
a better film than its predecessor. The first `Leapin' Leprechauns' 
ended on a surprisingly dark climax (almost stolen direct from `Darby 
O'Gill') with the characters having to battle Finvara, lord of the 
underworld, and racing against the arrival of the dark horse of death. 
That tone has been extended in `Leapin' Leprechauns! 2'. It abandons the 
light and frivolous slapstick tone of the first film and concentrates on 
a much stronger plot involving the witch's attempt to enchant the 
leprechauns and the young kid and his grandfather from the first film. 
It works as a much more vivid story - while it is essentially just a 
children's film, it is conducted with some feeling and depth - and the 
ending on an entrance into the underworld achieves something quite 
mythic and resonant. Madeleine Potter plays with some quite effective 
charms, and is balanced out by a return performance of wry blarney 
likeability from John Bluthal and the endearingly comic blatherings of 
John Godfrey again as Kevin, the leprechaun king. 


Title
Review for Man qing shi da ku xing (1995)
Hong Kong. 1994. Director - Bosco Lam. Production Company - Wong Jing's 
Workshop Ltd.
Plot: After a man is discovered having been given an aphrodisiac so 
strong it caused his penis to explode, his wife and a scholar are 
dragged before a judge, both protesting their innocence, and charged 
with adultery and conspiring to kill the husband. But unknown to them it 
is the judge's own son and the scholar's wife who added the aphrodisiac 
to a medicinal prescription and the judge now conspires to frame and 
torture the two innocents into confession.
The title may give the mistaken impression that this is either a film 
about sadomasochism or a study in human degradation along the lines of 
`Salo or 120 Days of Sodom'. But in fact it is neither - what it is is a 
rather funny Hong Kong sex comedy, along the lines of the recent body of 
films that popped up following the success of `Sex and Zen' (1991). Hong 
Kong sex comedies are, like all Hong Kong films, nothing at all like 
their Western counterparts. They show as much upfront as do any of the 
likes of `Basic Instinct' or `91/2 Weeks' but there is a remarkable lack 
of either the seriousness or underlying puritanical guilt that lurks 
beneath most Western erotic films. Hong Kong sex films are able to 
balance onscreen erotic set-pieces and comedy with an effortlessness 
that Western directors have so far failed to find. The (pardon the pun) 
climax of the film here involves the heroine masturbating her husband's 
ankle-length member to a deadly ejaculation that showers her in blood 
and kills him, a set-piece that manages to be both hysterically funny 
and quite tender at the same time. The film is much ruder and cruder 
than the delightful `Sex and Zen' was but when it is funny it is very 
funny. There is a highly amusing sequence parodying the likes of `The 
Tai Chi Master' and the `A Chinese Ghost Story' and `Swordsman' films 
which routinely have martial arts combatants flying through the air and 
bouncing of trees, with a married couple whose connubial couplings 
competitively take place in mid-air, bouncing off trees and adapting 
impossible martial maneuvers. Even the scenes of torture in the film 
manage to be more comic and disarming than they do disturbing.
Screening at the Christchurch 1998 Incredibly Strange Film Festival
Reviewed by Richard Scheib


Title
Review for Fallen (1998)
USA. 1998. Director - Gregory Hoblit, Screenplay - Nicholas Kazan, 
Producers - Charles Roven & Dawn Steel, Photography - Newton Thomas 
Sigel, Music - Tan Dun, Visual Effects - Peerless Camera Co (Supervisor 
- Kent Houston), Special Effects Supervisor - James Fredburg, Production 
Design - Terence Marsh. Production Company - Atlas Entertainment.
Denzel Washington (Detective John Hobbes), John Goodman (Jonesy), Embeth 
Davidtz (Greta Milano), Donald Sutherland (Lieutenant Stanton), Elias 
Koteas (Edgar Reese), Michael J. Pagan (Sam Hobbes), Gabriel Casseus 
(Art Hobbes), James Gandolfini (Lou), Robert Joy (Charles Olham)
Plot: Detective John Hobbes sees serial killer Edgar Reese to the gas 
chamber but not long after confronts a baffling series of murders which 
appear to also be being conducted by Reese. As Hobbes investigates it 
appears he is not dealing with a mere mortal but in fact a demon that is 
capable of passing between and possessing bodies simply by touch and 
that the demon has returned to taunt him and destroy his life.
Going in to see `Fallen', one doesn't really expect it to be much at 
all. The plot seems merely a warmed-over version of the mini-vogue of 
executed serial killers come back from the electric chair films that 
were briefly the in-thing around about 1988-9 - the likes of `Shocker', 
`The Horror Show' aka `House III', `The First Power', `Prison' and 
`Berserker' - only revamped with an A-budget. But in virtually no time 
at all `Fallen' proves that simply through good writing an old familiar 
plot can be made to work wonders once again. And the result is a 
surprisingly good film.
The film is made by Gregory Hoblit, previously a tv director who won 
Emmy Awards for his work on shows like `Hill St Blues' and `LA Law' and 
made the jump to feature films with the impressive 1996 courtroom drama 
`Primal Fear'. There is a surprising similarity of themes between 
`Primal Fear' and `Fallen' - `Primal Fear' you could say is a film about 
a killer who has one body but several personalities; `Fallen' on the 
other hand you could say is about a killer who has one personality but 
several bodies. Hoblit does a rather good job. The script is rather 
handicapped in that its central idea - that of a demon that can pass 
between bodies by touch - has been given away by the publicity machine. 
Nevertheless in spite of the fact that owing to this one knows what is 
going on for a good half-hour before the detective hero clicks on, both 
Hoblit and the script unfold these revelations with a high degree of 
tension and suspense. Hoblit generates some marvellous scenes with the 
demon passing from body to body amongst people at the police station and 
in the street, all the while taunting the hero. And there is beautifully 
written twist ending - the first one has ever seen which manages to so 
twist first-person voiceover completely on its head.
The film kept reminding of `Se7en' which seems to have been a strong 
influence. Both employ the same densely textural washed-out lighting 
scheme. And both are very similar films - about detectives who are 
confronting a Biblical menace (`Fallen' an actual demon, `Se7en' a 
serial killer using the motif of the Seven Deadly Sins) wherein the 
Biblically Apocalyptic is raised into a looming millenarian metaphor for 
moral social decay. Although where `Se7en''s moral metaphors were 
dazzlingly literary, `Fallen''s seem stuck down in the idiom of B horror 
movies. Both films also contain one really grisly scene where the film 
seems to hang still for a moment and toy with the audience as to whether 
it is really going to do the unthinkable and kill off one of the 
detective hero's loved one's. Neveretheless for its ability to move with 
tense and exciting grace and juggle a plot that keeps catching one 
perpetually unawares, `Fallen' is a film that is well above average and 
recommended.


Title
Review for Butcher Boy, The (1997)
Ireland/USA. 1997. Director - Neil Jordan, Screenplay - Jordan & Patrick 
McCabe, Based on the Novel by McCabe, Producers - Redmond Morris & 
Stephen Woolley, Photography - Adrian Biddle, Music - Elliot Goldenthal, 
Visual Effects - Peerless Camera Co (Supervisor - Kent Houston), Special 
Effects - Joss Williams, Prosthetics - Animated Extras, Production 
Design - Anthony Pratt. Production Company - Butcher Boy Films/Geffen 
Pictures.
Eamonn Owens (Francie Brady), Alan Boyle (Joe Purcell), Stephen Rea 
(Benny Brady/Adult Francie), Fiona Shaw (Mrs Nugent), Brendan Gleeson 
(Father Bubbles), Milo O'Shea (Father Sullivan), Aisling O'Sullivan 
(Annie Brady), Andrew Fullerton (Philip Nugent), Sinead O'Connor (Our 
Lady)
Plot: Growing up in Ireland in the early 1960s, young Francie Brady 
becomes increasingly troubled and unstable after his mother commits 
suicide and he is left to be raised by his alcoholic father. Thrown into 
a Catholic boarding school, he has visions of the Virgin Mary appearing 
to him. He sees as the focus of his trouble, the self-important town 
socialite Mrs Nugent who lures his best friend Joe away and turns him 
against Francie, the alienation of which causes Francie to erupt into 
violence.
With `The Butcher Boy' Neil Jordan, the highly acclaimed director of the 
likes of `The Crying Game', `Mona Lisa' and `Michael Collins', dives 
into tackling Patrick McCabe's celebrated novel about disturbed youth. 
Jordan and McCabe tackle some difficult themes - the film is a 
unsettling portrait of a child in an abusive home who becomes 
increasingly alienated, socially ostracized and eventually locked in an 
asylum, before the film climaxes in a frightening explosion of violence. 
But despite the gravity of its thematic matter, `The Butcher Boy' rather 
contrarily manages to be a remarkably cheerful film. Jordan directs with 
an enormous degree of vibrance and colour and is abetted to a tremendous 
extent by a wonderfully charismatic and aggressive performance from 
Eamonn Owens in the central role.
Indeed it is possibly the most cheerful film ever made about abusive 
childhoods, alienation, sexual abuse, madness and murder. Just consider 
the point-of-view it holds which is entirely sympathetically balanced 
toward the boy, seeking to explain the mechanisms that make the 
climactic murder a logical act. If this had been a film made in America 
one cannot help but think it would have been entirely balanced toward 
the opposite extreme. The conservative social values the character takes 
issue with would be unquestioningly accepted as a norm and there would 
have been a wholly unsympathetic and condemnatory attitude toward the 
boy's actions. The scene, which is presented here with considerable 
glee, wherein Owens defecates on the carpet of the self-important Mrs 
Nugent would have been painted in disgusted tones of the highest moral 
outrage. And the climactic murder would surely be seen in tones of 
stunned shock, asking how such could possibly happen. Indeed an American 
version would surely have emerged as something akin to `The Good Son' or 
the innately evil child seen at the start of `Halloween'. Instead Jordan 
manages the difficult job of conducting the entire film sympathetically 
- few audiences realize just to what a sociopathic extreme Jordan does 
end up taking them by making them laugh along with and enjoy the film. 
The whole film seems fired up by the sheer perversity of going well 
beyond acceptable social norms. With considerably iconoclastic delight 
Jordan casts singer Sinead O'Connor, notorious for ripping up pictures 
of the Pope on tv, as the Virgin Mary - and predictably O'Connor's 
second appearance as the Virgin is accompanied by the query "So what the 
fuck's going on here ?"
It's not Jordan best film but is an immensely enjoyable one 
nevertheless. And it should be celebrated for the simple fact of being 
about the first film in the new renaissance of Irish cinema over the 
last couple of years to not be centered around sectarian violence.
Reviewed at the 1998 Wellington International Film Festival
Copyright Richard Scheib 1998


Title
Review for Ape (1976)
South Korea. 1976. Director - Paul Leder, Screenplay - Paul & Reuben A. 
Leder, Producers - Paul Leder & K.M. Yeung, Photography - Tony Francis & 
Daniel L. Symmes, Music - Bruce Mac Rae, Special Effects - Park Kwang 
Nam, Production Design - Lee Bong Sun. Production Company - Lee Ming 
Film Co.
Rod Arrants (Tom Rose), Joanna De Verona (Marilyn Baker), Alex Nicol 
(Colonel Davis), Francis Lee (Captain Kim), Jerry Harke (Lieutenant 
Smith), Alice Woo (Mrs Kim)
Plot: A giant ape escapes as it is being shipped back to Disneyland and 
rampages across the South Korean countryside causing mass destruction 
and snatching up a beautiful American actress.
This South Korean production, originally released as `A.P.E.', was made 
the same year as the Dino de Laurentiis remake of `King Kong'. It was 
clearly hoping to exploit some of the expected success of `King Kong' - 
that is before `King Kong' premiered and became a big heap of ape dung 
with anybody who had seen the original and audiences alike. The poster 
advertized itself with the byline "not to be confused with the original 
`King Kong'' - clearly the distributor had the delusion that some 
audiences may well have confused the two - and it is indeed quite 
possible, for `Gorilla' blatantly steals from `King Kong' even down to 
having the giant ape abducting a blonde actress.
But in all other regards there is extremely little likelihood audiences 
might have confused `Gorilla' and `King Kong' - `King Kong' is one of 
the greatest of all monster movies; `Gorilla' is laughable in every 
respect. The effects work is shockingly bad. The scenes of the ape 
destroying a ridiculously unconvincing model ship and then wrestling 
with a rubber shark at the start of the film are a clear indication of 
what is to come. And the scenes that follow with the ape rampaging 
through and smashing obvious plywood houses and, in a couple of really 
hysterically unconvincing model shots, stepping over a toy cow and 
batting a hanglider and pilot on an visible wire, produce gales of 
laughter in their ineptitude. One can visibly see the eyeholes that have 
been made in the mask for the actor inside. Scenes of destruction go on 
and on forever without even the slightest degree of directorial 
conviction of dramatic interest being created, due to the fact that the 
film eschews almost any type of optical shots whatsoever - we never see 
any shots of the ape and people together in the same frame. Although the 
reason for this could well be that the three optical shots we do see 
which patch the ape over stock background shots of Seoul are some of the 
worst travelling matte shots in the history of special effects. The ape 
suit is completely immobile in expression and one can clearly see the 
eyeholes that have been made in the mask for the actor inside. Stock 
footage of military vehicles on manoeuvres, which are meant to stand in 
for the massed military attack against the ape, are repeated several 
times throughout.
The film was originally made in 3D but has only been seen flat in the 
West. Thus there are an inordinate number of shots with extras firing 
burning spears at the camera, soldiers rushing into the camera to pose 
and shoot, and the ape throwing the same rock on a wire at the camera.
There is the odd occasionally amusing line. "Let's see him dance for his 
organ grinder now," says the general as the military shoot the ape down. 
And the hero's end epithet for the ape - "He was too big for a small 
world like ours" - raises unintentional laughter. Alex Nicol at least 
gives an amusingly hard-headed performance as the American colonel (and 
should get some type of award for having to yell an entire performance 
into a telephone - even when he is out on field maneuvers). But this is 
really an appallingly bad film in every regard - the most amusing thing 
about it was its 1983 retitling `The Attack of the Giant Horny Gorilla'.
Screening at the Christchurch 1998 Incredibly Strange Film Festival
Reviewed by Richard Scheib


Title
Review for Clay Pigeons (1998)
USA. 1998. Director - David Dobkin, Screenplay - Matt Healy, Producers - 
Ridley Scott & Chris Zarpas, Photography - Eric Edwards, Music - John 
Lurie, Music Supervisors - Michelle Kuznetsky & May Ramos, Special 
Effects - Ultimate Effects (Supervisor - David Wayne), Makeup Effects - 
Kate Morgan Biscoe, Dead Body Effects - Image Animation, Production 
Design - Clark Hunter. Production Company - Scott Free/Polygram Filmed 
Entertainment/Intermedia Films.
Joaquin Phoenix (Clay), Vince Vaughn (Lester Long), Janeane Garofalo 
(Agent Dale Shelby), Georgina Cates (Amanda), Scott Wilson (Sheriff Dan 
Moody), Phil Morris (Agent Renard), Vince Vieluf (Deputy Barney), 
Gregory Sporleder (Earl), Nikki Allyn (Gloria Collins)
Plot: In a small Montana town Clay's best friend Earl shoots himself 
after he discovers that Clay has been having an affair with his wife 
Amanda and deliberately does so to make it appear that Clay shot him. 
Clay is forced to cover up the suicide by faking an accident. However 
the calculating Amanda still wants Clay and continues to harass him to 
have sex with her. She then shoots a girl Clay goes out with, forcing 
him to dispose of that body in the lake. But then while Clay and his new 
friend Lester Long are fishing on the lake, the body turns up - only 
when Clay reports it to the police, it turns out to be a different body. 
Clay realizes that Lester is really a serial killer who has been 
slaughtering women in the area. But as the FBI arrive to investigate, 
the evidence begins to point to Clay as the killer.
The surprise about this essentially indie production is that it is 
produced by such usually commercially-minded directors as brothers 
Ridley and Tony Scott. The film starts in rather well with a plot filled 
with some deliciously black twists and turns - Sporleder shooting 
himself in order to leave the blame on Phoenix; Cates's blackmailing 
bitcheries and her shock shooting of Allyn during sex; and then a 
marvellously about-face twist as Phoenix and Vaughn drag the body out of 
the lake - only for Phoenix to find it is the wrong body. But after such 
a promising buildup the film somehow thereafter loses it all. The latter 
half of the film falls into something dreadfully predictable - the 
familiar device of the wrong man finding himself framed for the crimes 
and the psycho continuing to toy with him. Despite its desire to achieve 
an indie attitude there is something dreadfully predictable about the 
way the film plays itself out. Indeed the only real surprise it holds in 
store in its latter half is its failure to throw any twists on plot 
denouements one can see coming off way in advance.
What does however hold it together in the second half is its cast. 
Joaquin Phoenix gives an okay central performance, although he is 
essentially typecast in the same role he played in 'To Die For' (1995) - 
that of the not-terribly intellectually endowed smalltown yokel who is 
enwrapped in a murder plot and manipulated by a scheming bitch. Vince 
Vaughn though is the one having all the fun. Vaughn can present 
considerable charms on screen - most notably in 'Swingers' (1996) - and 
the twist here is that Vaughn remains the most charismatic character on 
screen while also playing a complete psychopath. And, although the 
beaming smile and the cowboy pose gets somewhat overplayed, it is fun to 
watch the charm being ployed and working on people. The film also has 
Janeane Garofalo who is, in this author's estimation, one of the most 
intelligent and underrated actresses around at the moment. This gives 
her a part that lifts her free of the typecasting she has acquired of 
late in light romantic comedies ever since her breakthrough in 'The 
Truth About Cats and Dogs' (1996). Her FBI agent holds attention with 
her cool deliberated composure and detached patience. (There is 
considerable play in the film between her FBI training and the town's 
more laidback ways). There is a fabulous encounter between she and 
Vaughn in a bar where she cynically deflates his persistent attempts to 
charm her but then when he turns away to the girl he was waiting to 
meet, we momentarily see her annoyance and get a glimpse of just how 
much she was starting to fall for his line. It's a marvellous piece of 
momentary character insight on director Dobkin's part.


Title
Review for Saving Grace (1998/III)
New Zealand. 1998. Director - Costa Botes, Screenplay/Based on the Play 
by Duncan Sarkies, Producer - Larry Parr, Photography - Sean O'Donnell, 
Music - David Donaldson, Steve Roche & Janet Roddick, Digital 
Effects/Prosthetics - WETA (Digital Effects Supervisor - Wayne Stables, 
Prosthetics Supervisors - Michael Asquith & Richard Taylor), Makeup - 
Erin Kelly, Art Direction - Chris Elliott & Rob Otterside. Production 
Company - Kahukura Productions/New Zealand Film Commission.
Kirsty Hamilton (Grace Cuthbertson), Jim Moriarty (Gerald Hutchinson)
Plot: Grace Cuthberston, a homeless and unemployed teen, meets the 
mysterious Gerald Hutchinson at a Wellington welfare office. He keeps 
following her and she cautiously accepts his invitation to come and stay 
and the two become friends and eventually lovers. But then he makes the 
claim that he is Jesus Christ. She has difficulty deciding whether he is 
simply crazy or whether his claim and apparent manifestation of miracles 
are genuine.
Costa Botes will be known to many New Zealanders as film critic at 
Wellington's morning newspaper The Dominion. Botes, of course, made his 
directorial debut as co-director (with Peter Jackson) of the hilarious 
mockumentary `Forgotten Silver' that had half the nation swallowing its 
story in 1995.
`Saving Grace' is Botes's first solo feature. Here Botes adapts Duncan 
Sarkies' two-person play. Behind the play and film lurks the intriguing 
question "What would happen if Jesus Christ returned today ?" 
Unfortunately it is a question that the film readily lacks a answer for 
and the idea heads off instead into a drama about belief and doubt. 
Certainly `Saving Grace' is not a poor film. Botes does a fine job of 
expanding the two-person play out beyond the confines of the stage while 
still retaining it as a drama that uses only two actors. It is well 
edited and very nicely photographed, particularly during the end scenes. 
And the two actors, Kirsty Hamilton and Jim Moriarty, both, despite the 
habits of Kiwi accents to sound somewhat flat on screen at times, both 
work off one another well and give good performances.
It's just that when it comes to issues of theology the film seems stuck 
not much above the Sunday School level. Every time Moriarty launches 
into talking about being Jesus or taking Grace to meet his Father and so 
forth you feel like having to stifle giggles at the silliness of it - 
his opening line of dialogue is a flat deadpan "The meek shall inherit 
the Earth" which really makes you wonder whether you are meant to take 
it seriously or laugh. Both Botes and Sarkies are admitted atheists 
(something which shouldn't necessarily be a problem for the film) but 
their grand mistake is to try and make a film about Jesus Christ with 
only a vague idea of what Christianity is about. Jesus of The Bible 
appears as someone with a very certain mission - he had charisma, he was 
a rabble-rouser, someone who challenged authority and cut through 
hypocrisy; whereas The Christ in the film is infected with a case of 
postmodern angst and seems to have as many clues as to what he is meant 
to on about as anyone else does. This Jesus does miracles, walks on 
water, raises the dead (and a new one that isn't in The Bible - he 
tosses coins so they land on their edge) and so on but they just seem 
magic tricks that come without any sense of purpose. And even though 
this Christ says he doesn't do tricks they seem to be the only things he 
has up his sleeve - there should be more to a film about Jesus Christ 
than it having to be `Portrait of Jesus as Amateur Magician'. Similarly 
the Christ in the film is nailed to a cross but again it seems simply 
because that is what is meant to happen to Jesus. The script seems to 
lack any greater understanding of the symbolic meaning of what 
crucifixion represents for Christians - about redeeming the world 
through sacrifice and so on.
The film seems to miss its dramatic cues. In the most vivid scene during 
a screaming match over Gerald's claims, Grace slashes her wrists and 
Gerald (the Christ character) heals her. But the scene tapers off. It 
should have been a fundamental character breakthrough for Grace but 
there is no accompanying sense of dramatic realization. A far more 
worthwhile script would have then had Gerald turn to her and say 
something like "You see, you do believe. You must have believed to know 
that I would heal you." There are occasional moments when the film 
interpolates the idea of a Christ for modern times with amusement - 
Grace opening cupboards and the fridge to find them filled with loaves 
and fishes; Christ trying to spread his message on radio talkback and by 
setting up an website. Admittedly the film vies (although with stumbling 
uncertainty) between asking us to believe that Gerald is really Christ 
or whether this is all inside Grace's imagination - and there is a 
reasonable ending that leaves the whole issue hanging ambiguously for 
the audience to decide. But for all that it matters to the film that 
Gerald is Jesus Christ, it could be that we are being asked to believe 
that he is an alien, a pixie or a magician. A story about Christianity 
should be a tale about salvation and moral redemption, but instead all 
we have is a film that sits on a fence and plays the old is it real or 
is it in her mind game. A far better ambiguous messiah film is 1987's 
`Man Facing Southeast', a film which juggled all of these themes with 
considerable intelligence and flair. 
Reviewed at the Wellington 1998 International Film Festival
Copyright 1998 Richard Scheib


Title
Review for Zone Troopers (1986)
USA. 1986. Director - Danny Bilson, Screenplay - Bilson & Paul De Meo, 
Producer -De Meo , Photography - Mac Ahlberg, Music - Richard Band, 
Effects Animation - Tony Alderson, Makeup Effects - Magical Media 
Industries (Supervisor - John Carl Buechler), Production Design - 
Phillip Dean Foreman. Production Company - Empire Productions/Altar 
Productions.
Tim Thomerson (Sergeant Stone), Biff Manard (Charley Dolan), Art La 
Fleur (Corporal George `Mittens' Mittinsky), Timothy Van Patten (Joey 
Verona), William Paulson (The Alien), Peter Boom (Colonel Manheim)
Plot: Three GI's and a war correspondent, trapped behind Nazi lines 
during World War II, come upon a crashed spaceship that has been 
discovered by the German military. They make an escape from the Nazi 
camp with an alien visitor and run for their lives against the pursuing 
Nazi forces.
Before going onto mainstream success with the scripts for films like 
`Rocketeer' (1991) and creating tv series like `The Flash' (1990-1), 
`Viper' (1994-5, 1996- ) and `The Sentinel' (1996- ), the 
writing-sometimes directing team of Danny Bilson and Paul De Meo had an 
enterprising career in B-movies. They wrote a couple of the more 
out-and-out enjoyable films made by Charles and Albert Band's Empire 
Productions in the mid 1980s - `Trancers' aka ‘Futurecop' (1985) and 
`Eliminators' (1986) - before debuting with this delightful effort.
Throughout all of Bilson and De Meo's films and tv series runs an 
enthusiasm for comic-books and sf fandom - the end credits here for 
instance are shown across mockups of pulp sf magazine covers. In `Zone 
Troopers' Bilson and De Meo make a splendid homage to WWII GI combat 
movies. The dialogue all comes with a delightful cod, cornball sincerity 
and the characters are deliberately cast as four-square stereotypes - 
the hardbitten, invincible, seemingly divinely protected sergeant, the 
wet-behind-the-ears enthusiastic kid - that could have stepped right out 
of the pages of a `Sergeant Rock' or `Commando' comic. Although it is 
all deliberated through a knowing sense of modern irony. In one amusing 
throwaway gag Tim Thomerson comes around and swings a punch, hitting an 
indistinctly-seen Nazi whereupon Biff Manard is given to wryly note 
"It's not everyone that gets to deck Adolf Hitler". Bilson and De Meo 
make excellent use of Empire's typically low budget. If the film didn't 
revel so much in being a B-movie, it could pass for a far better 
budgeted production. Even John Carl Buechler's usually cheap-looking 
creature effects seem quite serviceable for once. Bilson and De Meo milk 
the scenes with the GI's trying to find out what the alien eats 
(eventually finding it will only eat their cigarettes) or it manifesting 
their desires with an appealing sense of humour. The end credits quite 
charmingly announce: "Buy War Bonds - Available in the Lobby."


Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
USA/Australia. 1998. Director/Story - Alex Proyas, Screenplay - Proyas, 
Lem Dobbs & David S. Goyer, Producers - Goyer & Andrew Mason, 
Photography - Dariusz Wolski, Music - Trevor Jones, Visual Effects - 
Mason, Mara Bryan & Arthur Windus, Digital Visual Effects - DFilm 
Services, Sydney, Model/Miniature Supervisor - Tom Davies, Special 
Effects Supervisor - Tad Price, Prosthetics - Bob McCarron, Production 
Design - George Liddle & Patrick Tatopoulos. Production Company - 
Mystery Clock/Dark City Productions/New Line Cinema.
Rufus Sewell (John Murdoch), Kiefer Sutherland (Dr Daniel Poe Schreber), 
William Hurt (Inspector Frank Bumstead), Jennifer Connelly (Emma 
Murdoch/Anna), Ian Richardson (Mr Book), Richard O'Brien (Mr Hand), John 
Bluthal (Karl Harris), Bruce Spence (Mr Wall), Colin Friels (Detective 
Walenski), Melissa George (May)
Plot: In a mysterious city where the sunlight never shines, John Murdoch 
wakes in a hotel room with no memory of who he is. He is pursued by 
police who suspect that he is responsible for a series of  killings of  
prostitutes; a creepy doctor who insists that he is insane; and 
mysterious aliens in black coats and fedoras who place the entire city 
to sleep on the stroke of midnight while they manipulate its fundamental 
structure. However Murdoch finds he is the only person who can not be 
made to sleep by the aliens and that he shares some of their 
reality-manipulating abilities. In his efforts to understand the 
situation, he comes to discover that the entire city is a vast 
laboratory being used in experiments by the aliens to reorder and 
transplant people's memories in an attempt to penetrate the secret of 
the human soul.
Forget about what Variety and a number of the other trained-monkey 
mainstream reviewers have said about 'Dark City' being confusing and 
hard to follow. I can say without any hesitation that this is one of the 
most conceptually audacious and best sf films I have seen in the last 
few years.
It is the second film of Alex Proyas, who made a striking debut with the 
darkly driven and nihilistic 'The Crow' in 1994. The film is clearly a 
very personal project of Proyas's - he also had a strong hand in the 
script - and marks him as one of the directors most worth keeping an eye 
on in future. It is a film that eludes any easy pigeonholing. It 
seemingly takes place in a world of self-conscious artifice that 
suggests a collision between 'Brazil' and 'The Maltese Falcon'. Here 
Proyas deliberately evokes film noir - everyone dresses in trench coats 
and hats, the women come across as slinky vamps, the cars are all period 
and the technology has a striking 1940s retro look. (The city was built 
entirely stagebound inside Australia's Movie World studios). But there 
is also a dystopian feel to it too - there are times the film is 
extraordinarily threatening -  a visit to a cafe where each item of food 
sits in a compartment of its own in a backlit glass case is striking. 
Proyas shoots it all in a beautiful, virtually monochrome lighting 
scheme that renders the city as permanent night-time - one where the 
recurrent vision of a sunlit, palm-shaded beach (even when it is 
revealed as only a faded mural) becomes an achingly palpable 
representation of all hope.
Of course in this noir world everything is far from normal. In an almost 
classical setup the hero wakes in a hotel room with complete amnesia and 
to find himself on the run from the police as a suspected killer. But 
then in the first of the film's wild spins finds he is immune to (and 
maybe even one of) a group of bald aliens beneath the city who on the 
stroke of midnight each night cause the populace to fall asleep while 
they rearrange the spatial geometry and the very fabric of reality 
within the city. After several wild (but completely logical) twists the 
hero makes a classical conceptual breakthrough to discover that the city 
is an experiment set up by the aliens to determine the nature of the 
human soul by manipulating and transplanting people's memories. One of 
the most emotionally powerful scenes in the film comes when he tries to 
explain to his wife that the memories of their marriage are entirely 
false and were only implanted the previous night, only to have her 
tearfully protest "But they can't be - I love you." An extraordinary 
film.


Title
Review for Daddy's Girl (1996)
Canada. 1996. Director - Martin Kitrosser, Screenplay - Steve Pesce, 
Producers - Richard Brandes & Pierre David, Photography - M. David 
Mullen, Music - Parmer Fuller, Production Design - Brian McCabe. 
Production Company - Image Organization/Ventana Productions.
Gabrielle Boni (Jody Mitchell), William Katt (Don Mitchell), Michele 
Greene (Barbara Mitchell), Roxana Zal (Karen Connors), Peggy McCay 
(Grandmother Jacqueline Jones), Mimi Craven (Rachel Landers), Ruth 
Manning (Victoria Hemp), Whip Hubley (Mark Springer), Lindsay Ridgeway 
(Claire Landers), Madison Mason (William Tucker)
Plot: Young Jody Mitchell clings to the life of happiness offered by her 
adopted parents. She kills her school principal who threatens to send 
Jody away to another school. And when her step-parents start arguing 
over her mother Barbara's having to financially support her father Don 
as he tries to fulfil his dream of designing toys and people start 
advising her to leave him, Jody kills again to protect her perfect 
family.
This is one of a series of psycho-thrillers produced by Canada's Pierre 
David. David made his name with a series of thoroughly dreary sequels to 
David Cronenberg's `Scanners' and has since put out such (usually 
direct-to-video) releases as `Stalked' (1994), `The Paperboy' (1994), 
`The Secretary' (1994), `The Nurse' (1995), `The Dentist' (1996), `Man 
of Her Dreams' (1996) and `Cupid' (1997). All of these shuffle around 
the themes and basic formulas patented by much more successful thrillers 
like `Fatal Attraction', `The Stepfather' and `The Good Son'. 
Unfortunately David's films are all made to a plodding predictability of 
script and direction, seemingly irrespective of who is behind the 
camera. Each set-up is telegraphed well in advance in a way that 
effectively robs them of any suspense. `Daddy's Girl' is as 
formulaically routine as the rest of David's films. Young Gabrielle Boni 
in striking fire-red hair does manage to conjure up an effective 
nastiness on screen.


Title
Review for Prophecy, The (1995)
USA. 1995. Director/Screenplay - Gregory Widen, Producer - Joel Soisson, 
Photography - Richard Clabaugh & Bruce Douglas Johnson, Music - David C. 
Williams, Cave Sequence Visual Effects Supervisor - Johnson, Enemy Ghost 
Sequence - Todd Masters Co (Digital Supervisor - Scott Coulter), Angel 
Effects/Mesa Mattes - Effects Associates Inc (Supervisor - Jim 
Danforth), Additional Digital Effects - Available Light (Supervisor - 
Laurel Klick), Digital Magic Co & Neo Digital (Supervisor - Phillip 
Giles), Special Effects Supervisor - Jor Vankline, Makeup Effects - 
Patton EFX (Supervisor - Scott Patton), Production Design - Clark 
Hunter. Production Company - First Look Pictures/Neo Motion Pictures.
Christopher Walken (Gabriel), Elias Koteas (Thomas Dagget), Virginia 
Madsen (Katherine Henley), Eric Stoltz (Simon), Viggo Mortensen 
(Lucifer), Moriah Shining Dove Snyder (Mary), Adam Goldberg (Jerry), 
Amanda Plummer (Rachael)
Plot: Investigating a mysterious eyeless, hermaphroditic dead body 
Thomas Dagget, a former priest who has lost his faith and is now working 
as a detective, is thrust into the midst of an earthly war between 
angels. A fallen angel Gabriel is trying to create a new Heaven and 
seeks the soul of a Korean War colonel accused of human sacrifice. The 
soul has been transplanted into the body of a young Indian girl for 
protection and Thomas must fight to protect her as Gabriel comes to 
collect her.
`The Prophecy' is the directorial debut of Gregory Widen, previously a 
scriptwriter on the likes of `Highlander' and `Backdraft'. (Well 
technically Widen made his debut on an episode of `Tales from the Crypt' 
but this is his feature debut). And here Widen makes an impressively 
literate venture into the theme of angels. When one thinks about angels 
on film what invariably comes to mind is the likes of Roma Downey in 
`Touched by an Angel' or Michael Landon in `Highway to Heaven' and their 
accompanying assortment of insipidly preachy feelgood family sentiments. 
Perhaps at its best the feelgood angel treatment reaches the heights of 
an `It's a Wonderful Life' or ventures off into the beatific meditations 
of Wim Wenders `Wings of Desire' and `Faraway ! So Close', but most 
angel films seem trapped somewhere between Pollyanna fantasies and being 
all-but-in-name Baptist recruiting commercials. Amidst this `The 
Prophecy' is welcome as the first film to venture into the angelic 
fantasy by way of a full, heady flight of Biblical mythology and to 
eschew the weepy positive thinking sentiments in favour of a grand Old 
Testament fire and thunder. Indeed the only other filmic effort to so 
venture into this take on angelic mythology is an impressive recent 
episode of `The X Files', `All Souls'.
`The Prophecy' is equally rare for being a horror film that is conducted 
not with gooey meltdown effects and campy one-liners but with literacy 
and intelligence. (Which may well explain why it was not a major 
box-office success). It is certainly a film that asks patience of an 
audience - it is a good half-hour into the film before the often 
wilfully cryptic plot strands begin to coalesce and one begins to 
properly understand what is going on. And even when they have done so, 
one feels, one or two strands are left unwound - I, for instance, was 
never sure coming away from the film what Gabriel needed the colonel's 
soul for. But Widen gives his Gabriel and Lucifer some beautifully 
ornate pieces of dialogue: "You know how you got that dent in your top 
lip ?" Gabriel taunts hero Koteas. "Way back, before you were born, I 
put my finger there and said `shhhh'." Equally appealing are Widen's 
playfully amusing images of angels in the modern world - Gabriel 
resurrecting the dead because he hasn't learnt how to drive a car or the 
delightful throwaway gag with Gabriel sitting amongst a group of school 
children, getting them try out his trumpet. If the film is to be faulted 
it is that its medium range budget never quite allows Widen to direct 
his angelic war with the grandiose scope it keeps seeming to want to 
break out into, but on the other hand this also does allow him to keep 
the story contained at a more cerebral rather than physical level.
As Gabriel, Christopher Walken has quite the most fun he appears to have 
had in a role in some years. The role is perfectly suited to Walken and 
both he and Widen craft the part with just the right balance of 
extravagant playing to the gallery and wry, ironic humour. Also very 
good is Viggo Mortensen as Lucifer. Mortensen, who is usually cast as 
blue collar working men and who always seems to have eluded the star 
quality he seems eminently capable of, makes for an intense and darkly 
captivating Lucifer. It is one of the joyous ironies of this fine film 
that it is Lucifer that becomes the unexpected benefactor to the hero's 
struggle and at the climax even the equivalent of the Seventh Cavalry 
arriving to save the day.


Title
Review for Magic in the Mirror: Fowl Play (1996)
USA. 1996. Director - Ted Nicolaou, Screenplay - Ken Carter Jr & Frank 
Dietz, Producers - Kevin Hyman & Vlad Paunescu, Photography - Adolfo 
Bartoli, Music - Richard Kosinski, Visual Effects Supervisor - MacKenzie 
Waggaman, Digital Visual Effects - OCS, Freeze Frame & Pixel Magic 
(Supervisor - Ray McIntyre Jr), Creature Effects - Mark Rappaport, 
Production Design - Cristian Niculescu. Production Company - Bibi 
Productions.
Jamie Renee Smith (Mary Margaret Dennis), Eileen T'Kaye (Dragora), Saxon 
Trainor (Sylvia Dennis/Queen Hysop), David Brooks (Gilbert Dennis), 
Godfrey James (Melilot), Kevin Wixted (Tansy), Gerrit Graham (Bloom), 
Ion Haiduc (Admiral Dabble), Cristian Motriuc (Swanson), Bryan J. 
Terrill (Rudy Mertz), Brent Morris (Boynton Mertz), Julia Gavril 
(Nicolette Mertz)
Plot: The scheming Dr Laszlo Tuttle manages to open a dimensional 
doorway between our world and a mirror in Queen Dragora's throne room. 
Dragora persuades Tuttle to aid her and emerges, along with her minions, 
through the mirror to invade a costume party thrown by Mary Margaret's 
mother and seek revenge.
This is a sequel to the delightfully surreal `Magic in the Mirror' 
(1996). Both films give the impression of having been shot back-to-back 
(as have several other of executive producer Charles Band's series' of 
films) - they share almost entirely the same production credits and 
several of the same sets. `Magic in the Mirror', with its visions of 
flying duck armies and a demented mallard queen obsessed with cups of 
tea made with humans dipped in boiling water, proved a mind-spinning 
discovery not unakin to the surreal fabulations of an `Alice in 
Wonderland' or a `Willie Wonka and the Chocolate Factory'. Unfortunately 
`Fowl Play' lacks any of its predecessor's imaginative delights. It 
merely uses - rather than builds - on the existing elements and 
characters and does nothing new with them. The major spin on the 
original here is to transport three of the ducks from the other world 
through into our world. But such, in comparison to the original with its 
journey into a complete secondary world, is a disappointment - here most 
of the first film's surreal delights have been merely replaced by 
characters in funny suits running around in slapstick situations. 
Director Ted Nicolaou has an enjoyably light knockabout touch with the 
slapstick but in comparison to its predecessor the film is a 
disappointment. The film is made on a low budget with the majority of 
the action having been economically confined to four rooms within a 
single house.


Title
Review for Alien Factor, The (1977)
USA. 1978. Director/Screenplay/Producer - Donald M. Dohler, Photography 
- Britt McDonough, Music - Kenneth Walker, Special Effects/Makeup 
Effects - McDonough, John Cosetino & Larry Schlechter, Title 
Sequence/Additional Photographic Effects - Ernest D. Farino. Production 
Company - Cinemagic Visual Effects.
Don Leifert (Dr Benjamin Zachary), Mary Martens (Edie Martin), Richard 
Dyszel (Mayor Burt Wicker), Tom Griffith (Sheriff Jack Cinder), Anne 
Frith (Dr Ruth Sherman), George Stover (Steve Price), Richard Geiwitz 
(Deputy Pete Evans), Eleanor Herman (Mary Jane Carter)
Plot: The small town of Perry Hall, Maryland, is struck by a series of 
killings which are taken to be caused by a wild animal. But an 
investigating astronomer discovers an alien spaceship and that the 
killings are really the result of three escaped alien zoo animals.
`The Alien Factor' is a low-budget film regionally (Baltimore) made by 
Donald Dohler. Dohler is perhaps better known to some as editor of 
`Cinefex' magazine in the late 1970s/early 1980s which for awhile was 
__the__ magazine for all amateur film-makers wanting to learn how to 
achieve professional effects on shoestring budgets. A sense of fannish 
enthusiasm infuses `The Alien Factor' even if it doesn't emerge as a 
particularly good film. It has been unfairly read and promoted as a 
really bad film by the Incredibly Strange Film Festival - which it isn't 
at all. It has an interestingly original central idea - the rampaging 
monsters are really escaped animals from an alien zoo ship - and an 
effective twist ending. One suspects that if the basic film could have 
been made by a company like AIP or New World on B-budget resources and 
with a better director that it could have emerged as a worthwhile minor 
B effort. Unfortunately Dohler is hampered by a lack of budget and 
resources. The actors are amateurs - although none give truly bad 
performances. The photography is poor - the film is very dim and hard to 
see - and there is a tinny synthesizer soundtrack that sounds like it 
has been laid down on a pocket tape recorder. Dohler is not really that 
good a director either - even with the film's lack of resources he could 
have milked many of the scenes for far more suspense and atmosphere than 
he does. Nevertheless when it comes to what is clearly Dohler's forte - 
conducting professional effects on a zero budget - the film displays far 
more enterprising virtue than many better-budgeted films. There is some 
rather weak stop-motion at the climax, but certainly some imagination 
has been placed into making the other creatures look definitely 
non-human - a furred creature that seems to walk on three-toed stilts is 
particularly striking. And there is a particularly good vision of Earth 
seen from space at the start of the film.
Screening at the Christchurch 1998 Incredibly Strange Film Festival
Reviewed by Richard Scheib


Title
Review for Magic In the Mirror (1996)
USA. 1996. Director - Ted Nicolaou, Screenplay - Ken Carter Jr & Frank 
Dietz, Producers - Kevin Hyman & Vlad Paunescu, Photography - Adolfo 
Bartoli, Music - Richard Kozinski, Visual Effects Supervisor - MacKenzie 
Waggaman, Digital Visual Effects - OCS, Freeze Frame & Pixel Magic 
(Supervisor - Ray McIntyre Jr), Creature Effects - Mark Rappaport, 
Production Design - Cristian Niculescu, Art Direction - Viorel Ghenea. 
Production Company - Bibi Productions.
Jamie Renee Smith (Mary Margaret Dennis), Saxon Trainor (Sylvia 
Dennis/Queen Hysop), David Brooks (Gilbert Dennis), Godfrey James 
(Melilot), Kevin Wixted (Tansy), Eileen T'Kaye (Dragora), Ion Haiduc 
(Admiral Dabble), Cristian Motriuc (Swanson/Dr Francis Schmott), Ileana 
Sandulescu (Bella), Daniela Marzavan (Donna)
Plot: Young parentally neglected Mary Margaret Dennis discovers some 
magical berries which open up a doorway to another world through her 
late aunt's mirror. But there, as she tries to find some more berries to 
get back home, she is sought by the crazed duck queen Dragora who has 
discovered a taste for tea made out of humans dunked in hot water and 
desires to find a way through the mirror in order to plunder the people 
world.
Although it is not produced under either the Full Moon or Moonbeam 
banners, this is another of Charles Band and director Ted Nicolau's 
low-budget fantasy films. Every now and again Band and Nicolaou manage 
to pull something quite unique and unexpected out of the hat - they did 
with `Dragonworld' - and do so here again. One sat down to watch `Magic 
in the Mirror' with no real expectations - after all the majority of the 
Band/Moonbeam children's films like `Pet Shop' and the `Prehysteria!' 
films are utter dross. But in no time at all the film manages to take 
one completely by surprise and one suddenly wonders exactly what sort of 
drug-induced hallucination they are in the midst of. It is quite a 
bewildering, head-spinning experience, not unakin to sitting down to 
watch something like `Pufnstuf' for the first time. Nicolaou creates a 
unique secondary world fabulation filled with journeys through magical 
mirrors and tyrannical duck queens threatening to dip young girls into 
giant boiling teapots to serve up as a rare delicacy. There are moments 
of bizarrely surreal imagery - armies of flying mallards ("I love the 
smell of duck gas in the morning," comments the duck general); a whole 
field of doors leading to magical mirrors; gardens of planted people. 
For once the usual Band low-budget does not show through too much and 
the duck costumes are surprisingly lavish and effective. The result is a 
unique fantasy which succesfully ventures into that rare arena of 
surreal fabulism that so few children's films get right - lone examples 
being `Willie Wonka and the Chocolate Factory' and `Pufnstuf'.


Title
Review for Giant Spider Invasion, The (1975)
USA. 1975. Director - Bill Rebane, Screenplay - Robert Easton & Richard 
L. Huff, Story - Huff, Producers - Huff & Rebane, Photography - Jack 
Willoughby, Music - Ito Rebane, Special Effects - Richard Albain & 
Robert Millay. Production Company - Cinema Group 75/Transcentury 
Pictures.
Robert Easton (Dan Kester), Leslie Parrish (Ev Kester), Steve Brodie (Dr 
J.R. Vance), Barbara Hale (Dr Jenny Langer), Alan Hale Jr (Sheriff 
Jones), Kevin Brodie (Davy Perkins), Dianne Lee Hart (Terri), Christiane 
Schmidtmer (Helga), Paul Bentzen (Billy Kester), William W. Gillett Jr 
(Paul Rider), Tain Bodkin (Preacher)
Plot: A miniature black hole comes crashing to Earth on a farm in 
Northern Wisconsin. A host of spiders hatch out of crystal geodes which 
quickly overrun everything and then produce a spider the size of an 
entire house which rampages through town.
This has a reputation as one of the genre's truly terrible films. 
Although one finds upon viewing it it isn't really as bad as is claimed. 
Far be it from one wanting to defend it, but rather than truly terrible 
it is no more than a routine giant bug movie. Its greatest crime is 
really having been made twenty years too late, of being a 1950s giant 
bug movie in an era where the subgenre had moved to `Birds'-styled 
eco-revenge and killer shark ripoffs.
There are two aspects of the film that every writer who derides it 
points to as clear evidence of its Golden Turkey status - one being that 
the giant spider is played by a Volkswagen, the second being the 
scientifically preposterous notion that the giant spider was created by 
a black hole that crashed to Earth. But in both cases these are pieces 
of evidence that have been distorted out of proportion to make the case. 
The black hole explanation probably comes from the fascination with 
black holes that was just starting to enter the public paradigm at the 
time the film was made and gives the appearance of having been 
appropriated as a handy grab-all explanation. To its credit the film 
gives a lecture on what black holes are where it appears to have 
actually gone and looked the material up in an encyclopedia, even if it 
is thrown in a boiler-plate info-dump. And, while it never ties the idea 
of black holes and doorways to alternate dimensions as an explanation 
for giant spiders in any way that could be remotely regarded as 
scientific, one should at least place the notion in perspective - in the 
real world some have tried to seriously argue that a black hole falling 
to Earth was the cause of the Tunguska explosion, so the notion is not 
as entirely laughable as it might seem.
The same with the Volkswagen spider. One suspects that what it is 
everybody laughs about is simply the __notion__ of the spider being 
played by a Volkswagen. One looked closely throughout and failed to find 
any occasions upon which you could see wheels or car bodies showing 
beneath the spider. Certainly the effect is not as terrible as say the 
carpet monster with visible feet underneath in `The Creeping Terror', 
and the giant spider effects are at least comparable to those in the 
highly regarded giant ant film `Them!'.
All in all it is distinctly average, rather than a terrible, film. The 
pace is slow - not much happens at the start of the film - but director 
Bill Rebane does creates one or two occasional frissons, mostly in the 
scenes with the small actual-size spiders crawling over and pursuing 
people. The acting is at least up to a professionally competent standard 
and there is the odd amusing line: "I'm not eleven anymore - I'm 
35-23-35," says the strumpet of the show.
Screening at the Christchurch 1998 Incredibly Strange Film Festival
Reviewed by Richard Scheib


Title
Review for Mulan (1998)
USA. 1998. Directors - Tony Bancroft & Barry Cook, Screenplay - Eugenia 
Bostwick-Singer, Rita Hsiao, Phil LaZebnik, Chris Sanders & Raymond 
Singer, Story - Robert D. San Souci, Based on the Poem, Producer - Pam 
Coats, Music - Jerry Goldsmith, Songs - Matthew Wilder & David Zippel, 
Production Design - Hans Bacher. Production Company - Disney.
Voices: Ming-Na Wen (Fa Mulan), Eddie Murphy (Mushu), B.D. Wong (Captain 
Li Shang), James Hong (Chi Fu), Harvey Fierstein (Yao), Jerry Tondo 
(Chien-Pao), Gedde Watanabe (Ling), Miguel Ferrer (Shan-Yu), Soon-Tek Oh 
(Fa Zhou), Pat Morita (The Emperor), Miriam Margolyes (The Matchmaker), 
George Takei (First Ancestor)
Plot: When the Huns invade China, the emperor puts out a general 
conscription calling for one man from each family to join the army to 
repel the invasion. The aging and crippled Fa Zhou is called up. To 
spare him, his daughter Mulan cuts her hair, dresses as a man and goes 
off to join the army in his place. This defiance of tradition upsets her 
ancestors who decide she must be stopped. A demoted temple dragon goes 
to offer assistance, deciding the only way it can regain his position is 
to help her triumph against The Huns.
I may have been one of the few to have been relatively disappointed with 
the 1990s renaissance of Disney animation. Both `Beauty and the Beast' 
(1991) and `The Lion King' (1994) were impressive. But while many have 
too hastily rushed to make comparisons to the great Disney classics, 
many other recent Disney's pale in contrast. `Aladdin' (1992) was a 
bland effort only really founded on Robin Williams being a funny man; 
`Pocahontas' (1995) seemed more constructed to toe a PC line than 
actually be a film; `The Hunchback of Notre Dame' (1996) failed to be 
the epic it artistically strove to be due to a flat, mawkish story; and 
`Hercules' (1997) took its in-jokey self-referentiality to the point of 
annoyance. I didn't approach `Mulan' with any great expectations and as 
a result ended up being pleasantly surprised.
`Mulan' is an adaption of a Chinese legend (although the character's 
name has been Anglicized to one word from the original's Mu Lan. While 
also in the creative embellishment stakes the invading army with some 
historical dubiousness turn out to be Huns). In some regards `Mulan' is 
like a `Pocahontas' - strong heroine stands against odds to 
single-handedly end a war - but with a stronger story and less of a 
feeling that it is tip-toeing on eggshells in order not to offend any 
minority group. Certainly the PC values are still there - despite being 
an animated film in English, it is scrupulous enough to cast most of the 
Chinese character parts with Asian-American actors - but not to the 
point it gets preachy and in the way of the story.
And in all other regards it is a satisfyingly well-rounded film - a warm 
balance of humour, a likeable obligatory supporting cast of small 
talking animal sidekicks, a strong female lead (something that is also 
requisite for the new PC Disney these days). The artwork is modelled on 
traditional Chinese lithographs and all drawn in pastel colours. While 
economically drawn, there is at least one artistically (and 
dramatically) dazzling sequence where Mulan brings an avalanche down on 
an advancing army and is forced to ride the crest of the wave on her 
horse. Amongst the characters Eddie Murphy does a standout piece as a 
fast-talking dragon. Murphy has an absolute ball and makes it the most 
memorable of the talking animal mentor/sidekick parts that Disney has 
done in recent years - far better indeed than Robin Williams's 
overrated, anachronism-spouting turn in `Aladdin'.


Title
Review for City of Angels (1998)
USA. 1998. Director - Brad Silberling, Screenplay - Dana Stevens, Based 
on the film `Wings of Desire' written by Peter Handke & Wim Wenders, 
Producers - Charles Roven & Dawn Steel, Photography - John Seale, Music 
- Gabriel Yared, Visual Effects - Sony Pictures Imageworks (Supervisor - 
John Nelson), Special Effects Supervisor - David Blitstein, Makeup 
Effects - The Burman Studio, Production Design - Lilly Kilvert. 
Production Company - Regency Enterprises/Atlas Entertainment.
Nicolas Cage (Seth), Meg Ryan (Dr Maggie Rice), Dennis Franz (Nathaniel 
Messinger), Colm Feore (Dr Jordan Ferris), Andre Braugher (Cassiel), 
Robin Bartlett (Annie)
Plot: Angels hover invisibly over LA, listening in on people's thoughts. 
One angel, Seth, aches to touch and feel the things that ordinary people 
do. He is drawn to Maggie Rice, a heart surgeon whose life starts 
falling apart after a patient she cared about died, and appears to her, 
offering comfort and solace. Gradually the two fall in love and Seth 
faces the choice of whether or not to to elect to fall from being an 
angel and become an ordinary mortal so he can be with her.
Wim Wenders' `Wings of Desire' (1987) was one of the great fantasy films 
of the 1980s. It lacked anything appreciable in the way of trite moral 
epiphanies like any traditional Hollywood angel fantasy, but instead 
used angels as an extraordinary and beautiful poetic meditation on the 
human condition. Now of course comes `City of Angels', the Hollywood 
remake of `Wings of Desire', which is sadly exactly the banalizing that 
one would expect when a European arthouse film having been passed 
through the studio grinder. In `Wings' the romance was one of, but not 
necessarily the primary, subplot, but in `City' it is propelled to the 
forefront and told in the most shameless Hollywood romantic sentiments 
conceivable. At which, one must admit, it conducts itself passably. 
There are some passages which come with a tenderly written feeling - 
most especially the opening scene where Cage takes the soul of a child 
from a hospital operating theatre ("Will Mummy understand ?" "She 
will"). It is just that when you compare it to `Wings' it cannot help 
but seem an inferior effort. Director Silberling ably imitates Wenders' 
camera moves serenely circling through the air as though operated by 
angels. And there are even moments when the film seems to play with the 
double meaninged title and the visual iconography that one might 
associate with it in a very Wenders-esque way - angels casually holding 
conversations atop downtown street signs or sitting atop the Hollywood 
sign. And indeed it even takes the ending to further places than `Wings' 
ever went to by opting for a tragic ending to the romance to add the 
comment that the joy of life entails pain as well (a corollary that 
Wenders left it to his sequel `Faraway! So Close' before getting around 
to making). 
But where Wenders achieved a kind of numinously divine poetry about the 
aching fragility and beauty of the human condition, `City' is left 
straining at romantic cliche. Silberling just cannot help but overplay 
his hand. One of the most haunting images in `Wings' was one beautiful 
tracking shot showing angels invisibly sitting amongst the people in a 
library. Silberling repeats it in `City' but overplays it to the point 
of absurdity - it becomes a focal location in the story and gets tricked 
out with absurdly heavy-handed shots like having all the angels 
sinisterly looking down from the balconies. And where the film really 
loses it altogether is in the disastrous casting. Nicolas Cage is 
appallingly miscast as an angel - where he should radiate a beatific 
divine grace and drift through listening to human thoughts with a 
boundless empathy, Cage comes across as rather dopey. And most laughably 
when it comes to the film's celebration of the joy of life, his attempts 
at running about animated by the ecstasy of sensation make him look like 
a total lunatic. Equally Meg Ryan is completely miscast in the part of a 
heart surgeon. Ryan is a light comedy actress and is almost impossible 
to believe as a surgeon on the emotional brink. (And she is not exactly 
helped by poorly motivated script - it is hard to believe an experienced 
surgeon would just suddenly go to pieces for no well-defined reason 
after the medically inexplicable death of a child she never knew). 
Between this absurd box-office oriented miscasting and Silberling's 
heavy-handed mishandling of the story, the serene, almost divine poetry 
of Wenders's original topples into risibility.


Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
USA. 1998. Director - Stephen Hopkins, Screenplay - Akiva Goldsman, 
Producers - Goldsman, Hopkins, Carla Fry & Mark W. Koch, Photography - 
Peter Levy, Music - Bruce Broughton, Visual Effects Supervisor - Angus 
Bickerton, Visual Effects - Cinesite Europe (Supervisor - Jonathan 
Privett), The Computer Film Co, The Film Factory at VTR, Framestore & 
The Magic Camera Co (Supervisor - Steven Begg), Creature Effects - Jim 
Henson's Creature Workshop (Creature Supervisor - Karen Halliwell & John 
Stephenson, Digital Effects Supervisor - Christian Hogue, Electronics 
Supervisor - Julian Manning), Special Effects Supervisor - Nick Allder, 
Production Design - Norman Garwood, Supervising Art Director - Keith 
Pain. Production Company - Prelude Pictures/Irwin Allen Productions.
William Hurt (Professor John Robinson), Matt LeBlanc (Major Don West), 
Jack Johnson (Will Robinson), Gary Oldman (Dr Zachary Smith), Heather 
Graham (Dr Judy Robinson), Lacey Chabert (Penny Robinson), Mimi Rogers 
(Dr Maureen Robinson), Jared Harris (Older Will)
Plot: The Robinson family are about to be launched aboard the Jupiter 
Mission to set up a hyperspatial gate on the planet Alpha Prime to 
relieve strained environmental resources on Earth. But the family is 
divided by dysfunctionality from within with the two youngest children 
Will and Penny resenting their father's lack of attention to them. 
Meanwhile a terrorist organization has ordered Dr Zachary Smith to sneak 
aboard and sabotage the mission and then abandoned him for dead as it is 
launched. As Smith and the Robinsons struggle to stop the robot Smith 
has programmed to go amok, they are forced to engage the hyperdrive to 
stop the ship going into the sun, causing them to emerge at a point 
where they are lost in space.
And so the current fad for big-screen, big-budget remakes of 1960s tv 
series continues, with `Lost in Space' being the latest to receive the 
all-star treatment. It has been a massive hit, although as with much 
recent genre product (`Godzilla', `The Postman', `Sphere') has receive a 
middling response if not outright slamming from the critics. The 
critical response in this case is interesting with reviewers either 
tending to be condescendingly praiseworthy ("nice effects, just switch 
the brain off") or negative for a variety of reasons that seem to hover 
around something to do with the film's failure to be faithful to the 
original series. (The most bizarre review was the wholly hostile one in 
the New Zealand Listener which interpreted the costumes and the 
promotional LS logo as neo-Nazi and the relationship between Will and Dr 
Smith as paedophile).
But all the talk about faithfulness to the original series is founded on 
the misapprehension that the original series was some classic - which it 
isn't. When it began in 1965, the series was a typical space opera - 
`Flash Gordon' or some copy of a 1950s juvenile tv serial like `Rod 
Brown of the Rocket Rangers' - recast for the Space Age. But it was poor 
sf, shockingly ignorant of basic science (a basic trademark of any Irwin 
Allen sf series) and lacked any conceptual depth other than featuring a 
monster or space cowboy of the week. With the second season and the move 
into colour, the camp element took over with Jonathan Harris, supported 
by Will and the robot, becoming the real star of the show, playing to 
the camera as broadly as possible. It is the camp silliness and the 
kitsch appeal of the show's corniness today that has made the series a 
cult item. Certainly its popularity in reruns is for reasons that have 
almost nothing to do with sf. The movie has been criticized for its lack 
of humour, in taking a much grittier, more realistic approach and for 
having abandoned the style of the series. Which, if any of the critics 
really sat down and examined what they were saying, is a fatuous 
statement - any faithful approach would surely have left the film 
emerging as some science-fictional cousin to `The Adventures of 
Priscilla, Queen of the Desert'.
There was the question of which way the film would go. One had the 
dreadful feeling that it would turn out something like `The Brady Bunch 
Movie' with the 1960s po-facedness put through the brutally sarcastic 
wringer of 1990s deconstruction. And the presence, as both scripter and 
producer, of Akiva Goldsman who wrote the last two `Batman' sequels - 
which should in any book have deemed him unemployable in the industry 
again - did not exactly inspire confidence. At most the trailer gave the 
indication it would be all special effects flash and a no-brain "sci-fi" 
script. But the surprise is that `Lost in Space' is actually a halfway 
reasonable effort. It remains quite faithful to the series basic 
mythology while refashioning it into a scenario where real world 
temperaments intrude upon the absurd ideal of the perfect nuclear family 
that the 1960s series held up. Now the Robinsons are a dysfunctional 
family - Penny (in an annoyingly whiny performance from Lacey Chabert) 
is a cynical punked-out brat and Will an ignored child prodigy who only 
wants his father to spend some time with him; the women no longer stand 
about and do the cooking while the men go adventuring but are all 
technically competent and hold doctorates; West goes from the handsome 
hero to a cocksure macho jerk and in comes a good deal of overt sexual 
banter between he and Judy; we even get to see Smith actually performing 
a medical operation and Don West being the pilot which we never did in 
the series. The basic design of the robot is retained but at the same 
time it rebuilt into a heavily armoured fighting machine. There are a 
number of other touches that only fans of the original would pick up - 
Penny gets a new CGI version of her old space-monkey; or how Gary Oldman 
does a quite accurate mimicry of the craven and loquacious character 
that Jonathan Harris created and naturally gets to entangle Will into 
his schemes while trotting out classic Smith-isms like "Never fear, 
Smith is here." And of course the minor parts are filled with cameos by 
members of the original cast - Angela Lockhart (the mother in the 
series) is the holographic president whose image Will messes about with 
at the start; Marta Kristen (Judy in the series) and Angela Cartwright 
(Penny in the series) are reporters at the press conference; and Mark 
Goddard (Don West in the series) is the general who assigns the new Don 
West to the mission.
Just seeing how the film has reconstructed the familiar characters and 
icons of the original makes it quite intriguing. Equally so the film is 
filled with some breath-taking effects sequence which are conducted at 
an immensely exciting pace. The venture into the abandoned Proteus is a 
marvellously suspense-fraught set-piece. The sheer kinesis of the film 
carries it but the downside is that while the film sets itself up well, 
its last quarter act falls apart. Goldsman's time-travel plot is far too 
ambitious for the hurtlingly-paced space opera the film is trying to be. 
And further it seems only half a plot which leaves all sorts of 
questions and loopholes hanging - how does the future with the elder 
Will still remain extant instead of being edited out once the past is 
changed ? Or exactly what is the Proteus mission meant to be doing - did 
The Jupiter II travel through time or not and, if so, why didn't the 
Proteus mission? And the climactic dive through the planet's core is 
geologically preposterous. Nevertheless for the most part the film 
manages to divert one's attention well with its dark and savvy reworking 
of the series mythology and its hurtling array of effects bravado - it's 
not a bad start for what promises to be an ongoing series. 
Intriguing piece of trivia:- Did you know that the release of the film 
comes one year after the date the series set as the year of the Jupiter 
2's launch ?


Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
USA. 1998. Director - Mimi Leder, Screenplay - Bruce Joel Rubin & 
Michael Tolkin, Producers - David Brown & Richard D. Zanuck, Photography 
- Dietrich Lohmann, Music - James Horner, Visual Effects - Industrial 
Light and Magic (Supervisors - Scott Farrar & Bill George), Special 
Effects Supervisor - Michael Lantieri, Production Design - Leslie 
Dilley. Production Company - Dreamworks SKG/Paramount.
Tea Leoni (Jenny Lerner), Robert Duvall (Captain Spurgeon `Fish' 
Tanner), Elijah Wood (Leo Beiderman), Morgan Freeman (President Beck), 
Maximilian Schell (Jason Lerner), Ron Eldard (Oren Monash), Vanessa 
Redgrave (Robin Lerner), Leelee Sobieski (Sarah Hotchner), Mary 
McCormack (Andrea Baker), Jon Favreau (Gus Partenza), Dougary Scott 
(Eric Vennekor), Laura Innes (Beth Stanley), James Cromwell (Alan 
Rittenhouse), Richard Schiff (Don Beiderman), Gary Werntz (Chuck 
Hotchner), Blair Underwood (Mark Simon), Charles Martin Smith (Marcus 
Wolf), Denise Crosby (Mrs Hotchner), Betsy Brantley (Ellen Beiderman)
Plot: Investigating what she thinks is a White House sex scandal, a 
junior tv reporter unwittingly uncovers government plans to avert a 
comet the size of New York City which is on a collision course with the 
Earth. As the comet nears, the President launches a manned mission to 
detonate nuclear warheads and deflect its path while holding a national 
lottery to select people to be placed in safety in giant underground 
shelters.
Every year studios seem, either by coincidence or a desire to outdo one 
another, to hit upon a particular theme all at once - in 1997 it was 
volcano movies, the year before big budget alien invasion films, and in 
1998 it is asteroid/meteor collision films what with this and 
`Armageddon'. Asteroid/meteor collision films have not fared 
particularly well in the past - remember `Meteor' (1979) and the dire 
`Asteroid' mini-series (1997), with only the largely forgotten tv movie 
`A Fire in the Sky' (1978) having been in any way watchable.
`Deep Impact' starts out giving some hope that it may reverse the trend. 
The script comes from Bruce Joel Rubin (who made two afterlife fantasies 
`Ghost' and `Jacob's Ladder' (both 1990) which both inserted some 
challengingly new ideas into traditional takes on afterlife themes) and 
Michael Tolkin (who wrote the intriguing `The Rapture' (1991) and the 
great `The Player' (1992)). The promising opening almost seems a sly dig 
at contemporary media obsession with Presidential scandal (even though 
the film was well into production before Monica Lewinsky was propelled 
from unknown office worker to household name) with a junior tv reporter 
thinking she has uncovered a juicy piece of White House 
scandal-mongering but instead finding she has accidentally uncovered 
plans to try and avert the disaster. This segues into a, if not 
scientifically believable, at least a quite exciting sequence involving 
a manned attempt to land on the comet.
And the climax of the film has some really good mass disaster effects 
sequences. Unfortunately bookended in between them the film falls 
completely apart. It wants to tell a poignant story about various 
characters as they meet the impending holocaust but the different dramas 
it raises - young Elijah Wood's decision to abandon his place in the 
survival shelter and go back for his girlfriend; Tea Leone's 
reconciliation with her estranged father after the suicide of her 
mother; aging shuttle pilot Robert Duvall coming to regard wounded 
commander Ron Eldard as the son he never had - have a melodramatic 
insipidity that is infuriating. And despite the film's two-hour length 
it only ever skates across the surface of these melodramas - for example 
one would have expected Wood's journey back to his girlfriend to have 
been one fraught with dramatic perils but all that one sees is him 
setting out and then just arriving back home. You sort of get the 
feeling you have wandered into a disaster movie that has been made by 
people who have watched too much `Barney' - a disaster movie filled with 
niceness and nobility and where no untoward sentiment ever encroaches. 
It almost becomes absurd in its saccharine treatment - looting and 
increased social disorder is mentioned as one of the effects of the 
impending holocaust but all that one ever sees of any of this is a big 
traffic jam on the highway; Vanessa Redgrave commits suicide but the 
film seems to almost deliberately avoid any mention of the actual words, 
it all takes place off-screen and is only ever alluded to. After the 
maddening banality of `Deep Impact', all that `Armageddon' really needed 
to do to become the better of 1998's two asteroid movies was simply to 
turn up.
(I don't know if it is just my perverted mind or what but for some 
reason whenever I heard the title of the film it kept making me think 
more of a 1970s porn film than a mega-budget disaster spectacle. You 
know:- "She couldn't find sexual satisfaction until she met Joe and 
discovered fourteen inches ... of `Deep Impact'.")


Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
USA. 1998. Director - Jeremiah Chechik, Screenplay - Don MacPherson, 
Story, Based on the TV Series Created by Sydney Newman, Producers - 
Jerry Weintraub, Photography - Roger Pratt, Music - Joel McNeely, 
Avengers Theme by Laurie Johnson, Visual Effects Supervisor - Nick 
Davis, Digital Effects - Cinesite (Supervisor - Joss Williams), 
Miniature Effects - The Magic Camera Co (Supervisor - Jose Gravell), 
Production Design - Stuart Craig, Supervising Art Director - Neil 
Lamont. Production Company - Warners.
Ralph Fiennes (John Steed), Uma Thurman (Dr Emma Peel), Sean Connery 
(Sir August de Wynter), Jim Broadbent (Mother), Fiona Shaw (Father), 
Eileen Atkins (Alice), Patrick MacNee (Voice of Colonel Invisible 
Jones), Eddie Izzard (Bailey)
Plot: John Steed, an agent for The Ministry, is assigned to keep an eye 
on Emma Peel, a lithe and beautiful  meteorologist, suspected of 
breaking into The Prospero Program - something she denies. Together the 
two form a partnership to take on the crazed Sir August de Wynter, a 
Scotsman who has harnessed the Prospero Program and is creating weather 
havoc to force the nations of the world to each give him ten percent of 
their GNP.
‘The Avengers' tv series (1962-9) was the height of 1960s chic. It 
jumped on the vogue for spy films started by the James Bond series but 
gave it its own surreally droll British manneredness - its two agents 
engaged in deliberately unreal adventures where they seemed more 
concerned about the champagne getting above room temperature than they 
were about imminent danger. The series began less flamboyantly in 1961 
as a routine black-and-white policier called ‘Police Surgeon' where 
Patrick MacNee's Steed was only the sidekick to Ian Hendry's title 
doctor. But in 1962 MacNee was promoted to the star of the show, the 
series renamed ‘The Avengers' and the rest is history. The first few 
seasons which paired MacNee with Honor Blackman (and for about six 
episodes at the very beginning nightclub singer Venus Smith played by 
Julie Stevens) were still standard police stories. It wasn't until the 
arrival of Diana Rigg in 1965 that the series became what it is known 
for today with the police stories supplanted by a surreal, cartoon 
universe of mad scientists and British imperturbability and Rigg 
outfitted in leather bodysuits and mini- skirts, a combination that 
turned the show into a cult phenomenon. The series was killed off in 
1969 with Rigg's departure and her disastrous replacement by Linda 
Thorson who substituted Rigg's sly flirtatiousness for a vacant 
airheadedness. The series was briefly revived as the underrated ‘The New 
Avengers' in 1976-7 with a leggy Joanna Lumley making for a lithe and 
sexy agent that rivalled Diana Rigg for on-screen class.
‘The Avengers' is now the latest to be revamped in the current fad for 
big screen revivals of 1960s tv series,  following the likes of 
‘Mission: Impossible', ‘The Saint', ‘Lost in Space', ‘The Beverly 
Hillbillies', the ‘Addams Family' movies and the upcoming revivals of 
‘The Mod Squad', ‘Bewitched', ‘My Favourite Martian' and ‘Gilligan's 
Island'. One could sense long in advance that the project was going to 
be a disaster in the happening. First their was the initial planned 
castings of Mel Gibson as Steed and Nicole Kidman as Mrs Peel. (Is there 
really an actor whose persona is less suited to the part of the 
perfectly mannered gentleman Steed than Gibson ? I was kind of holding 
out for Charles Dance and Emma Thompson in the parts). And then their 
was the assignment of Jeremiah Chechik to the director's chair. Chechik 
made his debut with ‘National Lampoon's Christmas Vacation' in 1989 and 
has yet to make a good film. Chechik's ‘Tall Tale' (1994) was a film 
about Western legends like Pecos Bill and John Bunyan but fell flat 
because it seemed scared of and ended up trying to be everything else 
except a tall tale, while his next, 1996's ‘Diabolique' disastrously 
tried to remake the classic 1955 French thriller ‘Les Diaboliques' with 
an upbeat ending. Even ‘The Avengers' distributors could see the film 
was going to be a disaster before it opened and conducted the almost 
unprecedented desperation measure of refusing critics any preview 
screenings on the grounds that "they didn't want the film unfairly 
compared to the original series". (I do hate to puncture the reality 
these guys seem to live in but you are selling a remake - you can't 
revive a tv series and then not expect critics let alone an audience to 
compare it to the original). And needless to say the film has been 
pilloried by critics and audiences alike and is already  being 
considered the biggest disaster of the year.
Certainly it is technically a well made film. The photography is lush 
and sumptuous and there is some fine model effects work and dazzling 
sets. And the film has certainly done its homework when it comes to 
studying the series and copying everything from Mrs Peel's costumes to 
outfitting Steed with his vintage Bentley and steel-capped bowler hat 
and Mrs Peel with her MGB. It even gets full marks for quoting the 
series' explanation of what happened to Mr Peel.
But for all that it is really a rather sad film. All the droll British 
understatement comes far too posed. The jokes about Steed's impeccable 
coiffure, tea drinking, macaroons and brollies, the unflappable cool in 
the midst of danger - are all set up as obvious gags. But the effect is 
less one of droll wit than it is of affected retro-chic - it is like a 
funny incident that loses its spontaneity in the retelling.
The casting has tried hard but ends up a disaster. Ralph Fiennes tries 
to do a droll Steed but comes out more like a bland, colourless Oxbridge 
fop, while Uma Thurman's Mrs Peel is wooden and vapid, lacking in any of 
Diana Rigg's teasing flirtatiousness. Sean Connery delivers one of the 
worst performances he has ever given, reduced to slavering and lusting 
over Uma.
And the plot verges on the completely disjointed. It seems to have been 
constructed out of sequences that somebody thought was cool - Mrs Peel 
trapped in an M.C. Escher-modelled house (clearly an echo of the episode 
‘The House That Jack Built'), an attack by robot insects, a really daft 
scene where a group of conspirators meet dressed as teddybears - but 
these are like incidents that just seem to happen without any connecting 
sensibility. A clone of Mrs Peel runs about for half the film without 
even any explanation as to what she's doing there. Even the initial 
assignment Steed is given has a thorough vagueness to it - he is merely 
assigned to keep an eye on Mrs Peel and this somehow instantly becomes 
an investigation into Connery's super-villain. It is sad that the film, 
for all the technical care that has been clearly lavished on it, can 
miss the mark so widely when it comes to the fundamentals and above all 
capturing the panache that made the series so memorable in the first 
place.


Title
Review for Wizard of Gore, The (1970)
USA. 1970. Director/Producer - Herschell Gordon Lewis, Screenplay - 
Allen Kahn, Photography - Alex Ameri & Daniel Krogh, Music - Larry 
Wellington, Special Effects - Herschell Gordon Lewis, Allison Louise 
Downe, Robert Lewis & Vickie Miles. Production Company - Mayflower 
Pictures.
Ray Sager (Montag the Magnificent), Judy Cler (Sherry Carson), Wayne 
Ratay (Jack Ward)
Plot: The stage magician Montag the Magnificent gains attention with his 
stage act which involves the gory impalement and dismemberment of 
hypnotzied women -before each act of slaughter is revealed to the 
audience to all be an illusion. A reporter and his tv critic girlfriend 
investigate when they find that Montag's stage volunteers are each dying 
after the performance in exactly the same way as Montag pretends to 
dismember them on stage.
Beginning with `Blood Feast' in 1963, director Herschell Gordon Lewis 
created the splatter film. Lewis's films are really like porn films. But 
where porn films are staged around providing a set variety of 
procreational activities in great detail every few minutes, Lewis's 
films fixate around the body of a particular individual, usually a 
woman, who in great detail is dismembered or torn apart every few 
minutes. `The Wizard of Gore' features some really heavy-duty gore - in 
a variant on the old sawing a woman in half trick, a magician chainsaws 
a woman in half; swords are impaled down throats; holes punched through 
bodies with drill presses; and in the most perverse of all effects - a 
spike pounded into a woman's head and then her brains pulled out, the 
magician even reaching in with considerable glee to pop out one of her 
eyeballs. The lack of conviction to the effects - an appallingly 
unconvincing dummy head that the spike is pounded into head, the swords 
down the throat being seen to bend - do not in any way undermine the 
full-on shock value that Lewis's gore has.
Lewis's films are the sort that leave you constantly wondering what 
possible socially redeeming values they have. Indeed `The Golden Turkey 
Awards' nominated Lewis for the lifetime achievement as worst director 
of all time - only to be beaten out by Edward D. Wood Jr. `Wizard' is 
filled with all sorts of bad movie-making fascination. Lewis develops 
this bizarrely heavy-handed style every time he wants to achieve 
directorial effect - cuts to closeups of Ray Sager's eyebrows and hat 
filling the whole screen every time the audience are supposed to be 
being hypnotized or else bizarrely abrupt (and unintentionally funny) 
cuts in the music to signal the change between illusion and a return to 
reality. Ray Sager gives an amazingly bad performance with eyes wide 
open and enunciating everything in virtual upper case.
`Wizard' is usually regarded as the best of Lewis's films because it has 
a playful double-structure that flips back and forward between reality 
and illusion and at the end even starts to toy with the illusion of the 
film itself - something which has given the film a certain academic 
legitimacy. This play of illusion proves undeniably fascinating and 
never more so than the bizarre ending where the heroine and her 
boyfriend start making out and he turns back into the dead magician and 
then, in a moment of solipsistic ingenuity, she decides he is really an 
illusion and thinks him out of existence. Finally the magician turns 
directly to the camera to taunt the audience, telling them to make sure 
that this might not all be an illusion that what they have been watching 
is a film. Between its sheer shoddiness of production values, its 
gut-churning but somehow not offensive extremes, and weirdly fascinating 
and equally pretentious play of film, illusion and reality, `Wizard' 
proves an undeniably appealing.
Screening at the Christchurch 1998 Incredibly Strange Film Festival
Reviewed by Richard Scheib


Title
Review for Dr. Black, Mr. Hyde (1976)
USA. 1975. Director - William Crain, Screenplay - Larry LeBron, Idea - 
Lawrence Woolner, Producer - Charles Walker, Photography - Tak Fujimoto, 
Music - Johnny Pate, Special Effects - Harry Wollman, Hyde Makeup - Stan 
Winston, Makeup - Zoltan Elek, Art Direction - Tommy Estridge. 
Production Company - Hyde Productions.
Bernie Casey (Dr Henry Pride), Marie O'Henry (Linda Monte), Rosalind 
Cash (Dr Billie Worth), Ji-Tu Cumbuka (Lieutenant Jackson), Milt Kogan 
(Lieutenant Harry O'Connor), Stu Gilliam (Silky)
Plot: Eminent Black doctor Henry Pride is trying to find a cure for 
liver disease. He injects himself with the serum he creates but this 
transforms him into a psychopathic white-skinned monster that goes on a 
spree killing prostitutes.
Following the popularity of `Shaft' (1971) which was the first action 
film to feature a Black hero, there was, in what has been nicknamed the 
Blaxploitation fad, a swarm of film-makers who raced to exploit the new 
market, offering up traditional action films but featuring principally 
Black protagonists and characters. Amongst these came the 
entrepreneurial `Blacula' (1972) and `Blackenstein' (1973), jumping on 
the trend to adapt classic horror stories with Black twists. And after 
that, one supposed that `Dr Black and Mr Hyde' was fairly inevitable.
Like `Blacula' and `Blackenstein', `Dr Black and Mr Hyde' is a 
B-exploitation film, passably well made. But while neither `Blacula' and 
`Blackenstein' are any more than that, `Dr Black' has an undeniable 
metaphoric anger to it. Of all the Blaxploitation reworkings of classic 
horror themes, `Dr Black' is the only one to revamp the metaphors of the 
original story rather than simply recast the story in Black face. Where 
Robert Louis Stevenson wrote `Dr Jekyll and Mr Hyde' as a pre-Freudian 
psychological study in the rift between man's baser drives and the 
veneer of civilization he is forced to adopt, `Dr Black' rewrites it 
into a metaphor for the Black and White racial divide. On the Dr Jekyll 
side it sets up Bernie Casey as the kind-hearted Black doctor Pride who, 
in having won success and acclaim, is accused of "really being white" 
and having forgotten his ghetto ethnicity. And when he takes the potion 
and literally transforms into a white man, the result is an hysterically 
paranoid and exaggerated demonization of a white man that might have 
emerged from someone's deepest darkest racial nightmares. (It is 
probably the most brutish and animalistic of all the Mr Hyde 
characterizations that have ever been conducted). Beneath the film looms 
this deeply afraid (and undeniably racist) racial animosity born out of 
the ghetto - the fear for Black identity; the belief that to sell out 
one's ghetto roots is to become White; that to be White is truly 
monstrous - that manages to play with considerably more potency than a 
good many serious liberal films about racism. And the result is a 
metaphor of the racial divide that is conducted with a striking and 
unremitting ferocity that quite belies the exploitation film it is 
embedded in.
Screening at the Christchurch 1998 Incredibly Strange Film Festival
Reviewed by Richard Scheib


Title
Review for Bad Moon (1996)
USA. 1996. Director/Screenplay - Eric Red, Based on the Novel `Thor' by 
Wayne Smith, Producer - James G. Robinson, Photography - Jan Kresser, 
Music - Daniel Licht, Visual Effects - VIFX (Supervisor - Gregory L. 
McMurry), Special Effects Supervisor - Gary Minielly, Werewolf Effects - 
Steve Johnson's XFX Inc, Production Design - Linda Del Rosario & Richard 
Paris. Production Company - Morgan Creek.
Mariel Hemingway (Janet Harrison), Michael Pare (Ted Harrison), Mason 
Gamble (Brett Harrison)
Plot: Anthropologist Ted Harrison returns from an expedition to India 
and goes to stay in a caravan out the back of his sister Janet's house. 
But while away Ted was attacked and gored by a werewolf and each night 
transforms into a werewolf, handcuffing himself to a tree in the woods 
to restrain the wolf. But Janet's dog Thor takes a dislike to this 
invader in its domain and a territorial dispute between the two ensues.
Eric Red wrote two of the best horror films of the 1980s - `The Hitcher' 
(1986) and `Near Dark' (1987). Since then Red has progressed to become 
director of his own material with the kidnap thriller `Cohen and Tate' 
(1988), the horror film `Body Parts' (1991), the thriller `Undertow' 
(1996), and this. None of Red's directorial efforts are bad films by any 
means. But the relative failure of any of them to set the movie-making 
world alight either with directorial panache or dazzling innovation 
leave one with the increasing suspicion that the successes of `The 
Hitcher' and `Near Dark' belonged more to the bravura style that their 
respective directors brought to the projects than any native talent upon 
the part of Red.
`Bad Moon' is a werewolf film. Red offers a rather amusing spin on the 
theme - that of the werewolf and the dog of the household squaring off 
in a dispute over whose territory the place is. And Red conducts it 
quite competently directorially - he even manages to get a performance 
of sorts out of the usually wooden Michael Pare. But it is just that in 
many other aspects the film disappoints and leaves you wondering just 
how much more it could have been. Part of the problem here is its length 
- a surprisingly short 80 minutes which leaves it feeling dramatically 
rather slight. Red barely sets up the situation than he seems to almost 
cursorily jump to the climactic showdown. One cannot help but think 
another whole middle act would have filled the film out to a far more 
dramatically satisfying whole.
The most disappointing aspect of the film are the werewolf effects. It 
is not that there is anything wrong with them - they are technically 
impeccable and have an impressive fluidity of movement. But the end 
effect is thoroughly unconvincing - the werewolf looks like one of those 
plastic Classic Creature kitset models. And any effectiveness is 
considerably undercut by the actual transformation scenes which resort 
to cheap and unconvincing morphing effects. I am becoming increasingly 
of the opinion that the morph is a special effect that has run its 
course. For all the innovation in digital effects technology that 
`Terminator 2: Judgment Day' introduced in 1991 with the morph there 
have been a bare handful of films which have justifiably used it since - 
organic shapes simply do not transform with the fluidity of a morph. But 
for the sake of cost-effectiveness the morph now seems to have now 
supplanted air-bladder transformation effects. But despite such classic 
physical makeup effects films like `The Howling', `An American Werewolf 
in London', `The Thing' and `Fright Night' still retain an infinitely 
greater edge over the eminently forgettable digital effects 
transformations in films like this and `From Dusk Till Dawn'.


Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
USA. 1998. Director - Roland Emmerich, Screenplay - Emmerich & Dean 
Devlin, Story - Devlin, Emmerich, Ted Elliott & Terry Rossio, Based on 
the Character Created and Owned by Toho Inc, Producer - Devlin, 
Photography - Ueli Steiger, Music - David Arnold, Visual Effects 
Supervisor - Volker Engel, Godzilla Design & Supervisor - Patrick 
Tatopolous, Associate Visual Effects Supervisor - Karen Goulekas, 
Creature Supervisors - Kurt Carly & Bruce Marr, Creature & Digital 
Effects - Centropolis Effects, Digital Effects - Digiscope (Supervisor - 
Dion Hatch), Sony Pictures Imageworks (Supervisor - Jerome Chen) & 
Visionart (Supervisor - Joshua D. Rose), Miniature Effects - Cinnabar 
(Supervisor - Andrea Whittier), Sight Line Productions (Supervisor - Don 
Baker) & Striber Visual Network Inc (Supervisor - John Striber), 
Mechanical Effects Supervisor - Clay Pinney, Production Design - Oliver 
Scholl, Supervising Art Director - Wm. Ladd Skinner. Production Company 
- Centropolis Entertainment/Fried Films/Independant Pictures.
Matthew Broderick (Dr Niko Tatopolous), Maria Pitillo (Audrey Timmonds), 
Jean Reno (Philippe Roache), Hank Azaria (Victor `Animal' Palotti), 
Kevin Dunn (Colonel Hicks), Michael Lerner (Mayor Ebert), Arabella Field 
(Lucy Palotti), Harry Shearer (Charles Caiman), Vicki Lewis (Dr Elsie 
Chapman), Doug Savant (Sergeant O'Neal)
Plot: Dr Niko Tatopolous, a biologist with the US Atomic Energy 
Commission specializing in radiation-mutated lifeforms, is flown to the 
South Pacific to investigate reports of a giant lizard, mutated as a 
result of French nuclear testing, which is attacking shipping. But the 
creature, nicknamed `Gojira' by a Japanese survivor and mispronounced as 
`Godzilla' by the American media, heads to Manhattan Island where it 
rampages through the city streets, causing mass destruction. As the 
military rally all efforts to stop it, Niko tries to alert them to the 
fact that it has laid a nest of eggs somewhere in the city.
Sometimes one just ends up scratching their head and wondering what it 
is that drives public tastes and/or the opinion of critics. Two years 
before when `Independence Day' became less of a film than it did an 
event, this critic ended up scratching his head and wondering what made 
everybody go so crazy about something so one-dimensionally cliched and 
simplistically flag-waving. Now I find myself in almost the opposite 
position. Despite a mega-hype build-up that announced it was from the 
same people as and would be even bigger than `Independence Day', 
`Godzilla' has opened in the US and confounded all expectation to become 
a middling flop with the public and with critics everywhere rushing to 
junk it. In fact it is not a bad film at all. If the truth be told it is 
really quite the most enjoyable, unpretentious out-and-out monster movie 
that has come this in some time. Why all the negative hoopla is frankly 
beyond one - perhaps it is the absensce of flag-waving that disappointed 
people.
One didn't really expect much from the film at all. Director Roland 
Emmerich and his co-writer Dean Devlin do not make particularly good sf. 
Devlin writes by cliche and Emmerich directs in simplistic emotional 
cues and their combined body of work - `Universal Soldier' (1992), 
`Stargate' (1994), `Independence Day' (1996) and the tv series `The 
Visitor' (1997) - lacks anything appreciable in the way of original 
ideas or challenging treatments of any of the themes. `Independence Day' 
is the best example of all their faults - mindless mega-scale special 
effects for their own sake and the substitution for election 
campaign-type populist sentiments in the place of drama. `Stargate' is 
their best film up to this point, which at least counterbalances their 
cliched writing with what is Emmerich's forte - the ability to conjure 
an effectively dramatic sense of wonder across an epic widescreen scale.
`Godzilla' is of course an updating of the long-running Japanese monster 
series - begun with `Gojira' in 1954, and passing through some 
twenty-one sequels until the character was officially killed off in 
1995. Emmerich and Devlin do some occasionally clever updatings - in an 
amusingly contemporary move the creature has been mutated to giant-size 
by French nuclear testing in the Pacific. But mostly their writing is 
really terrible. Their characters are conceived as no more than 
caricatures - the French are snobbish about American junk food; the 
pompous mayor (who in an amusing move is named after one of the top US 
film critics) is a caricature that has been stolen straight from `Jaws'. 
And the romance between Matthew Broderick and vacuous bubble-gum blonde 
Maria Pitillo is appallingly written. The good thing about the film is 
that it rarely ever slows down enough to allow these one-dimensional 
figures time on screen.
The film is at its best when it is, without any pretensions, doing 
exactly what it has been designed to do - being a BIG scale, big-budget, 
no frills, thrill-a-minute rollercoaster ride of a monster movie. 
Something at which it succeeds more than admirably. Whenever Godzilla 
turns up on screen Emmerich unleashes some top drawer special effects - 
enthralling scenes of mass destruction with it smashing its way through 
downtown Manhattan and ripping swathes through entire skyscrapers with 
its tail alone; an oddly `Star Wars' Death Star trench-styled battle 
between it and army helicopters amid canyons of high-rise towers; an 
immensely exciting climax with it rampaging across and being trapped in 
a suspension bridge. Emmerich only unveils the creature gradually and 
keeps the camera down at ground level so as to heighten the sense of 
scale even more so. About three-quarters of the way through the film 
seems to abruptly kill Godzilla off and then gives the appearance of 
jumping tracks into another sort of film altogether with the principal 
characters fighting off a lethal bunch of baby Godzillas. The sequence 
is undeniably modelled after the raptor sequences in `Jurassic Park' but 
Emmerich whips it up into something intensely exciting. And as films go 
- compare it to the hollow soap opera of the same year's `Deep Impact' 
or the letdown that `The Lost World: Jurassic Park' was - you would be 
hard pressed to find any better adrenalin-charged, all-out effects 
excitement on the screen in the next while than `Godzilla'.


Title
Review for Blade (1998)
USA. 1998. Director - Stephen Norrington, Screenplay - David S. Goyer, 
Based on the Comic Book Created by Gene Colan & Marv Wolfman, Producers 
- Robert Engleman, Peter Frankfurt & Wesley Snipes, Photography - Theo 
Van Der Sande, Music - Mark Isham, Music Supervisor - Dana Sano, Visual 
Effects Supervisor - Chuck Comisky, Digital Visual & Miniature Effects - 
Blue Sky/VIFX (Supervisor - Richard Hollander), Visual Effects - 
Digiscope, 525 Post Productions and the Production Plant Inc, Flat Earth 
Productions (Supervisor - Kevin O'Neill), Image Savant (Supervisor - 
Richard `Dr' Brady), Post Logic & Wildcat Digital Effects, Special 
Effects Supervisor - Vincent Montefusco, Makeup Effects - Greg Cannom 
Creations, Additional Makeup Effects - Image Animation (Supervisor - 
Gary J. Tunnicliffe), Production Design - Kirk M. Petruccelli. 
Production Company - Imaginary Forces/Amen Ra Films/New Line Cinema.
Wesley Snipes (Blade), Stephen Dorff (Deacon Foster), N'Bushe Wright (Dr 
Karen Jenson), Kris Kristofferson (Abraham Whistler), Donal Logue 
(Quinn), Udo Kier (Dragonetti), Kevin Patrick Wells (Officer Krieger), 
Arly Jover (Mercury), Tim Guinee (Dr Curtis Webb), Sanaa Lathan (Vanessa 
Brooks)
Plot: In 1967 Vanessa Brooks is brought into a hospital, having been 
fatally bitten by a vampire, and at the same time goes into labour. She 
gives birth to a baby son before expiring. In the present day the child 
is now Blade, who, as a result of the bite, is half-vampire and 
half-human and can walk in the daylight but also has supernatural 
strength. Armed with titanium stakes and garlic and silver-filled 
shotgun shells, Blade conducts a single-handed campaign to slaughter all 
vampires in revenge for the murder of his mother. Blade finds a 
dangerous, new enemy in Deacon Frost, a radical vampire who poses a 
threat to the traditional vampires who own and control most of the city. 
Deacon wants to use the ancient vampire Bible to raise La Magra, the 
blood god, something that requires the spilling of Blade's half-human 
blood
Stephen Norrinton made a striking directorial debut with 1995's 'Death 
Machine', an effort that transcended its low-budget with a striking 
ferocity and energy and marked former effects man Norrington as one of 
the most promising of up and coming genre directors. 'Blade' is 
Norrington's second film and his debut in the American A-budget 
mainstream.
Although 'Blade' is not as intensive an all-out ride as 'Death Machine' 
was, Norrington succeeds in fulfilling his promise, injecting a 
considerable amount of stylistic elan into the film - notably a 
breathlessly intensive sequence with Snipes and vampires chasing one 
another through a subway tunnel alongside speeding trains and a climax 
with Snipes facing Dorff in sword combat with Snipes decapitating 
Dorff's torso and he simply regenerating it.
It is an adaption of the 1970s Marvel comic. The adaption comes from 
David S. Goyer who has been responsible for such darkly driven works as 
'Dark City' (1998) and 'The Crow: City of Angels' (1996). Goyer conducts 
some quite unique twists on vampire legend. If 'The Lost Boys', 'Near 
Dark' et al represent the transformation of the vampire into a kind of 
badass thug relishing the freedom of the modern world, then 'Blade' 
takes it to a logical extreme wherein the vampires are a kind of 
criminal underworld preying on humanity, secretly controlling the city 
and running vampire nightclubs which spray blood through the walls, 
treating would-be converts as a slave underclass even marking them as 
their own property. Indeed the film could almost read as an action film 
wherein Snipes might be a cop taking on a group of drug underlords with 
a considerable outlay of artillery fire. The plot though becomes 
considerably more cliche-driven in the latter quarter when Goyer has 
Dorff conducting cliched Lovecraftian rites to raise elder gods.
The film has been criticized as being a comic-book but the critics doing 
so seem to entirely elude the point that is exactly what it is meant to 
be. Here Norrington and Goyer do quite a decent job at capturing the 
dark nihilistic mood that drives modern screen comic-book adaptions. The 
film never quite resonates with the scintillatingly dark psychology of 
either of the first two 'Batman' films or 'The Crow', but then neither 
does it have the two-dimensional lack of depth of the 'Spawn' film or 
either of Joel Schumacher's 'Batman' abominations.
In an interesting move star Wesley Snipes also produces the film. One 
finds it hard though to understand Snipes' appeal as an actor. The man 
keeps coming across as rather thick every time he appears on screen. 
Whenever he does well in a part - in the likes of 'Jungle Fever' (1990) 
and 'Rising Sun' (1993) - it is because there is a good script on his 
side. Norrington seems to realize the limitations of Snipes' talents and 
works with it, giving him minimalistic dialogue and shooting everything 
he does as a stylized pose. He gives, for example, Snipes a fabulous 
entrance - slowly panning up from his boots to show him impressively 
decked out in shades, gleaming trenchcoat and black body armour. Indeed 
whenever Snipes removes his sunglasses and talks the character seems to 
lose much of its darkly driven mystique - the effectiveness of the 
character is a triumph of style over acting talent. On the other hand 
Stephen Dorff, although he does adequately, seems miscast as Deacon - 
the part requires someone into their thirties at least and Dorff comes 
across as far too youthful. Kristofferson is okay and N'Bushe Wright 
makes a promising debut.


Title
Review for Eighteenth Angel, The (1997)
USA. 1997. Director - William Brindley, Screenplay - David Seltzer, 
Producers - Douglas Curtis & William Hart, Photography - Thomas E. 
Ackerman, Music - Jeff Eden Fair & Dtarr Parodi, Visual Effects 
Supervisor - Jon Townley, Visual Effects - L2 Visual Effects, Digital 
Visual Effects D.Rez Hollywood (Supervisor - Howard Minkov), Special 
Effects - Richard Jones & Germano Natali, Makeup Effects - Kurtzman, 
Nicotero and Berger EFX Group Inc, Production Design - Stefano Maria 
Ortolani, Prague Clock Design - Gene Young Effects. Production Company - 
Rysher Entertainment.
Christopher McDonald (Hugh Stanton), Rachael Leigh Cook (Lucy Stanton), 
Maximilian Schell (Father Simeon), Enrica Maria Modugna (Maria Elena), 
Wendy Crewson (Norah Stanton), Stanley Tucci (Dr Todd Housen), Francesca 
De Capro (Gabriella), Branislav Tesanovic (Damiano), Stefano Vitali 
(Massimo Pena), Cosimo Fusco (Florian)
Plot: Beautiful fifteen year-old Lucy Stanton is offered a modelling 
course in Rome. But then her mother, who opposes the idea and is also 
digging up connections between the millenial prophecies of an 
astonomical clock predicting the return of Satan and their connection to 
an ancient order of Estruscan monks, falls from a roof in mysterious 
circumstances. Lucy's father Hugh agrees to go after he is offered the 
opportunity to study music at an Italian monastery. But amid a series of 
mysterious deaths, Hugh begins to discover that the monastery is really 
a part of the Estrucan order who are preparing the way for the coming of 
Satan, one which requires the bodies of eighteen beautiful girls to be 
offered for Satan to choose one to incarnate in, and that Lucy has been 
selected as one of these `angels'.
`The Eighteenth Angel' comes from screenwriter David Seltzer. Seltzer 
has written various films like `Lucas' (1986), `Punchline' (1988) and 
`Bird on a Wire' (1990) but is principally remembered for `The Omen' 
(1976). And maybe if `The Eighteenth Angel' if had come from someone 
other than Seltzer, it might have seemed a competent copy of `The Omen'. 
But coming from Seltzer it reads as a pallid and unimaginative attempt 
to rehash the same plot all over again. The points of similarity often 
become tedious - another plot concerning the Biblical End of the World 
and the birth of Satan in the form of a young child; a sinisterly 
conspiring coven within the Catholic church - who also hide in an 
ancient monastery in the Italian hillside; gory showcase deaths to those 
who get in the way of the Satanic master plan; killer animals in the 
service of The Devil - dogs in `The Omen', killer cats here; evil 
servants and so forth. Plus an almost identical twist ending.
Seltzer, it seems - both here, in `The Omen' and in his 1979 eco-horror 
film `Prophecy' (1979) - has a kind of wild-eyed sackcloth-and-ashes 
prophet's fascination with the imminently apocalyptic. `The Omen' had an 
audacious kind of originality to it with Seltzer whipping a frenzied 
hodgepodge of fundamentalist End Times prophecies into a lunatic horror 
show which was subsequently given a sheen of respectability  by an 
A-budget treatment which with a high-profile advertizing campaign 
succeeded in making it a major hit. It was endlessly imitated.`The 
Eighteenth Angel' comes across as a proficient and well-budgeted copy 
but alas one where Seltzer, in revisiting the material, does absolutely 
nothing new with it. There's a minimal thematic difference - `The Omen' 
featured merely an evil child while `The Eighteenth Angel' raises the 
age of the child a few years and features the potentially more 
intriguing corruption of an innocent theme (although again does 
absolutely nothing with it).
Almost as though he has failed to understand anything that made `The 
Omen' work, Seltzer fumbles all his cues here. The plot gives away all 
its surprises at the very beginning - the opening narration tells us all 
about the ancient Etruscan order and the need for eighteen angels to 
incarnate the Devil. A far more effective story would have enwrapped one 
in its mysteriousness and then slowly unveiled each surprise as it went 
along. Nor is Seltzer very clear about what the Satanic master plan 
actually entails - something to do with genetic engineering and the need 
for eighteen maidens who, for reasons unexplained, have to have their 
faces sliced off and transplanted onto corpses.
Where the film seems almost to work is in its A-budget polish - it is 
very nicely scored and photographed - and in director Brindley's often 
quite effective handling. Where Seltzer offers up predictable twists, 
Brindley at least crafts them with a sinister edge. There is one 
memorably way-out showcase death with a character being caught up in and 
hung in the bridles between two galloping black horses. Unlike `The 
Omen', which succeeded for much these same reasons, however Seltzer's 
plot is a second-hand copy of his own material that lacks the fire that 
made the original a success. 


Title
Review for Addiction, The (1995)
USA. 1994. Director - Abel Ferrara, Screenplay - Nicholas St. John, 
Producers - Denis Hann & Fernando Sulichin, Photography (b&w) - Ken 
Kelsch, Music - Joe Delia, Production Design - Charles Lagola,. 
Production Company - Fast Films.
Lili Taylor (Kathleen Conklin), Edie Falco (Jean), Christopher Walken 
(Pena), Paul Caldaron (Professor), Kathryn Erbe (Anthropology Student), 
Annabella Sciorra (Casanova)
Plot: Philosophy student Kathleen Conklin is bitten by and transformed 
into a vampire. As she succumbs to the vampiric urges she comes to 
understand that the vampire is really a mirror of the cruelty and 
violence that is at the heart of human nature.
The concept of the vampire was inherited into Western popular culture 
via Bram Stoker's `Dracula'. As a result of Stoker's legacy the vampire 
has always been rooted in Christian concepts of good and evil with the 
vampire representing an animal sexuality hidden beneath the decorum of 
mannered society being despatched by confident men who stride a resolute 
line between science and religion. The cinematic vampire was popularized 
by the Bela Lugosi ‘Dracula' in 1931 and the hundreds of vampire films 
that have followed since have almost all fallen into this symbolic 
resonance. But in the 1970s and 80s the vampire film began to abandon 
classical notions of good and evil. Firstly it was the tacit recognition 
of films like ‘Count Yorga, Vampire' (1970), `Dracula A.D. 1972' (1972), 
`Blacula' (1972) and `Love at First Bite' (1979) that the Victorian 
trappings of the vampire film only had limited potential and that the 
vampire in cape and dinner-suit cut a rather absurd, unthreatening 
figure when brought into the present.
In the 1980s and beyond, the vampire film began to implicitly accept the 
death of the traditional reason and religion vs bestial nature dualism. 
But ironically instead of dying out the vampire film began to flourish 
more than ever before. The resulting films could be thrown into three 
rough categories - those which overtly spoofed and parodied the 
traditional vampire (the likes of ‘Dracula: Dead and Loving It', `I 
Bought a Vampire Motorcycle', `Vampire Trailer Park') or conducted 
generic pastiches (ie vampire cop show - tv's `Forever Knight', vampire 
getaway film - `From Dusk Till Dawn', vampire mafia - `Innocent Blood'). 
Or else those films which dragged the vampire into the modern world and 
transformed the character into a kind of badass punk - `The Lost Boys', 
`Near Dark', `Blade'. And thirdly those which inverted the metaphors of 
Bram Stoker about sexual repression to turn vampirism into a kind of 
dark, sensual forbidden romance - the `Graveyard Shift' films, `Bram 
Stoker's Dracula', `To Die For', `The Nosferatu Diaries: Embrace of the 
Vampire'.
The rarest among the new vampire films have been those which have sought 
to reinvent and question the metaphors of vampirism. The first film to 
try this was ‘Incense for the Damned' aka `Bloodsuckers' (1969) which 
ambitiously tried to develop vampirism as a metaphor for sexual 
impotency.  But the film that really succeeded here was the exceptional 
`Martin' (1976) which pared all classical mythology away with rather 
startling effect - contrasting a pallid and weak bloodsucker up against 
his family who insisted with absurdly cruel inappropriateness on 
classical religious symbolism. Other notable examples might be the 
German film ‘Jonathan' (1970) which transformed vampirism into a 
metaphor for Nazism and feudalism and the underrated ‘Interview with the 
Vampire: The Vampire Chronicles' (1994) which conducted an elegant 
vampiric existential quest with the hero setting out with the question 
if he is not evil, what then is the purpose of his condition.
`The Addiction' is another of these rare attempts at re-evaluation. The 
film was directed by Abel Ferrara, who has made the likes of `Driller 
Killer' (1979), `Ms. 45' (1980), `Bad Lieutenant' (1992) and `Body 
Snatchers' (1993). Throughout almost all of Ferrara and his writing 
partner Nicholas St John's work lie twin themes - a fascination with the 
darkest depths that the human soul is capable of scouring and the belief 
in the redemptive power of Catholicism. These twin fascinations find 
their most potent expression in `Bad Lieutenant' - a muck-scouring 
excoriation of human degradation that eventually finds Catholic 
redemption in the forgiving of a killer. And in some ways `The 
Addiction' is almost like a reiteration of `Bad Lieutenant'  with Lili 
Taylor's vampire philosophy doctorate in the place of Harvey Keitel's 
drugged-out, woebegone cop,  conducting in philosophical terms the same 
descent into all that is vile before finding its salvation.
`The Addiction' has a tendency to make one feel like they are being hit 
over the head by the collected works of Western nihilist philosophy. The 
film quotes Sartre and Kierkegaard and engages in debates about 
determinism and redemption through guilt while Ferrara-regular 
Christopher Walken turns up as a vampire who sees himself as an avatar 
of Nietzschean meta-morality. It is quite the weightiest film that one 
has seen in some time. But at the same time Ferrara and St John turn it 
into an extraordinary meditation on human nature and its fundamental 
predisposition toward evil. They see the vampire as a complex metaphor 
for an evil that is endemic to human nature. "The old saying that `Those 
who do not learn from history are doomed to repeat it' is a lie," 
meditates Taylor. "The real question is what can be done to stop the 
blight spreading." The film bombards one with images of Me Lei and the 
Holocaust - in the opening scene alone Taylor exits a Holocaust museum 
and debates what the point is of convicting political leaders of war 
crimes when war crimes are crimes of mass guilt. The complexity of this 
metaphor leads to some startling reinventions of classical vampire 
mythology - the vampire cannot stand to look in a mirror because mirrors 
reflect the raw, exposed face of evil; the reason they are undead is 
because evil cannot die. Ferrera also offers up some strikingly modern 
images of vampirism - in one scene Taylor shooting up blood with a 
syringe like an addict. Although after conducting such an extraordinary 
and gloomily bleak excavation of the human condition, Taylor and 
Ferrara's acceptance of the redeeming power of Catholicism at the end 
seems a little glib and even cursory.
In the end it is not the best of Ferrara's films. The philosophical 
heaviness of it stands in the way of easy entertainment value and some 
corner-cutting lower-budget values are apparent at times. But what 
cannot be denied is that it is a powerful and complex reworking of the 
central metaphors of vampirism. Compare it to `Nadja' which was released 
only a few months after `The Addiction'. Both are very similar films - 
both are shot in black-and-white and both feature a predatory female 
vampire stalking the modern world.  But whereas `Nadja' was merely 
content with conducting a stylistic pastiche of `Dracula's Daughter' 
(1936), `The Addiction' tackles the challenge of mounting an entire 
philosophical reconception of vampirism.


Title
Review for Twilight of the Ice Nymphs (1997)
Canada. 1997. Director - Guy Maddin, Screenplay - George Toles, Producer 
- Ritchard Findlay, Photography - Michael Marshall, Music - John 
McCulloch, Production Design - Reginald Lebrie. Production Company - 
Marble Island Pictures.
Nigel Whitmey [uncredited] (Peter Glahn), Pascale Bussieres (Juliana 
Kossel), R.H. Thomson (Dr Isaac Solti), Shelley Duval (Amelia Glahn), 
Alice Krige (Zephyr Eccles), Frank Gorshin (Cain Ball)
Plot: Just released from prison and returning to his home in the land of 
Mandragora where the sun never sets, Peter Glahn falls in love with the 
beautiful but mysterious Juliana Kossel. Upon his return Peter finds his 
ostrich farmer sister Amelia engaged in a bitter battle with her hired 
hand who expects to be deeded the title of her farm. Zephyr Eccles, who 
has been abandoned pregnant by her husband, falls for Peter and gives 
her wedding ring to the ice nymph so that she might have him. But then 
the object of Amelia's desire, the sinister Dr Solti, arrives with his 
fiancee - Juliana - whom he has really hypnotized and made speak words 
of love to Peter. This circle of frustrated desires all comes to a head 
at once.
Canada's Guy Maddin is often alikened to David Lynch. Such a comparison 
is not really accurate and is probably born more of the lack of anything 
else that Maddin's work can easily be easily compared to. Certainly 
Lynch and Maddin have weird cinema pegged out between them. But where 
Lynch's work has a dark obsessiveness tempered with a kind of cod 
deadpan banality, Maddin's is all cod deadpan banality - which is about 
the only real point of intersection that the two have. Maddin's work - 
`Tales from the Gimli Hospital' (1989), `Archangel' (1990), `Careful' 
(1992), and this - feels as though it takes place in alternate worlds 
that have been constructed as kitsch homages to lost styles of 
film-making. Maddin is particularly fond of German cinema with his films 
frequently evoking Expressionism (the ghost of Dr Caligari surely hangs 
over the character of Dr Solti here) and Heimat cinema. At the same time 
all of Maddin's stylistic evocations are run over with what sounds like 
the hysterical purple prose from a bad romantic novel.
`Twilight' is set in another Maddin world that seems to have emerged 
from some kind of demented Wagnerian opera. As always in a Maddin film, 
the world is created with a deliberate stagey artificiality - all the 
sets look like they have been built for the enchanted forest in a 
high-school pantomime. The dialogue is suitably inscrutable Maddin-esque 
prose - "We are naked under these clothes," lovers solemnly proclaim. Or 
"When an agreement is signed it is time to chop down the trees"; and 
after Alice Krige gives Nigel Whitmey a purple negligee to wear: "You 
can wear my clothes until doomsday but it won't make you any more of a 
woman, just less of a man." The story is an amusing rondeau of 
frustrated wants among the various characters. Here R.H. Thomson 
intoning with an amusingly solemn sotto voce gravitas makes a memorable 
impression as the sinister Svengali figure Solti. Although in the end 
`Twilight' never quite strikes one with either the same sublime 
combination of stylized weirdness and melodramatic banality that 
Maddin's marvellous `Careful' did - it's more of the same but slightly 
lesser. The film has Maddin's largest budget yet - only about $2.5 
million would one believe - which allows him to shoot in colour for the 
first time and to employ name actors such as Shelley Duval and Alice 
Krige. 
Reviewed at the 1998 Wellington International Film Festival
Copyright Richard Scheib 1998


Title
Review for Soldier (1998)
USA. 1998. Director - Paul Anderson, Screenplay - David Webb Peoples, 
Producer - Jerry Weintraub, Photography - David Tattersall, Music - Joel 
McNeely, Visual Effects Supervisor - Ed Jones, Visual Effects - Matte 
World Digital (Supervisor - Craig Barron) & Rhythm and Hues (Supervisor 
- Jon Lesser), Miniatures - Cinema Producer Services (Supervisor - Mike 
Boyd), Digital Effects - Rainmaker Digital Pictures (Supervisor - Doug 
Tubach), Special Effects Supervisor - Clay Pinney, Makeup Effects 
Supervisor - Steve La Porte, Production Design - David L. Snyder. 
Production Company - Warners/Morgan Creek/Impact Pictures/JW (Jerry 
Weintraub) Productions.
Kurt Russell (Todd), Sean Pertwee (Mace), Connie Nielsen (Sarah), Jason 
Isaacs (Colonel Mekum), Gary Busey (Captain Church), Jason Scott Lee 
(Caine 607), Michael Chiklis (Jimmy)
Plot: In the year 2036 Todd is a solider who has been programmed from 
birth as an emotionless killing machine. But then the ruthless Colonel 
Mekum introduces a new and superior breed of genetically-engineered 
soldier designed to replace the other soldiers. Todd is defeated up 
against Mekum's top soldier, Caine 607, and, left for dead, is dumped on 
the garbage world of Arcadia 234. But Todd there survives and is granted 
refuge by a group of survivors from a crashed spaceship who have built 
their own peaceful community. However his emotionless and violent 
reactions have him barred from the community. But as Mekum's forces move 
in and start exterminating the community, perceiving it as a military 
threat, Todd becomes their unexpected saviour.
'Soldier' came with enormous promise - there were many that hailed it as 
a film that had the potential to become a genre landmark. It had a 
script from David Webb Peoples who had written such genre classics as 
'Blade Runner' (1982) and 'Twelve Monkeys' (1995), as well as having won 
a Best Original Screenplay Oscar for the stunning anti-Western 
'Unforgiven' (1992). The advance word on the film was good - Kurt 
Russell was so enamoured with the script that he changed his schedule on 
other films so that he could star. And one can see much has been placed 
into the production - the film is clearly made on an A-budget.
Which all adds up to make 'Soldier' seem even more of a disappointment. 
What held the potential to be a landmark genre film turns out a 
surprisingly ordinary variant on the cliched humanization of the inhuman 
soldier/android theme tried and familiar from the likes of Harlan 
Ellison's script for 'The Outer Limits' (1963) also entitled 'Soldier' 
and films like 'Terminator 2: Judgement Day' (1991), 'Universal Solider' 
(1992) and 'Solo' (1996). Indeed the story arc that 'Soldier' carves is 
so identical to 'Solo' - programmed soldier/android gets free from 
military control, discovers a human side amid a group of simple but 
honest villagers and stands up in armed conflict against his military 
programmers and, at the climax, in hand-to-hand combat with his intended 
successor - that one is tempted to cry plagiarism. There are also times 
where it is just shabbily written - Jason Isaacs' colonel is 
single-dimensional and cliched, we never get to learn what drives his 
ruthlessness, and his decision to cleanse the garbage world is very 
poorly motivated.
The film proves a competent-enough run through of all the cliches and 
had it been made on a much smaller, more intimate scale one suspects it 
might have been a considerably more likeable film. It's just on the 
A-budget it is made on, its cliches collapse into over-inflated 
pretension. The scenes among the people on the garbage world are so 
pumped up with patently artificial emotive cues - the honest and earnest 
simplicity of the communal lifestyle, ragged but plaintive orphans, the 
woman shot in warm and sensual silhouettes, even for God's sake the 
pseudo-Celtic wailings of Loreena McKennit on the soundtrack - that it 
collapses into a forcedness that verges on the absurd. It all mounts to 
an efficiently large scale but unmemorable action climax. Director Paul 
Anderson (no relation to 'Boogie Nights' director Paul Thomas Anderson) 
is clearly shaping up as a regular genre contributor - he debuted with 
the unpretentiously enjoyable 'Mortal Kombat' in 1995 and made 1997's 
'Event Horizon', where his directorial style triumphed despite one of 
the most brainless scripts of any sf film in recent years. But, as 
'Event Horizon' and this show, Anderson has a good deal of talent but 
clearly little discernment when it comes to scripts.
The film is almost saved by Kurt Russell's performance. Or more 
ironically and accurately, his lack of a performance. The very blankness 
of Russell's battle-scarred face, the subtly-made up sunkenness of his 
eyes, the blank minimalism of the dialogue he gets, creates a character 
that fascinates in its hollowness. All the emotion comes to be in the 
smallest movements of the eyes.


Title
Review for Halloween: The Curse of Michael Myers (1995)
HALLOWEEN: THE CURSE OF MICHAEL MYERS
USA. 1995. Director - Joe Chappelle, Screenplay - Daniel Farrands, 
Producer - Paul Freeman, Photography - Billy Dickson, Additional 
Photography - Tom Calloway, Music - Alan Howarth, Halloween Theme - John 
Carpenter, Special Effects Supervisor - Larry Fioritto, Makeup Effects - 
Magical Media Industries Inc (Designer/Supervisor - John Buechler), 
Additional Makeup Effects - Image Animation (Supervisor - Gary J. 
Tunicliffe), Production Design - Bryan Ryman. Production Company - 
Nightfall Productions.
Marianne Hagan (Kara Strode), Paul Stephen Rudd (Tommy Doyle), Donald 
Pleasence (Dr Sam Loomis), George P. Wilbur (The Shape/Michael Myers), 
J.C. Brandy (Jamie Lloyd), Kim Darby (Debra Strode), Bradford English 
(John Strode), Mitchell Ryan (Dr Terence Wynn), Devin Gardner (Danny 
Strode), Keith Bogart (Tim Strode), Mariah O'Brien (Beth), Janice 
Knickrehm (Mrs Blankenship)
Plot: Michael Myers returns to Haddonfield on Halloween night where he 
stalks Laurie Strode's cousin Kara and her family who have moved into 
the old Myers house. Kara's nerdish neighbour Tommy Doyle discovers 
abandoned the baby that is the last surviving inheritor of the Myers 
name that Michael is determined to kill. As he tries to protect the baby 
he discovers that Michael Myers is the incarnation of an ancient druidic 
personification of evil and is being sought by a group of modern druidic 
cultists in the town.
A strong case could be made that John Carpenter's cult 1978 hit 
`Halloween' was a film that shaped the face of the modern horror film. 
With `Halloween' Carpenter set out with no real intent other than to 
craft a pure rollercoaster ride of jolts and shocks. `Halloween's appeal 
rested as much in the ability to streamline the horror film into a pure 
shock machine, as it was to take it out of the shadows of Hammer Gothic 
and the melodramatic thriller contrivations of `Psycho' and its ilk and 
make it a wholly modern new form. The film's influence can be felt 
through an enormous number of other films from `Friday the 13th' and `A 
Nightmare on Elm Street' and their various sequels and imitators through 
to the obvious homages in the current `Scream' films.
After the success of `Halloween', Carpenter oversaw the obligatory 
`Halloween II' in 1981 but then with 1982's `Halloween III: Season of 
the Witch' tried to use the `Halloween' name to kick off an original, 
unlinked anthology series. That was an idea that promptly went nowhere. 
Carpenter then sold out interest in the franchise and 1988's `Halloween: 
The Return of Michael Myers' made a predictably sequelistic return to 
The Shape/Michael Myers saga. By the time of this, the fifth sequel to 
`Halloween', a thorough sense of pointlessness hangs over the series. 
What stood `Halloween' above the mostly worthless run of slasher film 
imitators - the `Friday the 13th' films being a perfect example - was 
the seat-edge directorial grip with which it was crafted. Sadly what 
made `Halloween' work is a lesson that almost no slasher film succeeded 
in learning, with almost all  substituting potpourris of gory despatches 
and a lineup of faceless teen victims over the creation of suspense and 
characters that one could give a damn about. And even more sadly this is 
a lesson that all of the `Halloween' sequels have even failed to learn 
from the source they owe their own name to.
There are occassional moments were director Joe Chappelle seems on the 
verge of rediscovering some of the style that Carpenter infused the 
original with - the there again/gone again pop-up tricks and the spooky 
peripheral shots with The Shape appearing on the edge of the camera 
frame or behind people's shoulders. But these occasional moments are 
ruined by pointlessly gory payoffs which show the film has no real focus 
above the conveyor belt line of splattery novelty deaths served up in 
the average `Friday the 13th' sequel. The exercise is disappointingly 
hollow and by comparison manages to make both `Halloween's II' and `IV'  
suddenly seem a whole lot better by comparison.
The film is further shot in by a plot which throws in an absurd spin 
that turns Michael Myers into some druidic avatar of evil incarnate. The 
explanation for this is murky and sounds just as silly when offered up 
on screen as it does in description here.  Even more ill explained are a 
series of subplots that reveal several of the cast members as belonging 
to some type of baby-snatching druidic cult that wants Michael Myers and 
the last surviving Myers baby. (Why, is never made clear). You could 
almost argue that the film might be trying to establish some type of 
grand  thematic link to unite itself up with the druidic witchcraft plot 
of the unconnected `Halloween III'. But in truth the film is shabbily, 
indifferently plotted and a disgracefully poor blackening of the eminent 
name of its original that it bears.


Title
Review for Saludos Amigos (1943)
USA. 1943. Sequence Directors - Wilfred Jackson, Jack Kinney, Ham Luske 
& Bill Roberts, Story - Homer Brightman, Joe Grant, Dick Huemer, Harry 
Reeves, Roy Williams & Ralph Wright, Music - Ed Plumb & Paul Smith, 
Music `Aquarela do Brasil - Ary Baroso, Musical Director - Charles 
Woolcott, Art Supervisors - Lee & Mary Blair, Jim Bodrero, Jack Miller & 
Herb Ryman. Production Company - Disney.
Voices: Clarence Nash [uncredited] (Donald Duck), Pinto Colvig 
[uncredited] (Goofy), Jose Oliveira (Joe Carroca), Fred Shields 
(Narrator)
Plot: A group of Disney artists go on a tour of Latin America in search 
of inspiration. The results:- Donald Duck takes a comic tour of Lake 
Titicaca and the Chilean mountains; when his father falls ill the young 
mailplane Pedro must make a perilous mail pickup across the treacherous 
Andean range but runs afoul of storms created by a famous bad-tempered 
mountain; the cowboy Goofy is transported from Texas and transformed 
into a gaucho in the Argentinean pampas regions; the parrot Jose Carroca 
takes Donald Duck on a singing-dancing tour of Rio de Janeiro.
`Saludos Amigos' was made by Disney during The War. It was a time when 
conscription had gutted the pool of available Disney artists. Disney 
dealt with this by downsizing from feature length animation to 
portmanteau-styled animation anthologies - with the likes of `Melody 
Time', `Make Mine Music', `Song of the South', `Fun & Fancy Free', `The 
Adventures of Ichabod and Mr Toad' and `The Three Caballeros'. And, 
although none of the anthologies were really bad, this diversion into 
these compilation anthologies was a considerable comedown from the 
heights Disney had climbed at the beginning of the 1940s with the likes 
of `Dumbo', `Pinocchio' and `Bambi' and for several years the studios 
grace fell in the public eye. It took until the 1950s for Disney to 
return to feature-length animation but even then many of the features 
somehow felt lesser films and there was the sense that some Golden Age 
of Disney animation that had passed away never to be regained.
`Saludos Amigos' has one of the most unique concepts ever tried in 
animation - that of the animated travelogue. At the time it was made the 
Latin American market held one of the largest fan audiences of 
characters like Donald Duck and Mickey Mouse. And along with `The Three 
Caballeros', it shows Disney trying to tap directly into this market - 
in some segments here even the background lettering comes in Spanish 
which suggests that Disney was thinking of the Hispanic market even 
ahead of the English-speaking one.
The whole exercise has clearly been conducted as an experiment and as 
such it is somewhat hit and miss. As the travelogue it sets out to be, 
it is rather cursory, only visiting four Latin American locations - Lake 
Titicaca, The Andes, Argentina and Rio - and leaving the rest of the 
region untouched. And for a feature it is surprisingly short - only 
forty minutes in length - it could easily have supported at least two or 
three more segments.
The first, third and fourth segments keep fairly much to the travelogue 
format but the second seems really more of an original short. The first 
and third segments are the most consistent in tone, using familiar 
Disney characters in lively slapstick scenarios to demonstrate the 
features and culture of the various regions. The `Portrait of Brasil' 
segment, sort of an impressionistic samba number, is the slightest. 
However the second segment is a pure delight where the Disney animators' 
penchant for dewey-eyed anthropomorphism in the characterization of the 
baby plane is utterly gorgeous - it struggling through storms with a 
mail bag tucked under its wing, coughing and spluttering as it runs out 
of fuel, going to school to learn `reading and sky-writing' and the 
like. This is one segment that one wishes had been longer.


Title
Review for Bai fa mo nu zhuan II (1993)
THE BRIDE WITH WHITE HAIR 2 (Bai fa mo nu zhuan II)
Hong Kong. 1993. Director/Screenplay - David Wu, Producer - Ronnie Yu. 
Production Company - Mandarin Films.
Sunny Chun (Fung Chun Kit), Brigitte Lin (Lien Ni Chang), Joey Memg 
(Lyre), Christy Chung (Ling Moon Yee), Leslie Cheung (Cho Yi Hang), Ruth 
Winona Tao (Chen Yuen Yuen)
Plot: After her betrayal by Cho Yi Hang, the white-haired witch Lien Ni 
Chang has obtained revenge by slaughtering her way through all of the 
Eight Clans. She abducts Lyre, the bride of Fung Chun Kit, the last 
surviving member of the Wu Tang Clan, on their wedding night and takes 
her to her castle of men-hating warrior women. As Kit gathers a ragtag 
fighting force to storm her castle, Lien Ni Chang drugs Lyre so she will 
hate and kill Kit.
As Hong Kong's Wu Xia Pan (fantastic martial arts/swordplay) cycle went, 
Ronnie Yu's `The Bride with White Hair' (1993) was a fairly slapdash 
effort, directed with some style but also undeniably uneven. With 
director Yu having departed for the West and films like`Warriors of 
Virtue' (1997) and `Bride of Chucky' (1998), the reins of this sequel 
have been turned over to David Wu who actually makes the sequel a far 
more satisfying effort than its predecessor was.
The plot is definitely slight (even as Wu Xia Pan goes), but director Wu 
crafts it all with a much more pleasing roundedness. The heroism and 
swordplay all comes marvellously posed. And with the granny and tomboy 
warrior characters there comes a delightful undertow of comedy that was 
lacking in the more sombre original. The film takes awhile to build a 
full head of steam but once it gets underway into the familiar wild and 
crazy mid-air sword battles and impossible martial arts flips it is a 
good deal of fun. Wu does overdose with a little too much in the way of 
arty slow-motion camerawork but otherwise the film is quite satisfying.


Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
THE X FILES aka THE X-FILES; THE X FILES: FIGHT THE FUTURE
USA. 1998. Director - Rob Bowman, Screenplay - Chris Carter, Story - 
Carter & Frank Spotnitz, Producers - Carter & Daniel Sackheim, 
Photography - Ward Russell, Music - Mark Snow, Visual Effects Supervisor 
- Mat Beck, Visual Effects - Blue Sky/VIFX (Supervisor - John Nash), 
Light Matter Inc/Pixel Envy, Todd-AO/Hollywood Visual Images (Supervisor 
- Pete Kozcera), Federal Building Sequence - Hunter-Gratzner Industries, 
Miniature Effects Supervisor - Scott Schneider, Special Effects 
Supervisor - Paul Lombardi, Makeup Effects -Amalgamated Dynamics 
(Supervisors - Tom Gillis & Alec Woodruff Jr), Prosthetic Makeup Effects 
- Lance Anderson & Craig Reardon, Additional Makeup Effects - Kurtzman, 
Nicotero, Berger EFX Group Inc, Production Design - Christopher Nowak, 
Supervising Art Director - Marc Pischiella. Production Company - Ten 
Thirteen Productions.
David Duchovny (Special Agent Fox Mulder), Gillian Anderson (Special 
Agent Dana Scully), Martin Landau (Dr Alvin Kurtzweil), John Neville 
(Well-Manicured Man), William B. Davis (Cigarette-Smoking Man), Mitch 
Pileggi (Assistant Director Walter Skinner), Blythe Danner (Jane 
Cassidy), Terry O'Quinn (SAC Darius Michaud), Armin Mueller-Stahl 
(Conrad Strughold), Jeffrey DeMunn (Dr Ben Bronschweig), Lucas Black 
(Stevie Richardson), Dean Haglund (Langley), Bruce Harwood (Byers), Tom 
Braidwood (Melvin Frohike)
Plot: FBI agents Fox Mulder and Dana Scully of the defunct X Files 
paranormal investigation division are brought before an investigating 
committee, blamed for negligence when a bomb defusal at a Federal 
building in Dallas goes wrong. But then Mulder encounters a conspiracy 
fanatic who provides him with information that leads him to discover 
that the bomb was really detonated to destroy several bodies infected 
with a prehistoric alien virus uncovered in Texas. As they investigate, 
the international cabal working in collaboration with alien invaders to 
unleash the virus, seek to stop Mulder by infecting Scully with the 
virus.
In the same way that we can now look back at the frenetic outpouring of 
alien invasion and atomic monster films of the 1950s with a fascination 
at just how much they reflect the insecurity of the times, future 
historians will no doubt similarly look back at the incredible 
outpouring of paranoia and conspiracy films and tv series at the moment 
as indicative of something deeply upsetting about the 1990s. For if this 
body of films and tv series is any reflection of the way society thinks 
then society is surely rent to the darkest places of the soul by a sense 
of distrust and paranoia; a loss of identity; a recurrent belief that 
the government is covering up the truth; the belief that there is 
something fundamentally rotten at the heart of many respected social 
institutions; and the recurring surety that some golden past has been 
inevitably corrupted and that society is falling towards a moral 
collapse. The widespread prevalence of these sentiments (at least in the 
American media) and the darkness of their presentation is something that 
borders on the positively pathological.
Blame it all on Oliver Stone and 1991's `JFK' which really started the 
whole conspiracy/loss of the American dream thing off. (A substantial 
number of these films and series start the beginning of the corruption 
of American society with the Kennedy assassination). But it was `The X 
Files' in 1993 which tied the conspiracy angle to alien abductions and 
the great conspiracy junkie conviction that something happened in 
Roswell, New Mexico in 1947. As a series `The X Files' has conducted, 
with considerable wit and elegance, a number of fresh and inventive 
takes on traditional and not-so traditional forms of ghost and monster 
stories. And beneath the series is this cool, shadowy conspiratorial 
edginess that touches a bone of 1990s alienation that seems like it just 
could be real - and indeed has made the series into a cult phenomenon. 
What does strike one about `The X Files' and others like `Nowhere Man' 
(1995) and `Dark Skies' (1996) that have sought to imitate it, is the 
novelty of their storytelling - they are the only series where the 
hero/heroine lose each week. Indeed despite the proclamation "The truth 
is out there" over the credits of `The X Files', the format of the 
series is really dependent on the truth never being uncovered.
Now comes `The X Files' (or else `The X-Files' if you read the end 
credits) which attempts to spin the series cult popularity out into a 
cinematic franchise. Whether the movie remains just a one-off experiment 
or whether it becomes the torch-carrier for the series future, remains 
to be seen at this point. The film has met with a relatively 
disappointing box-office performance which has apparently stamped some 
question over future films.
There are an interesting number of comparisons that can be made between 
`The X Files' movie and `Star Trek: Generations' in 1994 - both are 
remarkably similar in the way they were made and the problems they 
contain. Both were construed as the initial attempts to launch a popular 
tv series as a cinematic franchise; both were made very close to the end 
of shooting schedules on the tv series; both were disappointments with 
their intended fan audiences; and both seem uncomfortable with the 
widescreen format, looking more like feature-length tv episodes than 
films that have been designed as big-screen features.
The film seems uneasily caught between trying to offer up the series' 
cultists what they expect of it and trying to reiterate the gist of the 
series all over anew for any audience members that may have wandered in 
not having seen the series - and as a result has really ended up 
pleasing neither crowd. Indeed a good part of its approach and a 
substantial portion of its predicted earnings was gambled on attracting 
new fans in the theatres. But a good reason for the film's lack of 
expected box-office take may well be that its advertizing campaign was 
gambled entirely on selling the film to the fan audience rather than 
seeking to attract new audiences. All the advance that new audiences 
were given was simply a poster which told nothing about the film. 
Details of the plot were kept under a screen of absolute secrecy until 
the film's release. The stills available seemed the dullest imaginable - 
only a variety of shots of Mulder and Scully walking down corridors and 
in bare fields. One suspects that such an approach ended up being 
counter-productive - that it created a film that nobody knew anything 
about except those guaranteed to be drawn by the series brand name. In 
all likelihood the film's lack of real success has been this critical 
miscalculation in its promotional campaign and its failure to draw 
anybody new in.
The story only really seems like a reshuffling of the basic plot 
developments and cliches of the last three seasons of the series. Stop 
me if you have heard this before:- not one but two different people 
involved on the inside of the big conspiracy and/or claiming connection 
to Mulder's father accost him in back alleys to provide cryptic 
information (that points him in the direction the plot needs to go); the 
FBI seek to close down the X Files; the FBI conduct Internal Affairs 
investigations where blame is placed on Mulder and Scully as part of a 
coverup; Mulder and/or Scully are on the verge of giving up altogether 
in the face of the overwhelming attempt to silence them until a fresh 
piece of alien evidence and conspiratorial activity sets them on the 
trail anew; Scully is infected with a disease to which there is no known 
medical cure; Scully is abducted; Mulder must trek all the way to an 
alien base hidden under the polar ice caps; alien DNA is uncovered in 
the remains of cavemen; innocent boys are infected by the Black Oil and 
the incident quickly covered up; the cabal meets in shadowed rooms and 
in cryptic terms plot massive coverups and how to silence Mulder; 
mysterious viral experiments are being conducted on the unwitting 
populace and so on. 
The problem with `The X Files' as a tv series is that it started 
superbly with inventive one-off stories and its spooky, shadowy glimpses 
into the dark places operating behind the government. But while with the 
most recent two seasons the series has been riding at an absolute 
artistic peak and conducting some of the best one-off stories so far 
(`Musings of a Cigarette Smoking Man', `Home', `Postmodern Prometheus', 
`Bad Blood' to name but a handful), the series has tended to fall down 
when it comes to its continuing elaboration of its own mythology and 
backstory. Unlike `Babylon 5' which has a similarly complicated and 
elaborate series of unfolding revelations, you get the feeling `The X 
Files' is building a rather rickety structure as it is going along 
rather than adhering to a coherent preplanned grand schema. The 
backstory has now become so complicated it is near impossible to keep 
track of all the subplots involving black oil, alien wars, clones, 
shape-changing assassains, alien abductions and implants, who is who's 
father and sibling, and all the conspiracies within the conspiracies. In 
last season's two-parter `Patient X/The Red and the Black' it became 
impossible to work out whose side which group of aliens were on and who 
the traitor Krycek was really working for.
The same problem spills over here. The film is stuck with a sprawlingly 
complicated plot which tries to encompass everything but more than 
anything ends up showing the increasing cracks in the scenario's 
believability. It seems filled with an absurd number of holes, 
implausibilities and unanswered questions - Why does Terry O'Quinn 
agent-in-charge allow himself to be blown up along with the bomb inside 
the Federal building (one is unable to work out why, even assuming he 
was involved in the conspiracy, it was necessary for him to sacrifice 
his life) ? The cabal's plan to take Scully away from Mulder is built on 
such a series of complicated coincidences as to seem preposterous - that 
Mulder and Scully will find the sealed area hidden under a children's 
playground, that they will manage to choose the correct direction in the 
middle of nowhere to follow a series of departed trucks, that they will 
then discover the domes in the cornfield, will enter and then Scully (as 
opposed to Mulder who is equally unprotected) will be stung by the 
virus-carrying bees, whereupon the cabal will be waiting outside 
Mulder's apartment (as opposed to her own) posing as fake ambulance men, 
having tapped his 911 call in order to abduct her when she collapses. 
And the revelation that what the conspiring cabal has been so ruthlessly 
fighting for all these years is really to sit back so an alien virus can 
enslave the entire human race seems laughable.
The film is disappointingly lacking in many of the things that made the 
series memorable. There is none of the ingenious plotting development or 
explanations of just how the paranormal might exist, and the sense of 
laconic humour between the two characters that drives the series is 
conspicuously lacking for the most part. And the things it seems to 
think the series depended on - the dark, paranoid claustrophobic visual 
look and the tight, constricted plotting - really don't work up on the 
screen. The dark, shadowy look that works so well on the small screen 
seems cramped translated to the big screen. And the tight plotting 
designed for a 50 minute tv hour keeps the film turning so tightly that 
one is too busy following what is meant to be going on to become 
involved. What it really needs to work as a film is to be opened up for 
the big screen - surely the one thing it was hoping to offer that the 
series couldn't - but it never does. Director Rob Bowman, a veteran from 
the series, offers up a few shots of wide open desert, snowy wastes and 
big domes but there seems sadly almost no difference between the look of 
a two million dollar tv episode and a 60 million dollar film. There's an 
impressive special effect of a UFO rising at the climax but visual 
effects supervisor Mat Beck, also a veteran of the series, seems to have 
conducted it as though he were working it for a limited tv budget and 
its appearance seems more cursory than awe-filled. 
The failing of the film is many of the failings of the tv series writ 
large. Like the big issue that circulated the fandom before the film's 
release - would the underlying sexual tension between the two characters 
be fulfilled ? - The Big Kiss here is all tantalizing tease which at the 
last moment deftly ducks away from delivery of anything. What we 
likewise have is a film that gives the appearance of answering all the 
big questions that lie behind the series - that in its advertizing 
campaign "Fight the Future" and the lead up of plot strands from the 
previous season promises the grand concept of an alien war - but equally 
dances away from actually delivering anything. It teases but instead in 
the end all it resorts back to is the series' status quo - the 
conspiracy's current plan is thwarted but all evidence that might be 
used to prove anything is eliminated; Mulder and Scully are reinstated 
but no further ahead in proving anything than they were at the very 
start of the series; and the real truth still remains out there ever 
elusive.
(Amusing piece of trivia:- one wonders if any `Star Wars' fans picked up 
the in-joke aimed at them in the last scene. Featured is the title 
credit `Foum Tatouine, Tunisia'. Tunisia, of course, was the location 
where George Lucas shot all the Tattooine scenes for `Star Wars').


Title
Review for Flesh Feast (1970)
USA. 1970. Director - Brad F. Grinter, Screenplay - Grinter & Thomas 
Casey, Producers - Grinter & Veronica Lake, Photography - Casey, Special 
Effects - Douglas Hobart, Makeup - Gayl Doucette & Bill Rogers, Art 
Direction - Harry Kerwin. Production Company - Viking International.
Veronica Lake (Dr Elaine Frederick), Phil Philbin (Ed Casey), Heather 
Hughes (Kristine Powell)
Plot: When a journalist is murdered while following an arms dealer, his 
editor Ed Casey follows the trail to Dr Elaine Frederick who is secretly 
conducting age rejuvenation experiments using flesh-eating maggots. 
Gradually Casey discovers that her backers are really Nazis and her 
intended test subject Adolf Hitler himself.
Veronica Lake, currently enjoying a revival of memory thanks to `L.A. 
Confidential', was one of the great cinematic beauties of the 1940s. 
After that decade though she fairly much faded from sight. `Flesh Feast' 
was her comeback after nearly twenty years and her last film before her 
death in 1973. It is anybody's guess what possessed Lake to choose such 
a dire and impoverished production for a comeback. In it she looks sad 
and aged - the film shoots her unglamorously and shows none of her 
former beauty. The climax of the film does offer the mildly fascinating 
spectacle of her going bonkers and laughing her head off like a maniac - 
it's sort of like one of the films that were the in-thing for awhile in 
the 1960s after the popularity of `What Ever Happened to Baby Jane ?' 
featuring aged stars going batty, but it comes without the layer of 
self-conscious freakshow appeal. The film is really dire. It has clearly 
been shot in someone's house where guest bedrooms double as hospital 
wards. The laboratory consists of a bench with two straps, an oxygen 
cylinder and two pieces of radio equipment. The whole film hangs on its 
twist ending - the revelation that the secret benefactor of Lake's 
flesh-eating maggot rejuvenation treatment is Adolf Hitler - but even 
though the film was the first to use such a twist, by the time it did it 
felt old hat. Sad.
Screening at the Christchurch 1998 Incredibly Strange Film Festival
Reviewed by Richard Scheib


Title
Review for Mortal Kombat: Annihilation (1997)
USA. 1997. Director - John R. Leonetti, Screenplay - Brent V. Friedman & 
Bryce Zabel, Story - Lawrence Kasanoff, John Tobias & Joshua Wexler, 
Based on the Game Created by Tobias & Ed Boon, Producer - Kasanoff, 
Photography - Matthew F. Leonetti, Music - George S. Clinton, Visual 
Effects Supervisors - Chuck Comisky & Alison Savitch, Visual Effects - 
The Digital Magic Co, Flat Earth Productions (Supervisor - Kevin 
Kutchaver), Kleiser-Walczak Construction Co, Murod Digital Images 
(Supervisor - Evan Richs), Optical Illusions & Vision Crew Ltd 
(Supervisor - Evan Jacob), Costume Effects Supervisor - Philip 
Goldsworthy, Special Effects Supervisors - Ron Troti & Joss Williams, 
Prosthetic Makeup Design - Gary Pollard, Makeup Consultant - Nick 
Dudman, Production Design - Charles Wood. Production Company - Threshold 
Entertainment/New Line Cinema.
Robin Shou (Liu Kang), Sandra Hess (Lieutenant Sonya Blade), Talisa Soto 
(Princess Kitana), James Remar (Lord Rayden), Lynn Red Williams 
(Lieutenant Jackson `Jax' Briggs), Brian Thompson (Shao Khan), Irina 
Pantaevna (Jade), Musetta Vander (Queen Sindel), Raynor Scheine 
(Shinnok), Deron McBee (Motaro), Marjean Holden (Sheeva), Litefoot 
(Nightwolf), Keith Cooke (Sub Zero)
Plot: The Mortal Kombat has been won, meaning that Earth is safe for 
this generation, but the rules are suddenly broken by the warlord Shao 
Khan who invades the Earth with an army from Outworld, intending to 
destroy the world in six days time and merge the two realms into one. 
The Earth's fate lies in the hands of Liu Kang, Sonya Blade, Kitana and 
Rayden who must discover new fighting skills and new allies if they are 
to defeat Shao Khan.
Before 1995's `Mortal Kombat', the selection of films based on video and 
computer games had been an extremely deplorable one, with only the 
woeful likes of `Super Mario Bros.' (1993), `Street Fighter' (1994) and 
`Double Dragon' (1994) on offer. But `Mortal Kombat' succeeded in 
contradicting the trend to become an unabashedly, unpretentiously 
enjoyable all-out action vehicle. And it did so by dint of the single 
blindingly obvious thing that these other videogame adaptions somehow 
neglected - it approximated the very style of the videogame itself by 
offering up wall-to-wall action, all run over by a pounding techno 
soundtrack. Now comes this slightly lesser but no less enjoyable sequel. 
Anything that remotely resembles plot has been stripped to a bare 
minimum to provide the film with a series of fantastic martial arts 
set-pieces that are slung together in the most directly linear 
connection possible. The downside of this is that the film tends to all 
blur into one single shapeless action sequence. Nevertheless it is the 
sheer fantastique bravado of the fight sequences where the kombatants 
battle centaurs, four-armed opponents, use razor-tipped hair-braids, 
unleash ice and sonic voice blasts and launch missiles built into their 
chests that gives it a uniquely watchable edge.


Title
Review for Halloween: The Curse of Michael Myers (1995)
HALLOWEEN: THE CURSE OF MICHAEL MYERS
USA. 1995. Director - Joe Chappelle, Screenplay - Daniel Farrands, 
Producer - Paul Freeman, Photography - Billy Dickson, Additional 
Photography - Tom Calloway, Music - Alan Howarth, Halloween Theme - John 
Carpenter, Special Effects Supervisor - Larry Fioritto, Makeup Effects - 
Magical Media Industries Inc (Designer/Supervisor - John Buechler), 
Additional Makeup Effects - Image Animation (Supervisor - Gary J. 
Tunicliffe), Production Design - Bryan Ryman. Production Company - 
Nightfall Productions.
Marianne Hagan (Kara Strode), Paul Stephen Rudd (Tommy Doyle), Donald 
Pleasence (Dr Sam Loomis), George P. Wilbur (The Shape/Michael Myers), 
J.C. Brandy (Jamie Lloyd), Kim Darby (Debra Strode), Bradford English 
(John Strode), Mitchell Ryan (Dr Terence Wynn), Devin Gardner (Danny 
Strode), Keith Bogart (Tim Strode), Mariah O'Brien (Beth), Janice 
Knickrehm (Mrs Blankenship)
Plot: Michael Myers returns to Haddonfield on Halloween night where he 
stalks Laurie Strode's cousin Kara and her family who have moved into 
the old Myers house. Kara's nerdish neighbour Tommy Doyle discovers 
abandoned the baby that is the last surviving inheritor of the Myers 
name that Michael is determined to kill. As he tries to protect the baby 
he discovers that Michael Myers is the incarnation of an ancient druidic 
personification of evil and is being sought by a group of modern druidic 
cultists in the town.
A strong case could be made that John Carpenter's cult 1978 hit 
`Halloween' was a film that shaped the face of the modern horror film. 
With `Halloween' Carpenter set out with no real intent other than to 
craft a pure rollercoaster ride of jolts and shocks. `Halloween's appeal 
rested as much in the ability to streamline the horror film into a pure 
shock machine, as it was to take it out of the shadows of Hammer Gothic 
and the melodramatic thriller contrivations of `Psycho' and its ilk and 
make it a wholly modern new form. The film's influence can be felt 
through an enormous number of other films from `Friday the 13th' and `A 
Nightmare on Elm Street' and their various sequels and imitators through 
to the obvious homages in the current `Scream' films.
After the success of `Halloween', Carpenter oversaw the obligatory 
`Halloween II' in 1981 but then with 1982's `Halloween III: Season of 
the Witch' tried to use the `Halloween' name to kick off an original, 
unlinked anthology series. That was an idea that promptly went nowhere. 
Carpenter then sold out interest in the franchise and 1988's `Halloween 
IV: The Return of Michael Myers' made a predictably sequelistic return 
to The Shape/Michael Myers saga. By the time of this, the fifth sequel 
to `Halloween', a thorough sense of pointlessness hangs over the series. 
What stood `Halloween' above the mostly worthless run of slasher film 
imitators - the `Friday the 13th' films being a perfect example - was 
the seat-edge directorial grip with which it was crafted. Sadly what 
made `Halloween' work is a lesson that almost no slasher film succeeded 
in learning, with almost all  substituting potpourris of gory despatches 
and a lineup of faceless teen victims over the creation of suspense and 
characters that one could give a damn about. And even more sadly this is 
a lesson that all of the `Halloween' sequels have even failed to learn 
from the source they owe their own name to.
There are occassional moments were director Joe Chappelle seems on the 
verge of rediscovering some of the style that Carpenter infused the 
original with - the there again/gone again pop-up tricks and the spooky 
peripheral shots with The Shape appearing on the edge of the camera 
frame or behind people's shoulders. But these occasional moments are 
ruined by pointlessly gory payoffs which show the film has no real focus 
above the conveyor belt line of splattery novelty deaths served up in 
the average `Friday the 13th' sequel. The exercise is disappointingly 
hollow and by comparison manages to make both `Halloween's II' and `IV'  
suddenly seem a whole lot better by comparison.
The film is further shot in by a plot which throws in an absurd spin 
that turns Michael Myers into some druidic avatar of evil incarnate. The 
explanation for this is murky and sounds just as silly when offered up 
on screen as it does in description here.  Even more ill explained are a 
series of subplots that reveal several of the cast members as belonging 
to some type of baby-snatching druidic cult that wants Michael Myers and 
the last surviving Myers baby. (Why, is never made clear). You could 
almost argue that the film might be trying to establish some type of 
grand  thematic link to unite itself up with the druidic witchcraft plot 
of the unconnected `Halloween III'. But in truth the film is shabbily, 
indifferently plotted and a disgracefully poor blackening of the eminent 
name of its original that it bears.


Title
Review for Nemesis 2: Nebula (1995)
USA. 1995. Director/Screenplay - Albert Pyun, Producers - Tom Karnowski 
& Gary Schmoeller, Photography - George Mooradian, Music - Tony 
Riparetti, Visual Effects - Design and Animation (Supervisors - Benta 
Garcia & Jay Mark Johnson), Special Effects - Guy Faria, Nebula and 
Makeup Effects - David Barton, Makeup Effects - Maurine Wirgler, Art 
Direction - Rob Bowen & Tracy Hennigan. Production Company - Imperial 
Entertainment/Filmwerks/Toga Productions.
Sue Price (Alex), Tina Cote (Emily), Chad Stahleski (Nebula), Tracy 
Davis (Sam), Earl White (Juna), Karen Studer (Zana), Shelton Baily 
(Tribal Chief)
Plot: In the 21st Century a perfected DNA child is created as the last 
hope against the cyborg dominated future. The child's mother flees with 
the child back through time to the East African desert in 1980. But the 
mother is killed by pursuing cyborgs and the child is taken and raised 
by a native tribe. But as she grows into womanhood, the child, Alex, 
sees the entire tribe slaughtered by a pursuing Nebula android. As the 
Nebula comes after her, she flees through the desert, coming to discover 
the super-human abilities inside herself as she fights for her life.
Albert Pyun is a prolific direct-to-video sf/action director. Almost all 
of Pyun's films - ‘Cyborg' (1989), ‘Knights' (1993), ‘Heatseeker' 
(1994), ‘Omega Doom' (1995) and this ongoing series of ‘Nemesis' films - 
feature kickboxing cyborgs and/or androids in post-holocaust or 
Cyberpunk settings. While Pyun's films brim with action their quality is 
generally not very good - it is characteristic of Pyun's films that he 
does not seem aware of the distinction between an android and a cyborg. 
The best of Pyun's films is the first ‘Nemesis' (1993) where Pyun fused 
his standard cyborg combat with a quite competent employment of 
Cyberpunk tropes. 
This is the first of three sequels to `Nemesis' (which all appear to 
have been shot back-to-back). None of these sequels have anything to do 
with the first ‘Nemesis' other than featuring the common theme of 
androids/cyborgs trying to take over society. ‘Nemesis 2' slips more 
into being a ‘Terminator' copy with a killer android coming back through 
time to pursue a heroine (although the look of the killer cyborg takes 
it closer in spirit to ‘Predator'). There is no more plot to the film 
than that - the entirety of the film is like one single action sequence 
without pause. There are times that one wishes there had been a little 
more in the way of plot - like explaining more about what the two girls 
are doing and what is the significance the gold coins they are hiding.
That said Pyun makes a quite competent action film out of it. It moves 
with pace and the Arizona locations (standing in for East Africa) are 
impressively photographed. Some of the stunts Pyun stages are quite 
breath-taking - like one where heroine Sue Price leaps from a building 
at the same time as shooting at a flaming cyborg falling alongside her 
and holding a corpse as a shield from its fire. Price is the latest of 
Pyun's would-be discoveries which he has taken from a 
kickboxing/body-building background - following the likes of Olivier 
Gruner, Kathy Long, Keith Cooke and Jean-Claude Van Damme. All of the 
aforementioned look impressively lithe and can throw a backkick with the 
same lissome grace that a dancer can pirouette - and cannot act worth a 
damn. Certainly Price has an asexuality and a body-builder's muscularity 
that looks convincingly super-human, and with golden-bronze skin, blonde 
dreadlocks and cool blue eyes, she looks visually striking.


Title
Review for Borrowers, The (1997)
UK/USA. 1997. Director - Peter Hewitt, Screenplay - John Kamps & Gavin 
Scott, Based on the Novels by Mary Norton, Producers - Tim Bevan, Eric 
Fellner & Rachel Talaly, Photography - Trevor Brooker & John Fenner, 
Music - Harry Gregson-Williams, Score Producer - Hans Zimmer, Visual 
Effects Supervisor - Peter Chiang, Digital Visual Effects - The Digital 
Film Co & The Magic Camera Co (Supervisor - Alan Marques), Special 
Effects Supervisor - Digby Milner, Production Design - Gemma Jackson, 
Supervising Art Director - Jim Morahan. Production Company - Working 
Title Films.
John Goodman (Ocious P. Potter), Flora Newbigin (Arrietty Clock), Jim 
Broadbent (Pod Clock), Bradley Pierce (Pete Lender), Mark Williams 
(Exterminator Jeff), Tom Felton (Peagreen Clock), Raymond Pickard 
(Spiller), Celia Imrie (Homily Clock), Hugh Laurie (Officer Steady), 
Aden Gillett (Joe Lender), Doon Mackichan (Victoria Lender)
Plot: The Clock family are Borrowers, tiny people who live hidden inside 
the walls of a human house and secretly sneak out to borrow objects for 
their own use. Teenage Arrietty is found by and befriends a human boy, 
Pete Lender, just in time to learn the human owners are being evicted 
and the house to be demolished by lawyer Ocious P. Potter. Pete's 
attempt to move them goes wrong and Arrietty and her brother are left 
behind where they witness Potter obtaining the deed that rightfully 
belongs to the Lenders. Grabbing it, they are then frenetically pursued 
by Potter who brings in an exterminator to put them down at all costs.
This is the third adaption of Mary Norton's popular series of children's 
books about the adventures of a family of tiny people who live in the 
wainscotting of a human house. The first book was first published in 
1952 and led to four sequels between then and 1982. The first film 
adaption was a little seen production made in 1973 about which I can 
find next to no information. The second and best was two sets of 
six-part half-hour British-made tv serials which aired in 1993 and 1994 
respectively, adapting the first four books under the umbrella title 
`The Borrowers'. The British serials and this 1997 Anglo-American 
co-production make for interesting comparisons. The tv serials had a 
quiet sense of wondrous adventure that was balanced with a droll 
understatement in a way that was quite sublime. On the other hand this 
film, while retaining the basic idea and the same principal characters, 
has thrown out most other semblances to turn the books into a big-screen 
special effects extravaganza. Case in point being the scene where 
Arrietty befriends the human boy and introduces him to her parents - the 
first serial took several episodes to develop the friendship before it 
was found out by her parents; the film doesn't even bother with the 
scene of taking him to meet her parents but simply cuts from Pod saying 
he will never accept the idea to the boy placing them in a box to be 
moved. Here the books have been reworked to turn them into a take on 
`Home Alone', with John Goodman having been written in as an odious 
lawyer whose sole purpose is to act as a slapstick butt of the ingenuity 
of the little people.
But if one is prepared to take the film on this level, it does such with 
a considerable degree of energy and visual invention. The balance of big 
and small sets and special effects is amazingly good and there are some 
delightful set-pieces with characters trapped on lit lightbulbs; 
pole-vaulting across sinks, skidding along pieces of soap and 
trampolining off appliance handles to get across a kitchen; becoming 
trapped inside the fridge in an attempt to steal ice-cream; and 
enthralling scenes racing to avoid the villain as he smashes a hammer 
through the wall and so forth. But the film is only really constructed 
around these effects set-pieces and, while it entertains a good deal, 
one wishes it had slowed a little to allow the story more time.
There is a rather bizarre design scheme to the whole film which tries to 
create a fantastacized 1950s Midlands industrial city landscape - sort 
of like a combination of `Coronation Street' (if one can imagine 
`Coronation Street''s brick backstreets with airships moored above them) 
and the Gothic industrial nightmare city out of the first `Batman' film 
(but with the lights turned up). And in a gag that has been stolen 
directly from Peter Jackson's `Meet the Feebles' all the vehicles in the 
film are Morris Minors, including the joke of having the villain of the 
piece ride in a black stretch Morris Minor.


Title
Review for Demolitionist, The (1995)
USA. 1996. Director - Robert Kurzman, Screenplay - Brian DiMuccio & Dino 
Vindeni, Story - Anne & Robert Kurzman, Producer - Donald P. Borchers, 
Photography - Marcus Hahn, Music - Shawn Patterson, Visual Effects - 
Flash Film Works (Supervisor - William Mesa), Special Effects - Ultimate 
Effects (Supervisor - John Hartigan), Makeup Effects/Demolitionist 
Costume - K.N.B. EFX Group Inc, Production Design - Charley Cabrera. 
Production Company - Le Monde Entertainment/A-Pix Entertainment.
Nicole Eggert (Alyssa Lloyd/The Demolitionist), Richard Grieco (Mad Dog 
Burns), Bruce Abbott (Professor Jack Crowley), Susan Tyrrell (Mayor 
Eleanor Grimbaum), Peter Jason (Higgins), Tom Savini (Roland)
Plot: In the future undercover police officer Alyssa Lloyd is discovered 
trying to infiltrate the gang activities of escaped gang leader Mad Dog 
Burns. Mad Dog leaves her crucified as a warning in his ongoing campaign 
to destroy Mayor Eleanor Grimbaum for banning all guns. However Mayor 
Grimbaum authorizes Alyssa to be used as the first subject for Professor 
Jack Crowley's Lazarus Project, where her blood is replaced by nantotech 
plasma and she rebuilt as an enhanced human fighting machine. Using a 
hi-tech motorcycle and a masked bodysuit she takes on Mad Dog's gang and 
is quickly nicknamed The Demolitionist in the media. But Mad Dog 
retaliates by using his influences in the council to have The Lazarus 
Project stopped by showing Alyssa as unstable.
Robert Kurtzman is best known as the K in the KNB EFX Group makeup 
effects workshop, who of course have provided work for films `The Evil 
Dead' sequels, `Lord of Illusions' and `Spawn' to name but a handful. 
Kurtzman earlier provided the story for `From Dusk Till Dawn'. And with 
`The Demolitionist' Kurtzman joins an increasing number of makeup 
effects artists who have also branched out as directors (Kurtzman having 
since has gone on to direct `Wishmaster' (1997)). Although the sad truth 
is that the body of makeup effects artist-directed films - which so far 
include Stan Winston's `Pumpkinhead' aka `Vengenace: The Demon' (1987) 
and `Upworld' aka `A Gnome Gnamed Gnorm' (1991), Screaming Mad George's 
`The Guyver' (1991), James Cummins' `The Boneyard' (1991), John Carl 
Buechler with `Troll' (1986), `Friday the 13th Part VII: The New Blood' 
(1987) and sundry Charles Band productions, Chris Walas's `The Fly II' 
(1989) and `The Vagrant' (1992), Bob Keen's `Proteus' (1996) and Gary J. 
Tunnicliffe's `Within the Rock' (1996) - has failed to yet produce a 
single memorable or even worthwhile film. The most watchable to emerge 
has perhaps been Tom Savini's `Night of the Living Dead' remake (1990) 
but that was still a pallid shadow of its predecessor. One might think 
that when these creative talents get behind the camera they might be 
capable of producing some really way-out makeup effects that no other 
director has yet been capable of but even in their own specialist 
regard, these films remain remarkably routine.
And sadly `The Demolitionist' proves no different to any of these 
others. The plot has been shamelessly stolen from `RoboCop' (1987) - a 
frontline police officer is brutally killed by a gang then resurrected 
as a law enforcement cyborg where they  must fight official 
interference/corruption to finally despatch the gang. Although as much 
as`RoboCop', `The Demolitionist' reminds of `Barb Wire' made the same 
year as this which likewise featured a `Baywatch' bimbo in a anarchic 
near future action setting. In both cases the films' seemed to have some 
sort of fetish with seeing their lead actresses' pneumatic bodies 
encased in black leather. Both `Barb Wire' and `The Demolitionist' want 
to be comic-books of films, although only really `Barb Wire' achieved 
this to any kind of absurdly unreal regard.
`The Demolitionist' has its odd moments - like one scene where Richard 
Grieco introduces his "negotiator" - a Doberman which spends the 
duration of the "negotiation"  barking its head off at leash length from 
the cowering opposing party. But mostly the film is really bad. Some of 
the dialogue is appalling - a line like "After you're cooked, shall I 
serve you with potatoes or stuffing ?" falls utterly flat. Bruce Abbott 
introduces his resurrection device, "In the age of bio-molecular 
mechanics, this [chair] is God." Richard Grieco overacts badly in the 
villain part, although in the awful acting stakes has the honours stolen 
out from under him by Susan Tyrrell who gives the appearance that most 
days she turned up for shooting drunk. The film's low budget tends to 
get in the way of any effectiveness - the city of the future is 
represented by a single night skyline, and the action stunts look 
threadbare and cheap where they should have given the film a real 
kinetic charge.


Title
Review for Perfect Blue (1997/I)
Japan. 1997. Director - Satoshi Kon, Screenplay - Sadayuki Murai, Based 
on Character Design by Hisashi Eguchi, Based on the Novel by Yoshikazu 
Takeuchi, Producers - Hiroaki Inoue & Masao Maruyama, Planning - Koichi 
Okamoto & Yoshikazu Takeuchi, Photography - Hisao Shirai, Music - 
Masahiro Ikumi, Animation Director/Character Design - Hideki Hamazu, 
Production Design - Mitsusuke Hayakawa, Special Adviser - Katsuhiro 
Otomo. Production Company - Mad House/Oniro.
Plot: Mima Kirigoe takes the risky move of quitting as a member of the 
girl pop trio Cham to pursue an acting career with a part in a tv 
detective series. But the part only proves to be a minor one and Mima is 
forced to accept playing rape scenes and appearing in a nude magazine 
layout to sustain herself, while the other two girls take Cham on to 
great success. At the same time Mima is disturbed to find every detail 
of her life is being reported as a faked diary on an Internet website. 
As her spirits sink, she finds herself haunted by a doppelganger which 
taunts her with what her life could have been if she had not chosen this 
path.
The name of Katsuhiro Otomo casts a giant shadow over anime. Otomo 
directed `Akira' (1987) which, with its epic-sized vistas of mass 
destruction, succeeded in becoming a huge cult hit and whetting Western 
audiences' appetite for anime. It also made Otomo the only anime name 
that is recognizable to Westerners - and the subsequent attachment of 
his name to any project has been enough to carry it to the West. 
Although what may have escaped notice of those who flock to the Otomo 
name is that Otomo has only really directed one film other than `Akira' 
- `World Apartment Horror' (1991) - something which seems incredible 
considering the size of the shadow Otomo casts over anime. He has 
directed segments of other films like `Robot Carnival' (1986) and 
`Memories' (1995), but the greatest Otomo successes - `Rojin Z' (1991), 
`Memories' and this - have ironically been ones that wave Otomo's name 
above them but little else. Here Otomo's credit remains the rather 
nebulous title of `Special Adviser' which nevertheless seems to be 
enough for it to still be promoted as an Otomo film.
`Perfect Blue' turns away from the usual thematic territory for an 
Otomo-associated film - Cyberpunk futures and epic-vistas of mass 
destruction - and is in fact a psycho-thriller. It starts in rather well 
- there is a marvelously spooky moment where the heroine, after some 
amusingly comic moments trying to learn how to use a computer, accesses 
a website only to discover the minutiae of her day is being reported in 
elaborate detail in a series of faked diary entries written as though by 
her. The story all-too-believably details the fall of an aidoru 
(Japanese pop star) who takes an artistic risk in becoming an actress, 
fails to succeed as expected and is gradually forced into filming 
gratuitous rape scenes and modelling nude in order to sustain herself, 
all the while seeing her former partners prospering. In these scenes the 
film manages to convey a portrait of the downfall of a fragile innocent 
with considerable conviction.
But unfortunately about halfway through the film becomes somewhat 
incoherent with the plot becoming a tangle of strands involving the 
heroine having to deal with her Internet stalker; being haunted by a 
taunting doppelganger who claims to be her alternate self had she stayed 
with the group and gone on to success; as well as someone assassinating 
the people around her. When the film then starts to get into her having 
memory blackouts and missing days and having scenes in the tv show start 
oddly mirroring events in her life, it becomes difficult to follow what 
is meant to be going on. However the film then momentarily pulls back 
and in a plotting twist of dazzling ingenuity suggests that the role of 
the actress is really a split personality created by the heroine to deal 
with the stress of being a pop star, that the doppelganger is her real 
self emerging through and that the tv show is a projection of the 
repressed memories of an abusive childhood. It is a moment of 
crystalline clarity in which all of the hanging confusions up to that 
point suddenly make perfect sense. But then oddly enough the film seems 
to back away from this and continues on to an ending where the 
doppelganger and assassinations are mundanely revealed to be the mere 
machinations of one of the heroine's friends. It's a puzzling denouement 
which holds explanations that are actually less convincing than the ones 
offered by the multiple-personality disorder twist.
Reviewed at the 1998 Wellington International Film Festival
Copyright Richard Scheib 1998


Title
Review for Judge and Jury (1996)
USA. 1996. Director/Story - John Eyres, Screenplay - Eyres, John 
Cianetti & Amanda I. Kirpaul, Producers - Eyres & Gregory Vanger, 
Photography - Bob Paone, Music - Jonathan Flood, Computer Animation - 
C.O.R.E. Digital Pictures, Miniatures - Glacier Entertainment, Special 
Effects - Larry Roberts, Production Design - Ron Mason. Production 
Company - Nu Image/EGM.
Martin Kove (Michael Silvano), David Keith (Joseph Meeker), Paul Koslo 
(Lockhart), Thomas Ian Nichols (Alex Silvano), Kelly Peribe (Roland), 
Laura Johnson (Grace Silvano)
Plot: Wanted killer Joseph Meeker is sent to the electric chair after 
being caught during a liquor store holdup. But Meeker returns from the 
dead, taunting and pursuing Michael Silvano, the former cop who 
apprehended him during the robbery, determined to obtain revenge for 
Silvano's accidental shooting of his girlfriend during the holdup.
`Judge and Jury' is a variant on the 
killers-back-from-the-electric-chair mini-theme that was briefly the 
in-thing around 1989-90 with the likes of `Shocker', `The Horror Show' 
and `The First Power'. All of these were forgettable B-movies and, 
unlike the recent `Fallen' which gave this mini-genre its first 
respectable treatment, `Judge and Jury' is no different to any of these 
others. Its' major difference over its predecessors is its treating the 
exercise as less of a horror film than as a sort of supernatural action 
film with villain David Keith pursuing hero Kove amid car chases and 
lots of explosions, with his principal weapon being a shotgun as opposed 
to any ghostly arsenal of tricks.
The film is made by John Eyres. Eyres has previously made such 
direct-to-video efforts as the `Project: Shadowchaser' films and 
`Monolith' (1994). To say that `Judge and Jury' is Eyres' best film to 
date does not come as any great recommendation - certainly it is never a 
film that rises above the wholly average in any way. Eyres pays even 
less lip service than most action directors to the nominal need for a 
plot to connect action sequences together. The `Project: Shadowchaser' 
films are astounding for the completely minimalistic motivation with 
which the proceedings are conducted. `Judge and Jury' is a marginal 
improvement with Eyres at least paying some attention to character (or 
at least actor-driven scenes) at the beginning - there's a nice scene 
with Keith taunting a priest who reads him the last rites. Although the 
rest of the film is like a single 90 minute chase sequence without any 
stops for plot, character development, or anything. Eyres has improved 
stylistically as a director to a certain extent, with some sequences 
being occasionally evocative rather than the mindless brutalizing action 
of earlier Eyres films like `Project: Shadowchaser II'. (Although there 
is one very contrivedly silly sequence which requires hero Kove to kick 
a goal with a flaming football).
On Eyres' side is David Keith who has never appeared to be having more 
fun in a role than he is having here, playing wildly over the top while 
getting to dress as everything from an Elvis impersonator, a French chef 
(with an accent and mustache that both seem to be competition to be the 
most outrageously false), a biker with a flaming orange hair dye job, in 
drag, a bespectacled academic in a tweed jacket, a clown and a stand-up 
comic. 


Title
Review for Crossworlds (1996)
USA. 1996. Director - Krishna Rao, Screenplay - Krishna & Raman Rao, 
Producers - Rupert Harvey & Lloyd Segan, Photography - Christopher 
Walling, Music - Christophe Beck, Visual Effects Supervisor - Wendy 
Grossberg, Visual Effects - Todd-AO Digital Images (Supervisor - Brian 
Jennings), Digital Effects - Digital Drama Inc (3D Animation Supervisor 
- Mark J. Smith) & Pure Light Images Inc (Supervisor - Mike Fernster), 
Digital Visual Effects - Shockwave Entertainment Inc (Supervisor - Jody 
Levine), Mechanical Effects Supervisor - Frank Ceglia, Production Design 
- Aaron Osborne. Production Company - Trimark Pictures.
Josh Charles (Joe Talbot), Rutger Hauer (A.T.), Andrea Roth (Laura), 
Stuart Wilson (Ferris), Perry Anzilotti (Rebo), Jack Black (Steve), 
Richard McGregor (Stu), Ellen Geer (Mrs Talbot)
Plot: After meeting a beautiful girl at a party, average business 
student Joe Talbot is suddenly dragged into aiding a resistance movement 
trying to prevent an invading warlord who is intent on conquering a 
multiverse of alternate realities. Joe becomes a key player in the 
struggle when it is discovered that a crystal left by his father is 
really a valuable artifact capable of opening doorways between worlds.
`Crossworlds' from the face-value look of it seems to be nothing more 
than another direct-to-video action film but instead confounds 
expectation to become a surprisingly worthwhile effort. Director Krishna 
Rao takes a newly familiar theme - parallel world hopping - one that has 
been slaughtered in the most unimaginative way possible by tv's 
`Sliders' - but conducts it in an original and interesting way. Straight 
into the film one's attention is immediately captured by a dizzying 
series of spins - hero Charles meets a beautiful girl at a party who 
happens to know his name; wakes to find her in his bedroom sitting over 
him with a knife and runs only to open his bedroom door and find he is 
looking out across a desert plain with an approaching rider; they are 
pursued and shot at with still no idea what is meant to be happening; 
seek refuge with Rutger Hauer at a seedy motel where an ordinary motel 
room mysteriously opens into a building the size of an airplane hangar; 
followed by a subtle attempt by villain Stuart Wilson to take over 
Roth's mind at a museum. Rao is capable of quite effectively suggesting 
the immediately otherworldly by a subtly disquiet shifting of the 
everyday - Roth vanishing at the party in the moment Charles turns his 
back; the sense of eerieness that is created in a perfectly ordinary 
museum garden when Hauer suggests that people are watching them.
Unfortunately it becomes a less effective film once it explains what is 
going on and all the building mystery is brought out into the open. Here 
the ordinariness that Rao is trying to suggest as being otherworldly 
becomes a little too apparent - a corridor between worlds is simply a 
desert canyon filmed through a blurred lens, the movement between worlds 
is conducted by people simply turning their backs in the desert. Nor, 
bar a brief visit to a rebel camp at the end, do we get to see anything 
of the other worlds talked about. Here sadly the film's medium budget 
has gotten in the way of the clear scope of imagination that the film 
promises - it would have been a far better film on an A budget. 
Nevertheless despite this there are still a number of highly effective 
scenes in the latter half - a last minute salvation from a fall from a 
skyscraper by shifting between worlds; an excellent scene where the 
protagonists are caught in an illusion where it appears the lift they 
are descending in is by pieces disappearing around them until they are 
left hanging from one another's shoes. Josh Charles gives a rather good 
performance as an ordinary average guy propelled into bewildering 
circumstances.


Title
Review for Dracula Vs. Frankenstein (1971)
USA. 1971. Director - Al Adamson, Screenplay - William Pugsley & Samuel 
M. Sherman, Producers - Adamson & John Van Horne, Photography - Paul 
Glickman & Gary Graver, Music - William Lava, Visual Effects Design - 
Bob Le Bar, Electronic Effects - Ken Strickfaden, Special Makeup - 
George Barr, Art Direction - Ray Markham. Production Company - 
Independant International.
J. Carrol Naish (Dr Durea/Dr Frankenstein), Regina Carrol (Judith 
Fontaine), Zandor Vorkov (Count Dracula), Anthony Eisley (Mike Howard), 
John Bloom (Frankenstein Monster), Lon Chaney [Jr] (Groton), Jim Davis 
(Sergeant Martin), Anne Morrell (Samantha), Greydon Clark (Strange), 
Russ Tamblyn (Rico), Angelo Rossitto (Grazbo)
Plot: A singer's search for her missing sister leads her to a pier 
freakshow run by the wheelchair-ridden Dr Durea. But Dr Durea is really 
a descendant of the Frankenstein family and is injecting his dim-witted 
assistant with a serum to turn him into a monster to collect victims for 
his experiments in revivification of the decapitated. And at the same 
time Durea is coerced by Count Dracula into helping him revive the 
original Frankenstein monster.
It's one of the great title confrontations of all time, one that 
Universal in their various monster team-ups of the 1940s (`Frankenstein 
Meets the Wolfman' (1943), `House of Frankenstein' (1944), `House of 
Dracula' (1945) and `Abbott and Costello Meet Frankenstein' (1948)) 
somehow overlooked. And it was a popular idea too - there were at least 
two other films using the same title conflict that appeared the same 
year as this. But in terms of delivering on its title challenge, this is 
a thoroughly wasted opportunity. It's not just what an incredibly 
shabbily made film it is - it's that Dracula and Frankenstein seem 
irrelevant to the plot which is really about a girl searching for her 
missing sister who has been abducted into a mad scientist's ill-defined 
scheme that has something to do with decapitating and then reviving 
young women from the dead. Dracula and the Frankenstein monster do have 
a tussle at the climax to justify the title but it is poorly motivated 
confrontation.
The rest of the film is a mess. It is badly directed and the plot is a 
haphazard jumble (not surprising considering that it originally started 
out as a biker film and was turned into a monster bash to capitalize on 
the early 1970s classic monster revival). It is sad to watch genre 
veterans like an ageing and wheelchair-ridden J. Carrol Naish and an 
alcoholically wasted Lon Chaney Jr (in his last performance) reduced to 
playing in such impoverished surroundings. Forrest J. Ackerman is 
credited as technical advisor and has a small part as a doctor victim, 
something which demonstrates he should really stick to editing. Zandor 
Vorkov gives a performance that verges on the somnambulistic, making 
what is possibly the worst screen Dracula of all time.
Screening at the Christchurch 1998 Incredibly Strange Film Festival
Reviewed by Richard Scheib


Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
USA. 1998. Director - Barry Levinson, Screenplay - Paul Attanasio & 
Stephen Hauser, Adaption - Kurt Wimmer, Based on the Novel by Michael 
Crichton, Producers - Crichton, Levinson & Andrew Wald, Photography - 
Adam Greenberg, Music - Elliot Goldenthal, Visual Effects - Cinesite 
(Supervisor - Carlos Aguello), Visual Effects Miniatures - Grant McCune 
Design (Supervisor - Grant McCune), End Sequence - Sony Pictures 
Imageworks (Supervisor - Walt Hyneman), Special Effects Supervisor - Ken 
Pepiot, Prosthetic/Animatronic Effects - Steve Johnson's XFX Inc 
(Supervisor - Sean Taylor), Production Design - Norman Reynolds. 
Production Company - Baltimore Pictures/Constant c Productions/Punch 
Productions.
Dustin Hoffman (Dr Norman Goodman), Sharon Stone (Dr Beth Halperin), 
Samuel L. Jackson (Harry Adams), Peter Coyote (Barnes), Liev Schreiber 
(Dr Ted Fielding)
Plot: A team of scientists are brought to the middle of the Pacific 
where they are informed they have been selected as first contact 
specialists to investigate a crashed UFO that has been discovered on the 
ocean floor. Entering the craft they discover it is really a ship from 
Earth's future that has been thrown back in time through a black hole. 
At the heart of the ship is a mysterious sphere. After one of the team 
recklessly enters the sphere, they find themselves in contact with an 
alien entity and their habitat under attack by jellyfish and giant 
squids which appear to have been manifested from out of their worst 
fears.
Nobody, with the exception of John Travolta, has quite made a career 
comeback in recent years like Michael Crichton has. In the 1970s 
Crichton had big hits with the film adaption of his novel `The Andromeda 
Strain' in 1971 and further successes as a director with the likes of 
`Westworld' (1973), `Coma' (1978) and `The Great Train Robbery' (1979). 
But after that point Crichton's star began to wane - the film adaption 
of his best-selling novel `The Terminal Man' in 1974 was barely seen, 
and his other directorial efforts - `Looker' (1981), `Runaway' (1984) 
and `Physical Evidence' (1989) - were ignored by all and sundry. 
Crichton's appeal was always founded in the post-`2001' view of the 
future as a soullessly sterile, antisceptic world where we have come to 
be crowded out by our technology or where our technology is in imminent 
danger of going out of control. But after `Star Wars' in 1977 the vision 
of a cold, sterile future was suddenly replaced by a gee-whiz enthusiasm 
for all things wondrous and Crichton's technological alarmism became 
outmoded.
In `The Encyclopedia of Science Fiction' (1992), Peter Nicholls accuses 
Crichton's novels of reading like potential film scripts. Nicholls' 
slightly cynical tone notwithstanding, there is some truth to the 
comment in that both Crichton's novels of `Sphere' (1987) and `Jurassic 
Park' (1990) were originally designed as film scripts. It is a measure 
of just how far Crichton was out of grace at the time in that none of 
these attracted any attention. Crichton also had the further ignominy of 
seeing a substantial part of `Sphere' stolen by James Cameron in `The 
Abyss' (1989).
`Jurassic Park' was however a best-seller and attracted the eyes of 
Steven Spielberg and the rest, as they say, is history. Crichton's 
middle name has suddenly become "author of `Jurassic Park'" and he has 
found himself in the midst of a major career revival even bigger than 
the success he had had in the 1970s. Although Crichton has yet to 
reoccupy the director's chair, there have been major film adaptions of 
all his books - `Rising Sun' (1993), `Disclosure' (1994), `Congo' 
(1995), `The Lost World: Jurassic Park' (1997) - and he has provided the 
original screenplays for `Twister' (1996) and created the hit tv series 
`ER' (1994- ). The `Jurassic Park' credit alone has been enough to 
propel him from has-been film-maker to one of the most cinematically 
popular contemporary novelists, rivalled possibly only by John Grisham. 
(As of this writing with `The Thirteenth Warrior', adapted from 
Crichton's `Eaters of the Dead' (1976), awaiting release later this year 
that makes only one Crichton novel - `Airframe' - that has not been 
filmed and that is being planned for next year).
Certainly `Sphere' is probably Crichton's weakest book. In it Crichton 
seemed undecided whether he was telling an alien contact story or a 
monsters from the id drama, and the ending where the protagonists simply 
wished the problem away was so absurd I threw the book across the room. 
Crichton's novels are fine for the scientific extrapolation and the 
depth of research Crichton places into them but when it came to 
characters, Crichton is utterly flat. To return to Nicholls' comment 
above, it is not hard to see why one might think that as Crichton's 
novels tend to make better films than books - film allows Crichton's 
nondescript characters to be fleshed out with actors. `Jurassic Park' is 
an enjoyable page-turner but what really made it as a film and 
phenomenon was seeing the dinosaurs in all their ferocious, 
living-breathing CGI glory.
`Sphere' comes directed by Barry Levinson, of `Diner', `Toys' and `Wag 
the Dog' fame, as well as director of Crichton's `Disclosure'. The 
script adaption is from Paul Attanasio, creator with Levinson of the 
finest series on tv at the moment, `Homicide: Life on the Streets', and 
who also adapted (and improved) Crichton's `Disclosure' for Levinson. 
And `Sphere' is really quite an impressively well-made film - the 
unfolding of the alien contact scenes and the revelation of the alien's 
identity are eerie and suspenseful. There is perhaps a little too much 
running around between ships, but the science and underwater scenes are 
conducted with an impeccable and impressive realism. There is also an 
excellent score. Levinson and photographer Adam Greenberg invest the 
story with an increasingly dark, claustrophobic tone that quite begins 
to grip the imagination. And the combined efforts of all allow a story 
that seemed fairly naff on the page to gain considerable credibility on 
screen. Levinson and Attanasio even manage to tone down and make the 
ending quite believable.
But oddly `Sphere' has been the only Crichton film so far to have been a 
relative box-office disappointment. It is puzzling as to why `Sphere' 
died a box-office death as it is really quite a good film. One suspects 
the reason for such is that it eschews big-budget special effects which 
are synonymous with sf these days in favour of cerebral, psychological 
drama. There are no show-stopping scenes of mass destruction and the 
monsters that do appear are psychological not physical. 
Crichton is an oddly divided writer. On one hand he has a fascination 
with technology - all his books come accompanied with graphs and 
diagrams - yet he is deeply sceptical of all this technology getting out 
of control. Underneath all of Crichton's work runs a single strand of 
pessimism. Crichton fears that human nature or simple human error will 
invariably cause things to go awry - be it a single strand of jammed 
computer tape nearly causing an entire viral containment facility to 
self-destruct in `The Andromeda Strain'; a epileptic becoming addicted 
to the electric shocks that are supposed to control him in `The Terminal 
Man'; or human greed causing unforeseen system foul-ups in both 
`Disclosure' and `Jurassic Park'; and machine error in `Westworld'. In 
`Jurassic Park' Crichton even manages to turn chaos theory - which is 
simply a mathematical paradigm for the impossibility of predicting 
behaviour in complex systems - into a kind of Murphy's Law where things 
will invariably go out of control. And in `Sphere' Crichton's themes are 
writ at their most visible. One film that makes interesting comparison 
here to `Sphere' is `Contact'. Both are films about alien contact and 
human prejudice. But where `Contact' says that alien contact can offer 
the possibility of a consciousness-expanding entry into a wider universe 
but that to accept it we must overcome small-mindedness; `Sphere', writ 
through with Crichton's usual doubts about human nature, is utterly 
pessimistic - holding the end view that humanity, given the miraculous 
ability to wish anything into being, will only manifest its deepest 
darkest fears and that we are better off without such a gift.
People have rushed to make comparisons between `Sphere' and other past 
sf films. There are undeniable comparisons that can be made to 
`Forbidden Planet' (1956) which involved a similar alien device which 
conjured forth repressed psychological fears, and `Solaris' (1972) with 
scientists aboard a space station being driven crazy by a sentient 
planet's manifesting forms from their unconscious in an attempt to 
communicate with them. A further point of comparative interest might 
also be last year's `Event Horizon' which inside its thorough muddle of 
ideas really wanted to be what `Sphere' emerges as. Of course the one 
film that most rushed to compare `Sphere' to was `The Abyss', being 
unaware that `Sphere' the novel predated `The Abyss'. But `Sphere' and 
`The Abyss' do make for interesting comparison. It may be heretical in 
light of the public disfavour given to `Sphere' to suggest that it 
actually works better as a story than `The Abyss' does but it is a case 
I am willing to argue. `The Abyss' had some grippingly intensive moments 
of human drama but the alien contact angle seemed awkwardly jammed onto 
the end, and the final scene (in both the original cinematic release and 
the 1992 `Special Edition') of the alien ship rising to the surface was 
a big anti-climax. `Sphere' works to a far more dramatically satisfying 
conclusion and certainly gives its alien contact theme a far more 
rigorous workout than `The Abyss' with its bunch of glowing, ethereal 
Spielberg castoffs who have come merely to wave nuclear disarmament 
flags does. Possibly this a film whose merit will undergo reevaluation 
in a few years time.


Title
Review for Anastasia (1997)
USA. 1997. Directors/Producers - Don Bluth & Gary Goldman, Screenplay - 
Susan Gauthier, Bruce Graham, Bob Tzudiker & Noni White, Animation 
Adaption - Eric Tuchman, Based on the 1956 Screenplay by Arthur Laurents 
(Adapted by Guy Bolton from the Play by Marcelle Maurette), Music - 
Stephen Flaherty, Songs - David Newman. Production Company - Fox Family 
Films.
Voices: Meg Ryan (Anastasia), John Cusack (Dimitri), Christopher Lloyd 
(Rasputin), Kelsey Grammer (Vladimir), Hank Azaria (Bartok), Angela 
Lansbury (Dowager Empress Marie), Bernadette Peters (Sophie)
Plot: 1916, St Petersburg. When he is banished from the Tsar's court, 
the evil monk Rasputin sells his soul to enact sorcerous revenge on the 
royal family and raises the masses to overthrow them. The young princess 
Anastasia flees to safety but grows up with no memory of her past. She 
is found by an ambitious former servant boy who cons her into posing as 
Anastasia in order to obtain the exiled dowager empress's fortunes. 
Gradually he comes to fall in love with her only for to discover that 
she really is Anastasia. Meanhile the evil Rasputin, banished to limbo, 
plots to kill her.
The career of animator Don Bluth is one that has been punctuated by a 
series of ironic reversals. Bluth and several associates left Disney 
Studios in 1975, unhappy at the studio's betrayal of the great animated 
tradition. (The period for Disney that had peaked between 1937 and 1945 
with the likes of `Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs', `Bambi', 
`Pinocchio', `Dumbo', `Fantasia' et al, and which had fallen into 
decline in the 1960s and 1970s with the banal likes of `The Sword and 
the Stone', `The Jungle Book', `Robin Hood' and `The Rescuers'). Vowing 
to make their own return to the Disney tradition, Bluth made the superb 
`The Secret of N.I.M.H.' in 1982, a beautifully constructed homage to 
the classic Disney films which can easily stand up alongside some of 
Disney's best. Unfortunately `N.I.M.H.' was not a success and Bluth was 
reduced to making far less ambitious, although passably enjoyable 
middle-of-the-road animated fare like `An American Tail' (1986), `The 
Land Before Time' (1988) and `All Dogs Go to Heaven' (1989). But even 
more sadly Bluth's work in the 1990s - `Rock-a-Doodle' (1991), 
`Thumbelina' (1994), `A Troll in Central Park' (1995) - sank to an 
insipid banality far below Disney ever at their worst. The great irony 
then was that Disney from about 1991 onwards started to recapture their 
own classic tradition with a series of epic animated features - the 
likes of `Beauty and the Beast' (1991), `Aladdin' (1992), `The Lion 
King' (1994), `Pocahontas' (1995), `Toy Story' (1995), `The Hunchback of 
Notre Dame' (1996) and `Hercules' (1997). The triple irony for Bluth is 
that Disney have been so successful at returning to what they do best 
that he has now found himself re-employed by a rival studio - 20th 
Century Fox - wanting to market their own brand of high-quality artistic 
animated features in the same Disney tradition. Indeed it seems 
everybody is now trying to make epic animated films - 1998 is going to 
be a big year for animation buffs with `Anastasia' from Fox; Disney's 
`Mulan' later in the year; Spielberg's Dreamworks SKG putting out `The 
Prince of Egypt' - an animated version of `The Ten Commandments'; 
Warner's `The Magic Sword: Quest for Camelot'; and `A Bug's Life' from 
the `Toy Story' people.
The good news is that `Anastasia' is easily the best film Bluth has made 
since `N.I.M.H.'. It allows him again the budget to make a film that 
uses a really large-screen artistic canvas. And it is even, at least in 
my view, a better animated film than the last few Disney films - 
`Hunchback' and `Hercules' - have been. It gets the whole balance just 
right - some marvellously exciting action sequences aboard in particular 
a runaway train; a light but not excessive lineup of songs; just a touch 
of romance; a likeable supporting cast of small cuddly talking animals - 
and winds it all into an enjoyably well-rounded story. It is perhaps in 
the end sight a film that falls short of standing up there among the 
great animated Disney classics like `Snow White', `Bambi' or `Fantasia', 
but one that can quite ably hold its own at least on the second rung of 
Disney films among the likes of `Sleeping Beauty', `Cinderella' or `101 
Dalmatians'.
My only quibble with it might be its rather dubious historical 
authenticity. As the unearthing of the remains at Ekaterinberg in recent 
years has conclusively proved (except to all bar the Russian Orthodox 
Church), Anastasia did not manage to escape the same fate as the rest of 
the Romanovs, which leaves the film in the rather embarrassing position 
of basing itself on a proven fraudulent story. The unearthing of the 
Romanov remains was well publicised and the film could hardly not have 
known about this when it went into production. Even more amusing is the 
story's managing to sweep aside almost all details of the Russian 
Revolution. Seemingly as though Hollywood is still haunted by the spirit 
of McCarthy blacklisting, not a single mention will you find anywhere of 
Lenin and the Bolsheviks. Indeed the film rather amazingly comes out to 
state that the entire Revolution was not a people's uprising against a 
cruel and incompetent aristocracy but rather was all down to the 
black-hearted Rasputin selling his soul in revenge for being banned from 
the Tsar's court. (The Communist Revolution all down to Satanism - one 
wonders if they might not be able to make a case for an ultra-right 
fundamentalist subtext somewhere there !).


Title
Review for Extraordinary Visitor (1998)
Canada. 1998. Director/Screenplay - John W. Doyle, Producers - Paul Pope 
& Jennice Ripley, Photography - Brian R.R. Hebb, Music - Eric Cadesky & 
Nick Dyer, Production Design - Pam Hall. Production Company - Film East 
Inc.
Raoul Bhaneja (John the Baptist), Mary Walsh (Marietta), Andy Jones 
(Rick), Jordan Canning (Alison), Rick Boland (Pope Innocent XVI), Greg 
Malone (Cardinal Vignetti), Janet Michael (Virgin Mary)
Plot: On November 1, 1999 The Virgin Mary appears to The Pope to 
announce that God has decided to shut the human experiment down. John 
the Baptist is sent to Earth to find one last shred of hope. Arriving in 
St John's, Newfoundland, John is taken in by Rick, an electronics 
repairman, and Marietta, his wife who hosts a local tv talkshow. An 
innocent in the 20th century, John is talked  into posing as a millenial 
expert on Marietta's show where his prophesying of the end of the world 
in four days time suddenly gains him a following.
Among the profusion of millennium themed films either being commissioned 
or trying to cash in at the moment, this is one of the few that actually 
uses the date with any significance. Among the majority of other 
millennial films the date is of almost to no relevance. The crucial 
question should be whether it makes any difference to the story whether 
the film is set around the millennial crunch point or upon another date 
to which in most cases the answer is invariably a resounding no.
This Newfoundland-made production concerns itself with the Biblical End 
Times prophecies etc etc. The whole hysteria is gently deflated by a 
highly engaging sense of humour. For one the film plays upon John the 
Baptist's turning up in Newfoundland, somewhere that is generally 
regarded by the rest of Canadians as being the hayseed boondocks of the 
country. For the most part the film doesn't concern too much with the 
theological issues but rather sets itself up as a highly amusing 
outsider comedy with St John played as an innocent amid civilization. 
The contrasts of cultures between John circa 0 A.D. and now are rather 
wittily played: "Do you think they know we're watching them ?" John asks 
upon watching tv for the first time. Director/writer Doyle also jabs a 
number of irreverent jokes at the Catholic church - with the Pope being 
brought ordained animal biscuits and being seen being given a pedicure 
by an obeisant nun; and in one bawdy joke having a drunken John throwing 
up while in telepathic prayer communication with The Pope.
Doyle's greatest ability, aside from a wonderful sense of humour, is an 
ability to get the best from an excellent ensemble cast. Raoul Bhaneja 
affects just the right balance of serene aloofness and naive earnestness 
as John. And Mary Walsh's performance blind to most of what is going on 
is marvellous - there's an hilarious conversation between her and 
Bhaneja with her misinterpreting his Christ-like proclamations, "I am 
not a man" to hysterical effect. Immensely enjoyable.
Reviewed at the 1998 Vancouver International Film Festival
Copyright 1998 Richard Scheib


Title
Review for "Riget II" (1997) (mini)
Denmark. 1997. Directors - Morton Arnfred & Lars von Trier, Teleplay - 
von Trier, Tumas Gislason & Niels Vorsel, Photography - Erik Kress, 
Music - Joachim Holbeck, Special Effects - Lars Holding Andersen & 
Arnette Rolfshoj, Makeup Effects - Kim & Lis Olsson, Production Design - 
Jette Lehmann & Mans Cmr. Lindholm. Production Company - DH TV/Danish 
Broadcasting Corporation/Zentropa Entertainment.
Ernst Hugo Jaregard (Dr Stig Helmer), Holger Juul Hansen (Dr Einar 
Moesgaard), Kirsten Rolffes (Sigrid Drusse), Soren Pilmark (Kroshoj), 
Peter Mygind (Mogge Moesgaard), Birgitte Raaberg (Judith), Ghita Norby 
(Rigmor), Udo Kier (Little Brother/Dr Aage Krueger), Jens Okking (Bulder 
Drusse), Erik Wedersoe (Ole), Ole Boisen (Christian), Louise Fribo 
(Sanne), Baard Owe (Professor Bondo), Vita Jensen & Morten Rotne-Leffers 
(Dishwashers), Henning Jensen (Bob), Birthe Neumann (Mrs Svendsen)
Plot: At The Kingdom hospital in Copenhagen, Stig Helmer returns from 
Haiti with a potion with which he intends to turn his rival Kroshoj into 
a zombie but this goes astray and Stig must find and revive Kroshoj's 
corpse before he is arrested for murder. Meanwhile Judith, having been 
impregnated by the ghost of Dr Aage Krueger, has given birth to a freak 
baby which has an adult's head, a giant elongated body and a soul that 
is half-human, half-Devil, and is now wanted by Aage Krueger who is in 
reality Satan.
The 1994 Danish four-part tv mini-series `The Kingdom' was given a 
cinematic release in arthouse theatres in English-speaking countries 
where it was split into two two and-a-half hour parts. There the name of 
co-director Lars von Trier, then riding high on the success of 1991's 
Cannes hit `Zentropa' aka `Europa', was sufficient to carry it to 
audiences. The result was a delightfully eccentric piece of black comedy 
that suggested a head-on collision between `Twin Peaks' and `ER'. The 
series however was left unfinished, ending on the cliffhanger of the 
birth of the ghost-impregnated baby and a `to be continued' credit. But 
true to their word von Trier, co-director Morton Arnfred and the entire 
cast return here three years later to continue the saga, which once 
again aired as a four-part mini-series in Denmark and has elsewhere been 
released as a theatrical two-parter.
However `The Kingdom II', although not unenjoyable, is a relative 
disappointment over its predecessor. There is a certain ricketiness to 
the story. It comes with the distinct sense that von Trier and Arnfred 
are not so much continuing a story that is waiting to be completed than 
they are fairly much making the saga up as they go along. Many aspects 
of the original have undergone noticeable changes. The character of Dr 
Aage Krueger (played by Udo Kier) goes from the shadowy figure of a 
doctor who killed a young girl in the first mini-series to now become 
The Devil himself; the ghost ambulance from the first mini-series is now 
unconvincingly passed off as being a group of med students conducting 
daredevil bets. And the pivotal character of Mary, the ghost of the 
little girl that haunted the hospital in the first mini-series, is 
almost entirely dropped from the sequel bar a token dream appearance. 
Further the tone of the second series seems to have changed somewhat - 
with the sidelining of the character of Mary and the sequel's principal 
concentration on the more mundane fates of the various lead characters, 
the series loses much of the eerie sense of otherworldliness that 
hovered over the first series. Although there is some substitute in the 
bizarre scenes with Udo Kier playing a baby that has an adult head and a 
twelve-foot tall elongated body, wailing to his mother and cooingly 
dreaming of the future they might lead together.
This series at times feels overly long but it is largely carried by its 
sense of black comedy. Chief among which is Ernst Hugo Jaregard's 
hilarious performance once again as the conniving, disgruntled Swedish 
surgeon. There are some highly amusing scenes in his ongoing battles to 
avoid bailiffs or in mixing up which coffee cup he has placed a voodoo 
potion in during a staff conference or his plans to zombify his rival 
which keep going wrong. Birthe Neumann has an extremely funny part as an 
overly efficient secretary, who, after the decision that costs must be 
kept down by buying low denomination stamps, pops up to ask whereabouts 
on a letter entirely covered by stamps she is meant to place the 
address. Although the most hysterical sequence in the entire film is the 
character of a Jamaican faith healer who wanders in to heal a concussed 
Kirsten Rolffes and removes a large clump of bloody tissue from the back 
of her head and eats it, noting "It's the next best substitute since 
they took the Vitamin C out of Danish beer."
The biggest downside to the sequel is the end credit `to be continued' 
and the realization that one has sat through another five hours with no 
end in sight and that this means another three years and another five 
hours to wait for the saga to be wrapped up, if that.
Reviewed at the 1998 Wellington International Film Festival
Copyright Richard Scheib 1998


Title
Review for Idle Hands (1999)
USA. 1999. Director - Rodman Flender, Screenplay - Terri Hughes & Ron 
Milbauer, Producers - Jennifer & Suzanne Todd, Photography - Christopher 
Baffa, Music - Graeme Revell, Music Supervisor - John Houlihan, Visual 
Effects - VCE (Supervisors - Peter Kuran & Ted Rae), Special Effects 
Supervisor - Lou Carlucci, Makeup Effects - Cannom Creations (Supervisors - 
Greg Cannom, Brian Swipe & Todd Tucker), Makeup Effects Designed & Produced 
by Keith Vanderlaan, Production Design - Greg Melton. Production Company - 
Licht-Mueller Film Corp/Team Todd.
Devon Sawa (Anton Tobias), Seth Green (Mick), Eldon Henson (Pnub), Jessica 
Alba (Molly), Jack Noseworthy (Randy), Vivica A. Fox (Sister Debi Liquer)
Plot: The town of Bolan is being terrorized by a killer. Teenage slacker and 
dopehead Anton Tobias makes the discovery, after finding his parents bodies, 
that he is the killer and that his right hand is possessed by a demonic 
spirit that always takes over the laziest person it can find. His murderous 
hand kills his two best friends who return as zombies. But the three of them 
find that not even severing his hand manages to stop it.
In the last couple of years, the teen horror film has made a major revival. 
It was all begun with 1996's ‘Scream' which nostalgiacally looked back to 
slasher films of the mid-1980s while wittily parodying the conventions of 
the genre. Its success was followed by the likes of the ‘I Know What You Did 
Last Summer' films, ‘Urban Legend' (1998), ‘Disturbing Behavior' (1998) and 
‘The Faculty' (1998), as well as the cult success of tv's ‘Buffy the Vampire 
Slayer' (1997- ). If ‘Halloween', ‘Friday the 13th' and their copious 
imitators were horror films of the early 1980s Me Generation leftovers, then 
these are Generation X horror films. Here the anonymous teens that filled 
the mid-1980s equivalents have been replaced by a more savvy, cynical teens 
who come wittily post-informed by the conventions of the genre and who will 
compare and paraphrase their situation with in-referents to other horror 
films at the drop of a hat. At their best - the likes of ‘Scream and ‘The 
Faculty' - these films are witty and intelligent genre deconstructions; at 
their least, the likes of ‘I Still Know What You Did Last Summer' and ‘Urban 
Legend', these are sad copies of films that lack the werewithal to see they 
are jumping on a bandwagon that roots itself in media self-awareness and end 
up in a case of the Emperor's New Clothes, of merely being slasher film 
imitators made on an A-budget.
If the ‘Scream' films et al are Generation X horror films, then ‘Idle Hands' 
is surely the first slacker horror film -one of its continuing comic riff 
concerns itself with the three principal teens' dope-smoking habits. But 
sadly there isn't a great deal to the film more than half a concept. (And 
most of its ideas are stolen from other films - the possessed and severed 
hand idea seems a feature-length expansion of the comic sequence that was 
done with far greater sophistry in ‘The Evil Dead II', the two undead 
friends are a blatant steal from ‘An American Werewolf in London'). The 
overall idea of a possessed hand is fairly lame - and in terms of horror the 
hand holds so little threat as to border on the laughable. And nothing on 
screen has any inspiration that transforms the film anywhat either - the 
scenes with Sawa contorting about as he fights his hand come out as 
singularly unfunny. A good comic performer and mime artist could have made 
this work but Sawa's performance abilities are thoroughly unexceptional. 
There's one mildly amusing sequence where Sawa's hand makes aggressive moves 
on Jessica Alba leaving him torn between its aggression and his natural 
introversion but which she decides she rather likes, even taking him tying 
his hand up to the bed as something kinky. The whole film gives the 
impression of wanting to open up into something much more raucous and 
vulgar, but director Flender does the criminal thing for this type of film - 
he is too tame, his vulgarity lacks imagination. At least it's a better film 
than Flender's debut feature ‘Leprechaun 2' (1994).


Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
USA. 1998. Director - Peter Weir, Screenplay - Andrew Niccol, Producers 
- Niccol, Edward S. Feldman, Scott Rudin & Adam Schroeder, Photography - 
Peter Biziou, Music - Burkhard Dallwitz, Visual Effects Supervisor - 
Micheal J. McAlister, Visual Effects - Cinesite (Supervisor - Brad 
Kuehn), The Computer Film Co & Matte World Digital (Supervisor - Craig 
Barron), Special Effects Supervisor - Larz Anderson, Production Design - 
Dennis Gassner. Production Company - Paramount.
Jim Carrey (Truman Burbank), Ed Harris (Christof), Laura Linney (Meryl 
Burbank/Helen Gill), Noah Emmerich (Marlon/Louis Coltrane), Natascha 
McElhone (Lauren Garland/Sylvia)
Plot: Truman Burbank leads an ordinary untroubled life as an insurance 
salesman and a married man. Unaware of it the entire town he lives in is 
an artificial construct, everyone around him really being an actor and 
he really the subject of `The Truman Show', a reality tv show that is 
watched by millions where every thing that has happened since he was 
born has been scripted and his every reaction filmed. But a series of 
mishaps - a fallen spotlight, his accidental tuning into a radio channel 
monitoring him, the reappearance of the actor playing his father who was 
killed off - make him begin to suspect the artificiality of his reality. 
He holds a secret longing for an extra that once tried to tell him the 
truth before being caught and makes a concerted attempt to leave the 
town to find her, while the entire cast and crew make every effort to 
stop him.
‘The Truman Show' was written by New Zealander Andrew Niccol. Niccol 
made an impressive writing/directing debut with last year's ‘Gattaca' 
and continues to impress again here. It is possible in ‘Truman' that 
Niccol may have been inspired by Bernard Tavernier's `La Mort en 
Direct/Deathwatch' (1979) which was set in a future where death was so 
rare that a woman with a rare terminal condition became secretly without 
her knowledge the subject of a tv show. However Niccol's treatment of 
the theme here is remarkable and unique, making for that rarity of a 
film that is wholly original.
The central premise in ‘Truman' is that Jim Carrey makes the discovery 
that his entire life is part of a tv show that is being scripted and 
played out by the people around him for a watching audience of billions. 
One is not spoiling any big surprise by telling this as the film's 
publicity machine makes one aware of this from the start. Half the fun 
in the film comes from its' setting up Carrey's idyllic lifestyle and 
then letting us watching the subtle intrusions the tv show make into the 
familiarity of its ‘reality' - a crowd crossing the street suddenly 
freezing as a feedback whine jams their earpieces; people contriving to 
twist situations so they can stop and conduct product endorsements or 
push Carrey into shot up against advertising billboards; the marvellous 
little excuses that keep getting invented every time something goes 
wrong or Carrey tries to leave the town - there's an hilarious visit to 
a travel agent's office where the background is filled with travel 
posters which instead of offering invitations to sunny destinations 
advertise in the direst tones possible the hazards of travel. The film 
even starts to cleverly play with audience perceptions - what one takes 
to be a standard musical score playing throughout is revealed as being 
played by background musicians; or the moment the hero's best friend 
makes a heartfelt plea "Would I lie to you ?" and the film pulls away to 
reveal this as a scripted line being fed into an earpiece. Most of the 
shots in the film mimic the camera shots of reality tv shows. Even the 
opening credits are for the tv show rather than for the film.
Peter Weir becomes the first director to tone down and actually obtain a 
relatively sane performance out of Jim Carrey. All of Carrey's previous 
films - ‘The Mask' (1994), ‘The Cable Guy' (1996), ‘Liar Liar' (1997) 
and the ‘Ace Ventura' movies - have been founded completely as veritable 
amphitheatres for Carrey's rafter-rattling histrionics. Weir is the 
first director to tone Carrey's irritatingly loud facial gymnastics down 
and allow the story on its own to carry the film. One can't help but 
think a more average-seeming performer might have been better suited to 
the film but still Carrey acquits himself capably upon this occasion - 
although ironically only by failing to dominate the film.
The conceptual audacity of both ‘Gattaca' and ‘Truman' show Niccol as 
one of the most promising young writers around at the moment. Niccol 
indeed has the ability of all good science-fiction writers to construct 
scenarios that are extrapolated from a single ‘What If' premise - how 
would a genetic dropout survive in a world founded on genetic purity ? 
what if a man found his entire life was being staged as a tv show ? - 
and to work the premises to thoroughly logical conclusions. In both 
cases Niccol intriguingly creates heroes whose entire struggles centre 
on having to outwit and subvert an entire social order that is set 
against them A quite remarkable film.


Title
Review for eXistenZ (1999)
Canada/UK. 1999. Director/Screenplay - David Cronenberg, Producers - 
Cronenberg, Andras Hamori & Robert Lantos, Photography - Peter Suschitsky, 
Music - Howard Shore, Visual Effects/Special Effects Supervisor - Jim Isaac, 
Digital Effects - Toybox (Supervisor - Dennis Benardi), Makeup Effects - 
Steven Dupuis, Creature Effects - Kelly Lepowsky, Production Design - Carol 
Spier. Production Company - Alliance Atlantis/Serendipity Point 
Films/Natural Nylon.
Jennifer Jason Leigh (Allegra Geller), Jude Law (Ted Pikul), Willem Dafoe 
(Gas), Ian Holm (Kari Vinokur), Don McKellar (Yevgeny Nourish), Robert A. 
Silverman (D=Arcy Nader), Callum Keith Rennie (Hugo Carlaw), Sarah Polley 
(Merle)
Plot: An assassination attempt is made on celebrity virtual reality games 
designer Allegra Geller as she premieres her new VR game eXistenZ in a  
church. She flees, accompanied by her appointed security aide, Antenna 
Research corporate intern Ted Pikul. Attempting to introduce the VR neophyte 
Ted to her work, she has him implanted with one of the spinal bio-ports into 
which the organic consoles plug. But once inside eXistenZ, they are drawn 
into a disturbing game between two rival factions that are seeking to gain 
control of the game where they are no longer sure what is real and what is 
illusion.
If 1998's big theme was asteroid collision and tv-turned-reality movies and 
1997's was volcano disaster movies and 1996's was big budget alien invasion 
films, then this year's trend is shaping up to be Virtual Reality movies - 
what with ‘The Matrix', ‘eXistenZ' and the upcoming ‘The Thirteenth Floor'.
‘eXistenZ' is the second of the year's VR movies. Although jumping on the 
Virtual Reality trend, or any type of bandwagon, is never exactly something 
you could accuse Canadian director David Cronenberg of doing. Cronenberg is 
probably one of the most unique and original voices in the sf/horror genre. 
His body of work - which ranges from ‘Stereo' (1969), ‘Crimes of the Future' 
(1970), ‘Shivers' aka ‘They Came from Within/The Parasite Murders' (1974), 
‘Rabid' (1976), ‘The Brood' (1979), ‘Fast Company' (1979), ‘Scanners' 
(1981), ‘Videodrome' (1983), ‘The Dead Zone' (1983), ‘The Fly' (1986), ‘Dead 
Ringers' (1988), ‘Naked Lunch' (1991), ‘M. Butterfly' (1993) and ‘Crash' 
(1996) (with all bar ‘Fast Company' and ‘M. Butterfly' being sf-horror 
works) - is something that rings with a voice of startling originality. 
Throughout Cronenberg's work runs a fascination with bodily horrors - he 
could be accused of being the first Manichean horror film-maker. Cronenberg 
regularly crafts striking metaphoric images - be it a woman's body being 
taken over by a vampiric organ under her armpit in ‘Rabid'; psychological 
repressions manifesting themselves in flesh form in ‘The Brood' or the 
scientist slowly melding into a fly in ‘The Fly'. But, unlike any classic 
horror film, the process of mutation, indeed the mad scientists themselves, 
in Cronenberg's oeuvre, are rarely processes of horror in any established 
sense - they are ones that seem to be welcomed as transformational 
experiences by the victims. In ‘The Fly', for example, the protagonist 
welcomes his transformation with an eager scientific fascination; in 
‘Videodrome' and ‘Crash' we see people integrating with tv's and cars in 
ways that offer perverse new combinations of humanity and technology.
‘eXistenZ' is Cronenberg's most overtly commercial film in more than a 
decade. From ‘Dead Ringers' onward Cronenberg has determinedly pushed 
boundaries in terms of sheer perversity while having left behind any easy 
pigeonholing as a genre director. His adaptations of ‘Naked Lunch', William 
S. Burroughs' surreal and plotless ramble through drugs and homosexuality, 
and ‘Crash', J.G. Ballard's work of ‘auto'-eroticism, have been 
controversial to the say the least, being dogged by jittery financiers and 
distributors, while his mainstream adaptation of ‘M. Butterfly' was a 
commercial flop. During this time Cronenberg's career was on such shaky 
financial ground he was been forced to make ends meet by working as an actor 
in films like ‘Nightbreed' (1990), ‘To Die For' (1995), ‘Extreme Measures' 
(1996) and ‘Last Night' (1998).
Amid the dross that is being churned out on in the name of Virtual Reality 
cinema, one looks with interest to see what Cronenberg's peculiarly carnal 
fascinations would bring to the subject. His fascination with bio-technology 
immediately starts to creep in. Instead of keyboards people manipulate 
consoles that look like sheep's bladders which are attached via an 
intestine-like cable to a puckered orifice in the spinal column. Naturally 
being Cronenberg, the spinal bio-port orifice is played up for maximum 
sexual imagery with people seen tonguing and fingering it. Meanwhile 
assassains wield guns that are made out of human bone and tissue, in order 
to get past metal detectors, and which fire teeth. The start of the film 
with the assassination attempt, the flight and the encounter with Willem 
Dafoe (in an amusing cameo that in any lesser budgeted film should be 
mandatorily played by Brad Dourif) is engrossing. It is all aided by a 
marvellously brooding and oppressive score from regular Cronenberg 
collaborator Howard Shore.
The first entry into VR doesn't come until nearly 30 minutes into the film 
and is well led up to. But thereafter the film sorts of falls apart. In fact 
for the high standards that one expected of Cronenberg, the script falls 
into some of the more disappointingly hackneyed cliches that has dogged the 
VR film. Like engaging in the series of perpetual flips where people are 
wondering if the game is over yet and what is assumed to be reality is 
intruded in upon - ‘Total Recall' (1990) (a disappointing treatment of the 
VR theme which incidentally was originally to have been made by Cronenberg) 
did these types of flips with far greater dexterity than Cronenberg does 
here. There's a labyrinthine (and never entirely clear) plot (reminiscent of 
the 1993 tv mini-series ‘Wild Palms') involving two different factions 
trying to, for reasons obscure, gain control of the VR game. As one of the 
character's eventually says "There are too many twists going on to follow." 
Indeed the rules of the VR game ‘eXistenZ' are never spelt out. Nor does 
what happen ever seem particularly game-like - Cronenberg seems to have 
taken a leaf from the book of David Lynch in having people standing about 
muttering surreal non-sequitirs in arch deadpan. The VR sequences are not 
without their amusements - like when the two leads find themselves 
controlled by character development and being forced into a gratuitous love 
scene. But when the film ends on what has rapidly become the VR equivalent 
of the old "It was all a dream" twist ending, one wants to yell at 
Cronenberg at the corniness of the device.
‘eXistenZ' feels like Cronenberg's least personal and most routine film 
since his adaptation of Stephen King's ‘The Dead Zone'. It feels less like a 
Cronenberg film than like a film in which a by-the-numbers VR plot has had a 
handful of Cronenbergian imagery grafted onto it. And when one looks for the 
characteristically perverse Cronenbergian flourishes, the imagery seems 
conspicuously lacking in any of the vividity of scenes in past Cronenberg 
films - like Samantha Eggar's brood of external foetuses in ‘The Brood'; the 
wonderfully queasy image in ‘Videodrome' of James Woods tentatively poking a 
gun inside the hole in his stomach then losing it; or in ‘Crash' of James 
Spader having sex wherein he treats the wound in Rosanna Arquette's leg as a 
substitute vagina. Even the most vivid image of the organic gun here seems 
to be one that Cronenberg has cannibalized from the image of the literal 
‘hand-gun' fusion in ‘Videodrome'.


Title
Review for Whispers in the Dark (1992)
USA. 1992. Director/Screenplay - Christopher Crowe, Producers - Martin & 
Michael S. Bregman, Photography - Michael Chapman, Music - Thomas 
Newman, Special Effects - Connie Brink Sr, Makeup - Neal Martz, 
Production Design - John Jay Moore. Production Company - Paramount.
Annabella Sciorra (Dr Ann Hecker), Jamey Sheridan (Douglas McDowell), 
Anthony La Paglia (Detective Larry Morgenstern), Alan Alda (Dr Leo 
Green), John Leguizamo (Johnny C.), Deborah Unger (Eve Abergray), Jill 
Clayburgh (Sarah Green)
Plot: Therapist Ann Hecker meets Douglas McDowell in the elevator of her 
office building and becomes involved with him. But then she discovers he 
may be involved with one of her patients, the volatile Eve Abergray. But 
then after Eve finds them together and swears vengeance, she is found 
murdered in her apartment. As the police investigate, Ann hides behind 
patient confidentiality, uncertain whether Douglas or others around her 
are the murderer.
Christopher Crowe is a director/writer who has kicked around the 
thriller genre for more than a decade now, turning out scripts for films 
like `Nightmares' (1983), `The Last of the Mohicans' (1992) and `Fear' 
(1996) without having made any significant name for himself. Crowe made 
his feature debut with `Saigon' aka `Off Limits' (1988), an interesting 
attempt to combine film noir and the mid-1980s vogue for Vietnam War 
redemption films. But at least on the basis of 'Whispers in the Dark' 
Crowe should have achieved considerably more of a name than he has so 
far. `Whispers' is really quite an impressive thriller - indeed it reads 
like a much better version of the same year's failed psycho-therapy 
thriller `Final Analysis' (which ended up doing all the business while 
the superior 'Whispers' was seen by few). Crowe holds one right from his 
opening which is constructed as a romance. Here the softness of Crowe's 
touch and the deftness of his writing immediately absorbs one in the 
film. Crowe then propels one through a sharply plotted series of rug 
pulling twists - the revelation that patient Unger's fantasy man is the 
same one Sciorra is seeing; detective La Paglia's games with Sciorra as 
to how much he knows all along; and the whole dance of doubt as to 
whether love interest Sheridan is or isn't the killer. Crowe also 
manages to quite believably and without contrivation turn most of the 
principal cast into suspects. The end revelation of the killer's 
identity is a considerable surprise - one where the cast member in 
question plays notably against type. And above all, unlike `Final 
Analysis', Crowe never lets any of the twists occur in contravention of 
logic or plausibility. One wishes Mr Crowe would get the opportunity to 
make more films.


Title
Review for Last Night (1998)
Canada/France. 1998. Director/Screenplay - Don McKellar, Producers - Niv 
Fichman & Daniel Iron, Photography - Douglas Koch, Music - Alexina Louie 
& Alex Pauk, Digital Visual Effects - Buzz Image Group (Supervisor - 
Stephane Landry), Special Effects Supervisor - John LaForet, Production 
Design - John Dondertman. Production Company - Red Violin 
Productions/Rhombus Media/Odeon Films Inc/Le Sept Arte/Canadian 
Broadcasting Corporation/Haut et Corte/Canada Television and Cable 
Production Fund/Telefilm Canada/Equity Investment Program/The Canadian 
Film or Video Tax Credit.
Don McKellar (Patrick Wheeler), Sandra Oh (Sandra), Calvin Keith Rennie 
(Craig Zwiller), David Cronenberg (Duncan), Tracey Wright (Donna), 
Genevieve Bujold (Mrs Carlton), Robin Gammell (Mr Wheeler), Roberta 
Maxwell (Mrs Wheeler), Sarah Polley (Jennifer Wheeler), Karen Glave 
(Lily), Trent McCullen (Alex)
Plot: The world is due to end at midnight - there are six hours left. 
Architect Patrick Wheeler tries to escape his family's attempts to 
celebrate a Christmas dinner, desiring to spend it alone and refusing to 
treat the day as any different and engage in meaningless gestures. But 
he is instead drawn in to helping a woman, Sandra, make her way home 
across a city that is collapsing into anarchy so that she can commit 
suicide with her husband. Meanwhile Patrick's best friend Craig 
determines to spend his remaining hours fulfilling all of his sexual 
fantasies, while a gas company executive sets out to ring every client 
and assure them the gas will be kept on until the very end.
This was one of six international films commissioned in 1998 to 
commemorate the turn of the millennium. Others in the series included 
the Taiwanese 'The Hole' and Hal Hartley's 'Book of Life'. 'Last Night' 
is the Canadian representative and marks the directorial debut of 
actor/screenwriter Don McKellar.
McKellar's film is never specifically mentioned as taking place around 
the millenial turning point. Rather McKellar's spin is to use the 
connection as the springboard for an intriguingly thoughtful What If ? 
drama, to ask how various people would meet the end if everybody had 
only six hours left to live. McKellar has stated that he didn't want to 
make a 'Deep Impact' or an 'Armageddon'. And the difference between 
these and what McKellar is attempting to achieve is immediately apparent 
- where 'Deep Impact' and 'Armageddon' are driven by state of the art 
special effects and feature only cliche-ridden human dramas, 'Last 
Night' is low-key and driven by characterization. (McKellar has said his 
model for his film was 'The Day the Earth Caught Fire' (1961), although 
the film he actually comes closest to is the little seen 1990 drama 
'Miracle Mile' and to some extent the 'The Last Night of the World' 
segment of 'The Illustrated Man' (1968)). McKellar is wholly unconcerned 
with the show-stopping spectacle of disaster movies - to such extent 
that the type of disaster that is about to occur is never specified 
apart from a vague reference near the end about how there is no night 
anymore which suggests something to do with the sun. The only special 
effects McKellar offers is the most simple effect of having the screen 
white out when the disaster comes.
But where McKellar eschews special effects he achieves considerable 
dramatic effect with small nevertheless potent background details - the 
radio station on the soundtrack that spends the hours counting down the 
Top 500 songs of All Time; the casual suggestion that McKellar makes to 
Oh that she just steal a car to drive home and her sudden realization 
that civilized nicety doesn't matter anymore (the subsequent break-in 
scene amusingly sends up every action movie cliche of trying to jump 
start a car); the hooker who says that she wants to experience an 
orgasm; the people who just sit on a tram car waiting even when they 
know no driver is coming. McKellar's does have a certain awkwardness in 
handling some of the actors in the early scenes but the film quickly 
absorbs and builds a strong climax. Unlike 'Deep Impact' et al none of 
the characters are cliches, each are written with depth and complexity. 
Perhaps the nearest that McKellar comes to cliche is reserving the 
humour for the most obvious target - Rennie as the friend who is 
determined to fulfil all his sexual fantasies - but even that produces 
an extremely funny scene where Rennie awkwardly propositions McKellar 
about trying gay sex. Maybe also one would have liked to have seen a 
little more given over to David Cronenberg's executive character who 
remains a relative enigma. But these are minor faults in an otherwise 
original and undeniably intelligent End of the World drama.
Viewed at the 1998 Vancouver International Film Festival
Copyright Richard Scheib 1998


Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
USA. 1998. Director - Michael Bay, Screenplay - Jonathan Hensleigh, 
Adaption - Tony Gilroy & Shane Salerno, Story - Hensleigh & Robert Roy 
Pool, Producers - Bay, Jerry Bruckheimer & Gale Ann Hurd, Photography - 
John Schwartzman, Music - Trevor Rabin, Visual Effects Supervisors - 
Richard Hoover & Pat McClung, Visual Effects - DreamQuest Images, 
Additional Visual Effects - Blue Sky/VIFX (Supervisor Richard E. 
Hollander) & Digital Domain (Supervisor - Erik Nash), Paris Sequence 
Supervised by Hoyt Yeatman, Digital Effects Supervisor - Darin Hollings, 
Digital Effects - Cinesite (Supervisor - Carlos Aguello) & Tippett 
Studio (Supervisor - Bruce Nicholson), Special Effects Supervisor - John 
Frazier, Production Design - Michael White, Supervising Art Director - 
Geoff Hubbard. Production Company - Touchstone/Jerry Bruckheimer 
Pictures/Valhalla Motion Pictures.
Bruce Willis (Harry Stamper), Billy Bob Thornton (Dan Truman), Ben 
Affleck (A.J. Frost), Liv Tyler (Grace Stamper), Steve Buscemi 
(Rockhound), Will Patton (Charles `Chickie' Chapple), William Fichtner 
(Colonel Willie Sharp), Ken Hudson Campbell (Max Lennert), Michael 
Duncan (Jayotis `Bear' Kurleenbear), Peter Stormare (Lev Andropov), 
Keith David (General Kimsey), Owen Wilson (Oscar Choi), Jason Isaacs 
(Ronald Quincy), Jessica Steen (Jennifer Watts)
Plot: When an asteroid the size of Texas is discovered nearing Earth, it 
capable of obliterating all life on the planet if it hits, NASA's only 
hope to save the world is to recruit a team of hard-headed, 
anti-authoritarian oil riggers to go up into orbit, land on the asteroid 
and drill to its core to plant and detonate a nuclear weapon to divert 
its path.
In the same way 1997 was dominated by twin volcano disaster movies 
(`Dante's Peak', `Volcano'), so 1998 is dominated by twin astral body 
collision disaster movies with both `Deep Impact' and `Armageddon' vying 
for our attentions. Despite the commonality of themes, both are quite 
different films - `Deep Impact' was a tepid soap opera melodrama about 
how people meet the end, while `Armageddon' is an out-and-out action 
film. A likely comparison might be between `Saving Private Ryan' and 
`The Dirty Dozen' - while both are essentially World War II mission 
movies they are told with quite opposing emphases.
`Armageddon' comes with an absolute determination to be as BIG as it 
possibly can. It has a reported budget of $272 million which, if 
accurate, makes it second only to `Titanic' in size. Perhaps the most 
amusing thing about the budget is that the film's advertizing campaign 
was almost as large as the actual production budget of the film itself. 
One certainly can't deny that it has been effective. One has been 
bombarded by the film's quite nifty promotional campaign for months - 
giant digital displays in theatre foyers counting down the days, minutes 
and seconds until the film's opening; posters featuring the faces of the 
principal characters plastered around the city - "He's doing it for 
heroism", "She's doing it for love". If only then there had been a film 
that had been worth such epical effort. Unlike `Titanic', which 
contradicted accusations of gross over-spending and turned it around to 
become the success story of 1997, `Armageddon' emerges as only a 
spectacular monument to its own self-promotion and self-importance over 
the provision of anything of substance.
Director Michael Bay's previous films - `Bad Boys' (1995) and `The Rock' 
(1996) - have been filled with gratuitous action sequences and 
`Armageddon' represents Bay's excesses at their most extravagantly 
empty-headed. The film is conceived around the provision of a series of 
dramatic peaks every ten minutes or so. But all Bay seems capable of 
doing is substituting rapid editing, explosions, flashing lights, people 
yelling orders at each other all at once, and a dramatically hyping 
musical score for any real sense of drama. Each action sequence - the 
destruction of Mir, the landing, the liftoff, the buggy jump, the meteor 
shower - is just so brainlessly empty in its absurdly over-hyped 
dramatic contrivations and so unbelieivable as realistic drama that, 
contrary to what Bay is hoping to achieve, you just sit allowing all the 
sound and fury to wash over you without even the remotest sense of 
connection. The writing is absurdly one-dimensional - Steve Buscemi has 
no purpose in the film other than to crack wry one-liners and Liv Tyler 
is there it seems simply because the film needs a female lead. It is 
hard to believe that the nuclear detonation sequence can with complete 
seriousness offer up such old hat bomb detonation cliches as people 
yelling "The red or the blue wire ?" and the digital countdown stopping 
three seconds before detonation. And despite the presensce of at least 
three scientific advisors on the credits, the film is scientifically 
preposterous - in a vacuum space shuttles conduct aerial turns like jet 
fighters; atmospheric turbulence is encountered on a slingshot around 
The Moon; gravity is inexplicably on while aboard the asteroid and Mir 
but off back aboard the shuttles; and there is a really, really 
ridiculous sequence where people are able to turn an extra-vehicular 
buggy into a flying vehicle simply by turning its gravitic stabilizers 
off.
It has been a long time since one has seen a film which so relentlessly 
celebrates its own brainlessness. It wants to be a film about heroism. 
Heroism here is represented by Real Men - their sweat, their stubble, 
their muscular brawn, the handsomeness of their faces is shot in 
emphatic highlight. It is clear that these are Real Men because they do 
Real Men things like ride bikes, fast cars and horses, gamble, have 
tattoos, party in stripper bars and above all never give up on a job. 
But all the heroism comes absurdly posed. The sweat and the stubble on 
the heroes all comes like it is shot for some fashion layout. The film 
wants to convince us of some triumph of working class ordinariness but 
the sheer everyman quality of its heroes is shot in such a way that it 
attracts attention to the very artificiality of the attempt to do so. 
And what the film ends up celebrating is not so much a sense of heroism 
as an adolescent anti-authoritism. I would be greatly concerned if the 
fate of the world rested on a group of roughnecks who, among other 
things, start firing at each other with shotguns when they are annoyed; 
someone who keeps protesting "She didn't tell me her age, I swear"; and 
someone who explains their failure at psychological tests on the grounds 
they were dumped on their head as a child. Everybody on the opposite 
side of the coin to the heroes is characterized as double-dealing 
military or ineffectual because they haven't done any `real' work. In 
its opening moments the film celebrates a scene where the hero fires 
golfballs at a circling Greenpeace ship while one of his offsiders asks 
"What's wrong with drilling for oil ?" While one may not always agree 
with Greenpeace's methodology, the film's mindless celebration of 
environmental plundering on the grounds that it is a test of real men's 
courage and the characterization of protestors as worthy of contempt is 
something that verges on intolerance. Similarly the film gets a big joke 
out of putting its heroes in a position when they can give the finger to 
the government and demand they never pay taxes again - but when you see 
that all the men seem to do with their money is to blow it gambling and 
in stripper bars, you are struck less by the film's sense of the triumph 
of heroic take-no-shit individualism than you are by its sense of macho 
self-centeredness.
And it doesn't just stop there. It is not merely the mindless machimo of 
the heroism that sticks in one's craw, it is the mindless patriotism of 
it too. One cannot remember seeing a film before which featured so many 
shots of people posing in front of the American flag. Like `Independance 
Day' before it, this is less a film about combatting a world-threatening 
menace than it is a triumphal assertion of a belief in American identity 
and individuality. It is not merely a film about Real Men who never give 
up on a job going into space to save the world, it is about Real Men 
going to boldly assert their idea of what America is all about. All the 
heroic posing comes intercut with weightedly symbolic shots of the 
American flag and cutaways to the Iwo Jima statue and the plaques 
commemorating the sacrifices of the Apollo mission. And the background 
is filled with incredibly sentimentalized and equally posed Norman 
Rockwell-esque shots of good ordinary folk gathered around haybarns 
listening to the radio or emerging from churches in slow motion. As a 
non-American I kind of find the cultural imperialism of it all rather 
hard to take. Most unbelievable of all is the moment the American 
President goes on air to announce the launch of the mission and people 
the world over sit and listen in reverential awe, masses of Indians even 
sit in front of the Taj Mahal in prayer. Give me a break ! All of this 
in itself may have been slightly more palatable had not the heroic 
spirit of American independance that we are being asked to cheer on not 
been one that is so sophomoric and adolescent.


Title
Review for Within the Rock (1996)
USA. 1996. Director/Screenplay - Gary J. Tunnicliffe, Producers - 
Stanley Isaacs, Scott McGinnis & Robert Patrick, Photography - Adam 
Kane, Music - Tony Fennell & Rod Gammons, Music Co-ordinator - Helen 
Gammons, Digital Effects Created by Eugene Jeoung, Additional Digital 
Effects - Post Modern Digital (Supervisor - Jim Tibbits), Spaceship CGI 
Effects - Corbitt Design, Battle Scarz Sequence Created and Designed by 
Nicholas Edgar, Special Effects Supervisor - Wayne Beauchamp, Creature 
Effects/Key Props - Image Animation International (Supervisor - 
Tunnicliffe), Production Design - Deborah Raymond & Dorian Vernacchio. 
Production Company - 360 entertainment/Le Monde Entertainment/Prism 
Pictures.
Caroline Barclay (Dr Dana Shaw), Xander Berkeley (Ryan), Barbara Patrick 
(Samantha `Nuke-em' Rogers), Michael Zelniker (Archer), Bradford Tatum 
(Cody Harrison), Duane Whitaker (Potter), Brian Krause (Luke Harrison), 
Calvin Levels (Banton), Dale Dye (General Hurst), Earl Boen (Michael 
Isaacs)
Plot: In the year 2019 a moon, nicknamed Galileo's Child, is discovered 
heading on an impact course with the Earth. A team of spacefaring 
drillers are sent up to plant a nuclear warhead that will divert the 
moon's course. But during the course of the drilling the team uncover an 
alien tomb and unwittingly revive a creature that has been placed there 
by an alien people millennia ago and now starts slaughtering them.
`Within the Rock' is the directing and writing debut of Gary J. 
Tunnicliffe. Tunnicliffe is probably better known as a makeup effects 
supervisor at the Image Animation facility, being responsible for work 
on the likes of `Candyman', `Lord of Illusions' and `Blade'. Tunnicliffe 
makes a potentially interesting debut.
The film's premise seems to have been borrowed outright by this year's 
mega-budgeted `Armageddon'. There are an alarming number of similarities 
between the two films - in both films a group of roughnecks are landed 
on an astral body that is on a collision course with Earth in order to 
drill to its core and plant a nuke to divert its path. Of course the 
part of the story that `Armageddon' didn't borrow is the latter 
two-thirds where the film turns into yet another copy of `Alien'. But 
the similarities are enough to make one wonder. The set up in the first 
third is by far the better part of the film - the basic idea is 
established with a certain verisimilitude, the characters are given a 
certain degree of rounded depth over the usual faceless victims that 
fill most `Alien' clones and the discovery of the tomb has an 
appropriate sense of eeriness.
But unfortunately once its monster is unleashed the film travels down 
all too familiar grounds. It had sort of given the hope it might 
actually be a little bit more than a run through all the familiar 
cliches with its potentially interesting premise but the creature 
effects, the suspense set-ups and twists are all too familiar. And the 
film emerges as nothing more than another routine B-budget `Alien' copy. 
The plot never makes it too clear at times exactly how some of the plans 
to defeat the creature are supposed to work. There are also moments of 
plotting that are quite silly - like when an alien language in binary 
code is translated and instantly emerges as Old Testament English. The 
film has been made on a clear cut budget - we see little of the 
asteroid, we do see its explosion but never the ship landing on it. 
Nevertheless the film shows Tunnicliffe is capable of better things. 
Certainly the film is a better debut than Tunnicliffe's fellow Image 
Animation supervisor Bob Keen made the same year with the amazingly 
silly `Proteus'.


Title
Review for Six-String Samurai (1998)
USA. 1998. Director - Lance Mungia, Screenplay - Mungia & Jeffrey 
Falcon, Producers - Michael Burns & Leanna Creel, Photography - Kristian 
Bernier, Music - Brian Tyler, Songs -The Red Elvises, Visual Effects - 
Jason Dunn, Production Design - Falcon. Production Company - HSX Films.
Jeffrey Falcon (Buddy), Justin McGuire (The Kid), Stephane Gauger 
(Death), Lex Lang (Voice of Death), John Sakisian (Russian General)
Plot: In 1957 the USA was devastated by a Russian nuclear strike. In 
Lost Vegas, Elvis was proclaimed the king. But now with the death of 
Elvis, the guitar and samurai-sword wielding Buddy seeks to become the 
new king. Reluctantly allowing himself to be accompanied by an orphan 
child that he saves, Buddy makes his way across the post-apocalyptic 
Nevada Desert, fighting off crazies, while pursued by Death who wants to 
usurp rock'n'roll with heavy metal.
It is not long into 'Six-String Samurai' when you wonder what on Earth 
it is you have sat down to watch. The opening moments feature a samurai 
sword-waving Buddy Holly lookalike (in the midst of what the opening 
credits tell us is a post-holocaust alternate world) despatching 
Neanderthal mutants and trio of bowlers who hide blades inside their 
bowling pins, while a group of mariachi Elvis-impersonators play on from 
the sideline. Subsequent encounters include brushes with a strange 
cannibal family and a Spinach Monster which, in what appears to be an 
attempt to parody bad sf movies, is represented by an eye on a 
corrugated pipe, with the rock'n'roll samurai hero all the while being 
pursued by a heavy metal-playing Death.
It rapidly becomes apparent that 'Six-String Samurai' is an offbeat 
indie experiment in cinematic textural meldings. It reads as a 
conflation of rock'n'roll mythology crossbred with Japanese samurai 
films, a parody of the whole 'Mad Max' post-holocaust genre and an 
attempt to be a bad sf movie. And it all gets pretty silly - the scenes 
with the moronic mutants conducting a 'Mad Max' style chase at about 
five miles per hour is quite inane.
But oddly enough all the silliness eventually develops a certain panache 
of sorts. Director Mungia manages all the action poses with a reasonable 
degree of style - the film and its low-budget chutzpah ends up reminding 
one to a lesser extent of Robert Rodriguez and what he set out to do in 
his 1993 debut 'El Mariachi'. Mungia's stroke of luck is his lead actor 
(also his co-writer and production designer) Jeffrey Falcon. Besides 
bearing an uncanny resemblance to Buddy Holly, Falcon pulls off the 
potentially absurd image of a bespectacled, bedraggled sword-wielding 
Buddy Holly with thorough conviction. Falcon also delivers the cod 
rock'n'roll dialogue with a wonderfully thin-lipped mealy pout and 
proves surprisingly lithe when it comes to all the fight poses. 
Ultimately the film proves an oddity that leaves one scratching their 
head in puzzlement, but not an unenjoyable one.


Title
Review for Deathline (1997)
Canada/Netherlands. 1997. Director - Tibor Takacs, Screenplay - Takacs & 
Brian Irving, Producer - Irving, Photography - Zoltan David, Music - Guy 
Zerafa, Visual Effects - Randall William Cook, Special Effects 
Supervisor - Jak Osmond, Production Design - Istvan Ocztos. Production 
Company - Nu Image/Mondofin/1204019 Ontario Inc.
Rutger Hauer (John Anderson Wade), Yvonne Scio (Marina K/Katya), Mark 
Dacascos (Merrick), Randall William Cook (Special Prosecutor Vanya), 
Michael Mehlman (Serge), Patrick Dreikauss (Mishka)
Plot: John Anderson Wade is shot and left for dead by his partner 
Merrick during an operation smuggling contraband into a near-future 
Russia. However Wade is revived from the dead by the special police 
prosecutor on orders of The President. Allowed to escape, Wade heads 
after Merrick, who has trying to take over Moscow's crime syndicates, to 
seek revenge. But as he pursues Merrick, Wade finds himself caught in 
games between The President, the Special Prosecutor and the crime 
syndicates.
Canada's Tibor Takacs is a director of modest B-films that has in the 
past proven capable of quietly surprising with  efforts like `I, Madman' 
aka `Hardcover' (1989), `The Gate' (1987) and its even better sequel 
`Gate II' (1990) being better than they might have seemed. Like a number 
of recent films, `Redline' takes a post-Soviet Russia as its setting. 
Takacs creates an abundance of atmosphere in the milieu of a Russian 
Mafia-dominated underworld - journeys through bathhouses, street 
markets, chic nightclubs, sports clubs where naked contestants engage in 
combat - suggesting both at once a world of decadence and near-anarchy. 
The interiors, shot in cavernous, Soviet Politburo-styled buildings, add 
a dazzling sense of verisimilitude - even if, ironically, the film was 
shot in Hungary. Set amid this are some neat science-fictional devices - 
flying spy satellites, virtual reality torture, advertisements for 
Hawaiian holiday resorts in Crimea. Although by and large the film 
doesn't seem that interested in its Cyberpunk background - writers like 
William Gibson, Jack Womack or Bruce Sterling would have had field days 
with this milieu. In fact with little rewriting the plot could  have 
easily have worked as a standard action film without the need for any 
future setting. Takacs quotes other films - the graveyard of fallen 
Communist statues from `GoldenEye' (1995); an amusing parody of the 
oft-copied Odessa Steps sequence from Eisenstein's `Battleship Potemkin' 
(1925), recreated on a tv show called `Moscow's Deadliest Criminals'. 
Italian actress Yvonne Scio makes quite a promising English-language 
debut as the heroine.


Title
Review for Doctor Dolittle (1998)
USA. 1998. Director - Betty Thomas, Screenplay - Larry Levin & Nat 
Maudlin, Based on the Novels by Hugh Lofting, Producers - John Davis, 
David T. Friendly & Joseph Singer, Photography - Russell Boyd, Music - 
Richard Gibbs, Music - Pilar McCurry, Visual Effects Supervisor - Jon 
Farhat, Visual Effects - Banned from the Ranch Entertainment (Supervisor 
- Van Ling), Cinesite, The Computer Film Co, C.O.R.E. Digital Pictures 
(Supervisors - John Mariella & Bob Munro), Pacific Title/Mirage Digital 
&  Pop Film and Pop Animation, Animatronics - Jim Henson's Creature 
Workshop (Supervisor - David Barrington Holt), Production Design - 
William A. Elliott. Production Company - Joseph M. Singer 
Entertainment/Davis Entertainment Co/20th Century Fox.
Eddie Murphy (Dr John Dolittle), Kristen Wilson (Lisa Dolittle), Kyla 
Pratt (Maya Dolittle), Oliver Platt (Dr Mark Weller), Richard Schiff (Dr 
Gene Reiss), Ossie Davis (Archer Dolittle), Peter Boyle (Calloway), 
Jeffrey Tambor (Dr Fish)
Voices: Norm MacDonald (Lucky), Albert Brooks (Tiger), Chris Rock 
(Rodney)
Plot: By accident GP John Dolittle suddenly rediscovers his forgotten 
childhood ability to talk to animals. He is promptly driven around the 
bend as animals everywhere come to him seeking help. His family think 
him crazy while his seemingly eccentric behaviour threatens a corporate 
takeover of his practice.
I grew up with Hugh Lofting's original Dr Dolittle stories written in 
the 1920s and still remember their delightfully fabulist charms - not 
unakin to the absurdist joys of a Pippi Longstocking or a 'Wind in the 
Willows'. So you may understand my bias against this current adaption of 
the stories. This is a version that might be politely termed a 
bastardization. About all the film has in common with the stories is the 
central concept of a doctor who can talk to animals - with everything 
else having been tossed out. It does have a brief scene in common with 
the 1967 film version where Dolittle gets thrown in an asylum but other 
than that the stories have been fed through the modern American 
children's film formula. Out has gone the period setting and all of Dr 
Dolittle's fantastical encounters with exotic animals - the talking 
hamsters and tigers here, technically superb and all as they are, sadly 
never compensate for the lack of any Push-Me-Pull-You's or Giant Pink 
Snails. Instead we have a cute, feelgood film which is merely about a 
character with an outlandish gift. The film wheels out all the cliches 
associated with this sort of comedy - the doctor's family thinking him 
crazy, the one-dimensional tightass villains, trite little speeches 
about being special, the doctor's eventually proving himself and 
everybody accepting his gift. The 1967 film version may not have been 
particularly good but it certainly had more of the spirit of the 
originals than this does.
The film is directed by Betty Thomas, a former actress best known for 
the part of Lucy Bates, the beat-cop with a frustrated mothering complex 
on tv's 'Hill Street Blues'. Thomas began to branch out into directing 
with the likes of the highly acclaimed tv movie 'My Breast' (1994) and 
received a Best Directing Emmy nomination for the tv movie 'The Late 
Shift' (1996) about the network wars between the David Letterman and Jay 
Leno talkshows. Thomas then broke into feature films and had notable 
success with 1995's 'The Brady Bunch Movie' followed by 1997's 'Private 
Parts' about the on-air hijinks of Howard Stern.
Unfortunately Thomas is not a very good director. 'The Brady Bunch 
Movie' consisted only of  a single-note joke about sarcastically 
puncturing the original tv series' naivete, and 'Private Parts' seemed 
entirely taken up by a scatological admiration for its subject matter 
Howard Stern's adolescent on-air antics. 'Dr Dolittle' might have been a 
funnier film if it had a better director - there are several scenes like 
Dolittle being caught giving mouth-to-mouth to a hamster or acting as an 
animal therapist that would have been hilarious on paper. But under 
Thomas's hand the film grovels in an extraordinary excess of toilet 
humour - a fat lady getting a hamster stuck in the crack of her butt; a 
rectal probe becoming lost up a dog's ass; CPR being performed on a rat 
only to find it is a pent-up fart. The talking animals are voiced with 
the irritating people-saying-silly-things-in-falsetto-voices that shows 
like 'America's Funniest Home Videos' seem to regard as the height of 
humour. The film stars funny man Eddie Murphy who over the last couple 
of years has been trying to rejuvenate a flagging career by reinventing 
himself in fantasy films but the film fails to give him any opportunity 
to open up and do the wild and crazy things he does best. In all a sad 
and lamentable vulgarization of a fine set of children's stories.


Title
Review for Funny Games (1997)
Austria 1997. Director/Screenplay - Michael Haneke, Producer - Veit 
Heiduschka, Photography - Jurgen Jurges, Music - Pietro Mascagni & John 
Zorn, Special Effects - Danny Bellens, Willi Neuner & Mac Steinmaier, 
Production Design - Christoph Kanter. Production Company - Wega-Film.
Susanne Lothar (Anne Schober), Ulrich Muhe (Georg Schober), Arno Frisch 
(Paul), Frank Giering (Peter), Stefan Clapczynski (Schorschi/Georgie 
Schorber)
Plot: A husband and wife and their young son head off to their lakeside 
holiday home. They are visited by two polite teenage boys, friends of 
their lakeside neighbours, initially come to borrow some eggs, but whose 
initial friendliness suddenly explodes into torture and sadistic games.
>From the film's opening credits where a family of three, on a placid 
drive to their holiday home change tapes on the car stereo and the 
gentle sounds of Mozart are suddenly replaced by a loud and raucous 
blast of death metal, director Michael Haneke signals his intent. And 
sure to his word `Funny Games' quickly shapes to be a film in the mold 
of `Straw Dogs', `The Last House on the Left' and `The Texas Chainsaw 
Massacre' wherein the idyll of a middle-class family is savagely 
overturned by outsiders and descends into a gruelling assault of sadism 
and torture.
It all begins innocently enough, with the introduction of the two boys, 
both dressed in white jerseys, shorts and plimsolls as though they were 
preppies returned from a day at the beach. An incident, which is comical 
in its gaucheness, where Frank Giering comes to borrow some eggs but 
keeps dropping them suddenly, unexpectedly turns violent. And from that 
point on `Funny Games' becomes a harrowing, psychologically gripping 
work of terror. (And one that not unfavourably compares to the 
aforementioned works above). The scenes of violence come with quite 
disturbingly casual regard - the dog and the child are blown away 
without any of the taboo reticence that affects Hollywood models. The 
casualness of the violence never comes more coolly understated than the 
shot focused on tormentor Arno Frisch who hears a gunshot ringing out 
from the next room while he is out in the kitchen making a sandwich and 
then calmly completes his sandwich before going to investigate. But 
director Haneke also propels home the full effect of the assault with 
emotionally gruelling regard - in one shot the camera remains in a 
single wide-angle for several minutes focused on a room with a body in 
one corner shot through the head, its blood splattering the tv, while 
wife Lothar sobs in the middle of the room and at the same time tries to 
drag herself past her grief to make an escape before the boys return. 
The prolonged effect of the shot is remarkably harrowing. The film is 
all the more effective for the performances of the two boys, especially 
Arno Frisch who manages quite unnervingly to swing between a perfect 
mannered politeness and casual sadism without the slightest change in 
expression - one moment insisting his tormentees stop screaming and 
start referring to everybody by their first name, the next breaking 
people's legs with golf clubs.
Haneke also manages to be surprisingly playful. At several points he 
starts to engage in meta-fictional (or should one say meta-filmic ?) 
play and has Frisch directly address the audience - turning to the 
camera to ask if the audience really thinks him as bad as his victims  
do; or offering a bet to his tormentees to see if they can stay alive 
until morning and then turning to ask the audience who they would bet 
on. At another point he decides that he will prolong the torture in 
order to pad the film out to feature length. And in the most amusing 
moment Lothar manages to get ahold of the gun and blow Giering away 
whereupon Frisch decides that things can't be allowed to happen that 
way, scrabbles for a remote control and rewinds the film to just before 
she got ahold of the gun so he can disarm her. Juggling between raw, 
disturbing violence and this sort of playful humour is extremely 
difficult a balancing act to get right without allowing the film to 
descend to bad taste or campiness, but it is to Haneke's credit that he 
succeeds.
Reviewed at the 1998 Wellington International Film Festival
Copyright Richard Scheib 1998


Title
Review for Yi ge zi tou de dan sheng (1997)
Hong Kong. 1997. Director - Wai Ka-fai, Screenplay - Wai, Matthew Chow & 
Szeto Kam-yuen, Producers - Anthony Chow & Johnny To, Photography - Wong 
Wing-hang, Music - Cacine Wong, Production Design - Silver Cheung. 
Production Company - Milkyway Image Co.
Lau Ching-wan (Ah Kau), Francis Ng (Matt Chan)
Plot: The Hong Kong mobster Ah Kau is plunged into trouble after the 
gang run their boss down during an armed raid on a bathhouse. Kau and 
the rest of the gang complete a delivery of stolen cars to Mainland 
China for the money only to see them confiscated for owed money and then 
agree to help the boss's wife rob a rival gang - only to have her die 
during sex and the armed raid go wrong. In another reality Kau makes a 
different set of choices and there is persuaded to help a friend make an 
assassination hit in Taiwan - only to get too drunk to remember who they 
are hitting and finding the two of them have been hired by rival 
brothers to shoot the other.
This Hong Kong crime film is a rather funny take on the whole modishly 
cool criminal operation subgenre created by `Reservoir Dogs' and copied 
by the likes of `The Usual Suspects', `Things to Do in Denver When 
You're Dead' et al. Here the band of stylish, hard-talking crims which 
has become a staple of the subgenre since `Reservoir Dogs' are replaced 
by a group of bumbling wannabes who have more in common with Abbott and 
Costello than Tarantino. The exercise is shot through with a sense of 
Terry Gilliam-esque black irony wherein everything that can go wrong 
inevitably will. The gang's boss is accidentally run over - they brick 
him up only to find they have entombed his ringing pager with him; one 
of the hoods keeps trying to get his senile grandmother to give him the 
contact name of the person he is to hit over the phone; the hoods wake 
up after a night's heavy drinking to find they have agreed to a hit and 
then that each has been hired by two mobster brothers to rub out the 
other brother; they mug a woman only to find that the woman has been 
left brain-damaged and is a triad boss's wife and that they have now 
been hired to find and kill themselves. The whole exercise is more a 
dog-legging series of ironic twists than it is any real plot but it is 
conducted with an immense degree of energy. And it is as much notable 
for the energy of the exercise as it is for the eccentricity of the 
camera-work - a fight is filmed with the camera upside down; another 
with it swinging from side to side as though on a pendulum; or fluid 
camera shots with the camera snaking through the aftermath of shootouts 
or action melee scenes to take in everything that is happening at once.
The film also has a unique narrative structure. It tells one story then 
backtracks to the beginning of events to retell an alternate story based 
on what might happen if a different central choice was made by the hero. 
This may well have been inspired by the elliptical story-telling 
structure of `Pulp Fiction', as some have pointed out, but really is a 
device of sufficient uniqueness and originality to stand on its own. Of 
course the basic idea of telling two alternate storylines based on 
different choices was then stolen in the following year's `Sliding 
Doors'.
Reviewed at the Christchurch 1998 International Film Festival


Title
Review for Sliding Doors (1998)
UK/USA. 1998. Director/Screenplay - Peter Howitt, Producers - Philippa 
Braithwaite, William Horberg & Sydney Pollack, Photography - Remi 
Adafarasian, Music - David Hirschfelder, Music Supervisor - Anita 
Camarata, Visual Effects - Cinesite, Production Design - Maria 
Djurkovic. Production Company - Intermedia 
Films/Miramax/Paramount/Mirage Enterprises.
Gwyneth Paltrow (Helen Quilley), John Lynch (Gerry Flanagan), John 
Hannah (James Hammerton), Jeanne Tripplehorn (Lydia), Zara Turner 
(Anna), Douglas McFerran (Russell)
Plot: Helen Quilley is fired from her job with a London PR firm and 
returns home. Depending whether or not she bumps into a child on the 
tubeway steps she misses her train home. If she catches the tube she 
gets home in time to catch her boyfriend with another woman and from 
there walks out, finds and becomes involved with another man and 
successfully sets up her own business. But in an alternate scenario she 
misses the train, never discovers her layabout boyfriend's continuing 
deception and continues on in a low-paying waitressing job.
I was preparing to start this review with something like "`Sliding 
Doors' conducts a unique venture into the concept of alternate 
timelines, the wildly divergent sets of circumstances that may result 
from a different choice made at a crucial point ...". At least I would 
have thought it a more unique film had two weeks earlier, I not seen the 
Hong Kong gangster film `Too Many Ways to Be No. 1'. `Too Many Ways' was 
made a year prior to `Sliding Doors' and both films are remarkably 
similar. Both conduct two different divergent stories dependent on the 
central character making a crucial choice in a trivial matter at the 
start of the story. It is hard not to believe that `Too Many Ways' was 
not an influence over `Sliding Doors', especially considering the timing 
and the sudden emergence of the uniqueness of this theme. Of course both 
films choose to tell the story in very different milieus. `Too Many 
Ways' is almost a parody of the hard-boiled Hong Kong gangster film 
while `Sliding Doors' is a romantic comedy made in the shadow of `Four 
Weddings and a Funeral'. Of the two `Sliding Doors' is certainly the 
more conceptually audacious in that it tells its two stories 
concurrently, interweaving and allowing aspects of one story to mirror 
the other, while `Too Many Ways' settles less challengingly for merely 
telling its two stories consecutively.
But of the two `Sliding Doors' is invariably the lesser. It tries a 
little too hard to be another `Four Weddings' - yet another cosmopolitan 
London romantic comedy and cast with an eye toward international 
box-office (with the beautiful swan-necked Gwyneth Paltrow at least 
conducting a creditable British accent here). Howitt writes some 
occasionally quite amusing one-liners but the characters are 
one-dimensional. The depth they are given seems to come only in terms of 
catchphrase descriptions - Jeanne Tripplehorn is just The Bitch; John 
Hannah is Prince Charming - we never even find out what sort of 
businessman he is; and John Lynch is The Cheating Loser Boyfriend. 
Lynch's character is so one-dimensional and he given so little 
motivation in his cheating and indecision that one cannot help but 
wonder what it is that two women see in him.
It's just that one finds it hard to swallow the basic premise. Howitt 
asks us to believe that not only does whether Paltrow misses the train 
or not make the difference between two paths she leads (fair enough) but 
also the entire difference between whether she leads a successful life 
or not. One could maybe have bought it if the two pathways were not so 
categorically black-and-white - if she makes the train she gets Prince 
Charming, makes a success of herself in business, gets a new sharp 
image; whereas if she doesn't she ends up unhappy, stuck in a low-paid 
job as a waitress and never finds out the truth about her useless, 
unfaithful boyfriend. It even makes the difference, for goodness sake, 
whether she gets pregnant to Prince Charming or to the loser boyfriend. 
Underneath it all the film is really a rather bland Yuppie daydream - 
beneath all its romantic ambitions it buys into the fantasy that success 
in life equates with success in business, a good image and true love; 
and Hell in life is being caught in a dead-end relationship and a 
thankless, low-paying job in the service industry. Sadly the film buys 
into the whole Cinderella Complex - that a woman's success and happiness 
in life is dependent on success and happiness being delivered to her. 
What is says is that success, fulfilment and uncovering the truth about 
the world are things that only really occur by chance happenstance as 
opposed to being dependent upon one's own decisions and 
self-determination, and that happiness is a result of external 
consequence rather than an attitude of mind. Personally I don't buy it.


Title
Review for Downdraft (1996) (TV)
Canada/Czechoslovakia. 1996. Director - Michael Mazo, Screenplay - 
Christopher Hyde, Producers - Mazo, Lloyd A. Simandi & Deborah Thompson, 
Photography - Danny Nowak, Music - Peter Allen, Special Effects - North 
American Pictures S.R.O., Special Effects Supervisors - Jiri Berger & 
Vladimir Jehlicha, Production Design/Visual Effects Design - Charles 
Wood. Production Company - North American Pictures/Minotaur Films.
Vincent Spano (Colonel Jack Brenner), Kate Vernon (Alexa Belekenyev), 
John Novak (Miles Standish), Paul Koslo (General George Washington 
Devlin), Sandra P. Grant (Babe), John Pyper-Ferguson (Spike), William S. 
Taylor (Rudy), Sean Fuller (Hawkins), Michael Spelchta (Mikey Brenner)
Plot: Jack Brenner, a US colonel falsely incarcerated in order to cover 
up the death of an out-of-control general, is granted his freedom if he 
will assemble his old team of nonconformist experts and break into a 
military bunker where a scientist has taken over and is threatening to 
fire nuclear missiles on China and the former Soviet Union. But once 
inside the bunker the mission is fraught by a killer cyborg hunting 
them, while above ground a general determines to do everything he can to 
ensure the secrets the bunker holds are not discovered.
For a B-budget action film that one enters with little expectation, 
`Downdraft' proves surprisingly worthwhile. What does takes one aback 
about it is the extraordinary busyness of its plot which manages to 
juggle enough subplots sufficient to serve as single plots for 
half-a-dozen films. Not only does it feature a missile bunker with a 
rogue scientist threatening to fire nuclear warheads, but it also throws 
in an about-to-explode hydrogen bomb boobytrap and an about-to-meltdown 
nuclear reactor. Also thrown in for the count are a killer android; an 
out-of-control AI which has melded with the scientist's mind; and an 
out-of-control general determined to sabotage efforts on the surface. 
That the film manages to keep so many subplots up in the air without 
losing the thread or confusing the viewer, is all credit to it. 
Naturally not all of these get entirely satisfying airings but the film 
manages to work them better than one might think. It all functions quite 
well within its modest budget - there is the feel it wants to open up 
with some more extravagant action sequences but still conducts itself 
quite respectably nevertheless with at least one sequence with the 
android shooting at the team in a descending elevator that is 
dramatically intense. A good degree of care and attention has also been 
given to making the hero and the film's `Dirty Dozen' team of characters 
seem believable and well-rounded.
Despite being set in the US and made by a company that call themselves 
North American Pictures, the film is actually a Canadian production that 
was shot in Czechoslovakia.  

